
--**--**--
      be taken across the Atlantic, and passing through the group of
      Azores, St. Michael will be reached in about ten days.  A day or two
      will be spent here, enjoying the fruit and wild scenery of these
      islands, and the voyage continued, and Gibraltar reached in three or
      four days.
 
        A day or two will be spent here in looking over the wonderful
      subterraneous fortifications, permission to visit these galleries
      being readily obtained.
 
        From Gibraltar, running along the coasts of Spain and France,
      Marseilles will be reached in three days.  Here ample time will be
      given not only to look over the city, which was founded six hundred
      years before the Christian era, and its artificial port, the finest
      of the kind in the Mediterranean, but to visit Paris during the
      Great Exhibition; and the beautiful city of Lyons, lying
      intermediate, from the heights of which, on a clear day, Mont Blanc
      and the Alps can be distinctly seen.  Passengers who may wish to
      extend the time at Paris can do so, and, passing down through
      Switzerland, rejoin the steamer at Genoa.
 
        From Marseilles to Genoa is a run of one night.  The excursionists
      will have an opportunity to look over this, the "magnificent city of
      palaces," and visit the birthplace of Columbus, twelve miles off,
      over a beautiful road built by Napoleon I.  From this point,
      excursions may be made to Milan, Lakes Como and Maggiore, or to
      Milan, Verona (famous for its extraordinary fortifications), Padua,
      and Venice.  Or, if passengers desire to visit Parma (famous for
      Correggio's frescoes) and Bologna, they can by rail go on to
      Florence, and rejoin the steamer at Leghorn, thus spending about
      three weeks amid the cities most famous for art in Italy.
 
        From Genoa the run to Leghorn will be made along the coast in one
--**--**--
      Sicily, and in sight of Mount Etna, along the south coast of Italy,
      the west and south coast of Greece, in sight of ancient Crete, up
      Athens Gulf, and into the Piraeus, Athens will be reached in two and
      a half or three days.  After tarrying here awhile, the Bay of
      Salamis will be crossed, and a day given to Corinth, whence the
      voyage will be continued to Constantinople, passing on the way
      through the Grecian Archipelago, the Dardanelles, the Sea of
      Marmora, and the mouth of the Golden Horn, and arriving in about
      forty-eight hours from Athens.
 
        After leaving Constantinople, the way will be taken out through
      the beautiful Bosphorus, across the Black Sea to Sebastopol and
      Balaklava, a run of about twenty-four hours.  Here it is proposed to
      remain two days, visiting the harbors, fortifications, and
      battlefields of the Crimea; thence back through the Bosphorus,
      touching at Constantinople to take in any who may have preferred to
      remain there; down through the Sea of Marmora and the Dardanelles,
      along the coasts of ancient Troy and Lydia in Asia, to Smyrna, which
      will be reached in two or two and a half days from Constantinople.
      A sufficient stay will be made here to give opportunity of visiting
      Ephesus, fifty miles distant by rail.
 
        From Smyrna towards the Holy Land the course will lay through the
      Grecian  Archipelago, close by the Isle of Patmos, along the coast
      of Asia, ancient Pamphylia, and the Isle of Cyprus.  Beirut will be
      reached in three days.  At Beirut time will be given to visit
      Damascus; after which the steamer will proceed to Joppa.
 
        From Joppa, Jerusalem, the River Jordan, the Sea of Tiberias,
      Nazareth, Bethany, Bethlehem, and other points of interest in the
      Holy Land can be visited, and here those who may have preferred to
--**--**--
 actress had entered her name on the ship's books, but something
 interfered and she couldn't go.  The "Drummer Boy of the Potomac"
 deserted, and lo, we had never a celebrity left!
 
 However, we were to have a "battery of guns" from the Navy Department (as
 per advertisement) to be used in answering royal salutes; and the
 document furnished by the Secretary of the Navy, which was to make
 "General Sherman and party" welcome guests in the courts and camps of the
 old world, was still left to us, though both document and battery, I
 think, were shorn of somewhat of their original august proportions.
 However, had not we the seductive program still, with its Paris, its
 Constantinople, Smyrna, Jerusalem, Jericho, and "our friends the
 Bermudians?" What did we care?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 Occasionally, during the following month, I dropped in at 117 Wall Street
 to inquire how the repairing and refurnishing of the vessel was coming
 on, how additions to the passenger list were averaging, how many people
 the committee were decreeing not "select" every day and banishing in
 sorrow and tribulation.  I was glad to know that we were to have a little
 printing press on board and issue a daily newspaper of our own.  I was
 glad to learn that our piano, our parlor organ, and our melodeon were to
 be the best instruments of the kind that could be had in the market.  I
 was proud to observe that among our excursionists were three ministers of
 the gospel, eight doctors, sixteen or eighteen ladies, several military
 and naval chieftains with sounding titles, an ample crop of "Professors"
 of various kinds, and a gentleman who had "COMMISSIONER OF THE UNITED
 STATES OF AMERICA TO EUROPE, ASIA, AND AFRICA" thundering after his name
 in one awful blast!  I had carefully prepared myself to take rather a
--**--**--
 He was gone to answer a call from the other side.  I sought the
 deck-sweep.
 
 "Who is that spider-legged gorilla yonder with the sanctimonious
 countenance?"
 
 "It's Captain Jones, sir--the chief mate."
 
 "Well.  This goes clear away ahead of anything I ever heard of before.
 Do you--now I ask you as a man and a brother--do you think I could
 venture to throw a rock here in any given direction without hitting a
 captain of this ship?"
 
 "Well, sir, I don't know--I think likely you'd fetch the captain of the
 watch may be, because he's a-standing right yonder in the way."
 
 I went below--meditating and a little downhearted.  I thought, if five
 cooks can spoil a broth, what may not five captains do with a pleasure
 excursion.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 We plowed along bravely for a week or more, and without any conflict of
 jurisdiction among the captains worth mentioning.  The passengers soon
 learned to accommodate themselves to their new circumstances, and life in
 the ship became nearly as systematically monotonous as the routine of a
 barrack.  I do not mean that it was dull, for it was not entirely so by
 any means--but there was a good deal of sameness about it.  As is always
 the fashion at sea, the passengers shortly began to pick up sailor terms
 --a sign that they were beginning to feel at home.  Half-past six was no
 longer half-past six to these pilgrims from New England, the South, and
 the Mississippi Valley, it was "seven bells"; eight, twelve, and four
 o'clock were "eight bells"; the captain did not take the longitude at
 nine o'clock, but at "two bells."  They spoke glibly of the "after
 cabin," the "for'rard cabin," "port and starboard" and the "fo'castle."
 
 At seven bells the first gong rang; at eight there was breakfast, for
--**--**--
 play it well required science.  We had to allow for the reeling of the
 ship to the right or the left.  Very often one made calculations for a
 heel to the right and the ship did not go that way.  The consequence was
 that that disk missed the whole hopscotch plan a yard or two, and then
 there was humiliation on one side and laughter on the other.
 
 When it rained the passengers had to stay in the house, of course--or at
 least the cabins--and amuse themselves with games, reading, looking out
 of the windows at the very familiar billows, and talking gossip.
 
 By 7 o'clock in the evening, dinner was about over; an hour's promenade
 on the upper deck followed; then the gong sounded and a large majority of
 the party repaired to the after cabin (upper), a handsome saloon fifty or
 sixty feet long, for prayers.  The unregenerated called this saloon the
 "Synagogue."  The devotions consisted only of two hymns from the Plymouth
 Collection and a short prayer, and seldom occupied more than fifteen
 minutes.  The hymns were accompanied by parlor-organ music when the sea
 was smooth enough to allow a performer to sit at the instrument without
 being lashed to his chair.
 
 After prayers the Synagogue shortly took the semblance of a writing
 school.  The like of that picture was never seen in a ship before.
 Behind the long dining tables on either side of the saloon, and scattered
 from one end to the other of the latter, some twenty or thirty gentlemen
 and ladies sat them down under the swaying lamps and for two or three
 hours wrote diligently in their journals.  Alas! that journals so
 voluminously begun should come to so lame and impotent a conclusion as
 most of them did!  I doubt if there is a single pilgrim of all that host
--**--**--
 saluted and what nation they were; and which way the wind was, and
 whether there was a heavy sea, and what sail we carried, though we don't
 ever carry any, principally, going against a head wind always--wonder
 what is the reason of that?--and how many lies Moult has told--Oh, every
 thing!  I've got everything down.  My father told me to keep that
 journal.  Father wouldn't take a thousand dollars for it when I get it
 done."
 
 "No, Jack; it will be worth more than a thousand dollars--when you get it
 done."
 
 "Do you?--no, but do you think it will, though?
 
 "Yes, it will be worth at least as much as a thousand dollars--when you
 get it done.  May be more."
 
 "Well, I about half think so, myself.  It ain't no slouch of a journal."
 
 But it shortly became a most lamentable "slouch of a journal."  One night
 in Paris, after a hard day's toil in sightseeing, I said:
 
 "Now I'll go and stroll around the cafes awhile, Jack, and give you a
 chance to write up your journal, old fellow."
 
 His countenance lost its fire.  He said:
 
 "Well, no, you needn't mind.  I think I won't run that journal anymore.
 It is awful tedious.  Do you know--I reckon I'm as much as four thousand
 pages behind hand.  I haven't got any France in it at all.  First I
 thought I'd leave France out and start fresh.  But that wouldn't do,
 would it?  The governor would say, 'Hello, here--didn't see anything in
 France?  That cat wouldn't fight, you know.  First I thought I'd copy
 France out of the guide-book, like old Badger in the for'rard cabin,
 who's writing a book, but there's more than three hundred pages of it.
 Oh, I don't think a journal's any use--do you?  They're only a bother,
--**--**--
 moment.  Seamen say the nautilus is only found in these waters between
 the 35th and 45th parallels of latitude.
 
 At three o'clock on the morning of the twenty-first of June, we were
 awakened and notified that the Azores islands were in sight.  I said I
 did not take any interest in islands at three o'clock in the morning.
 But another persecutor came, and then another and another, and finally
 believing that the general enthusiasm would permit no one to slumber in
 peace, I got up and went sleepily on deck.  It was five and a half
 o'clock now, and a raw, blustering morning.  The passengers were huddled
 about the smoke-stacks and fortified behind ventilators, and all were
 wrapped in wintry costumes and looking sleepy and unhappy in the pitiless
 gale and the drenching spray.
 
 The island in sight was Flores.  It seemed only a mountain of mud
 standing up out of the dull mists of the sea.  But as we bore down upon
 it the sun came out and made it a beautiful picture--a mass of green
 farms and meadows that swelled up to a height of fifteen hundred feet and
 mingled its upper outlines with the clouds.  It was ribbed with sharp,
 steep ridges and cloven with narrow canyons, and here and there on the
 heights, rocky upheavals shaped themselves into mimic battlements and
 castles; and out of rifted clouds came broad shafts of sunlight, that
 painted summit, and slope and glen, with bands of fire, and left belts of
 somber shade between.  It was the aurora borealis of the frozen pole
 exiled to a summer land!
 
 We skirted around two-thirds of the island, four miles from shore, and
 all the opera glasses in the ship were called into requisition to settle
 disputes as to whether mossy spots on the uplands were groves of trees or
--**--**--
 The roads were a wonder, and well they might be.  Here was an island with
 only a handful of people in it--25,000--and yet such fine roads do not
 exist in the United States outside of Central Park.  Everywhere you go,
 in any direction, you find either a hard, smooth, level thoroughfare,
 just sprinkled with black lava sand, and bordered with little gutters
 neatly paved with small smooth pebbles, or compactly paved ones like
 Broadway.  They talk much of the Russ pavement in New York, and call it a
 new invention--yet here they have been using it in this remote little
 isle of the sea for two hundred years!  Every street in Horta is
 handsomely paved with the heavy Russ blocks, and the surface is neat and
 true as a floor--not marred by holes like Broadway.  And every road is
 fenced in by tall, solid lava walls, which will last a thousand years in
 this land where frost is unknown.  They are very thick, and are often
 plastered and whitewashed and capped with projecting slabs of cut stone.
 Trees from gardens above hang their swaying tendrils down, and contrast
 their bright green with the whitewash or the black lava of the walls and
 make them beautiful.  The trees and vines stretch across these narrow
 roadways sometimes and so shut out the sun that you seem to be riding
 through a tunnel.  The pavements, the roads, and the bridges are all
 government work.
 
 The bridges are of a single span--a single arch--of cut stone, without a
 support, and paved on top with flags of lava and ornamental pebblework.
 Everywhere are walls, walls, walls, and all of them tasteful and
 handsome--and eternally substantial; and everywhere are those marvelous
 pavements, so neat, so smooth, and so indestructible.  And if ever roads
 and streets and the outsides of houses were perfectly free from any sign
--**--**--
 of Spain placed her chair there once when the French and Spanish troops
 were besieging Gibraltar, and said she would never move from the spot
 till the English flag was lowered from the fortresses.  If the English
 hadn't been gallant enough to lower the flag for a few hours one day,
 she'd have had to break her oath or die up there."
 
 On the topmost pinnacle of Gibraltar we halted a good while, and no doubt
 the mules were tired.  They had a right to be.  The military road was
 good, but rather steep, and there was a good deal of it.  The view from
 the narrow ledge was magnificent; from it vessels seeming like the
 tiniest little toy boats were turned into noble ships by the telescopes,
 and other vessels that were fifty miles away and even sixty, they said,
 and invisible to the naked eye, could be clearly distinguished through
 those same telescopes.  Below, on one side, we looked down upon an
 endless mass of batteries and on the other straight down to the sea.
 
 While I was resting ever so comfortably on a rampart, and cooling my
 baking head in the delicious breeze, an officious guide belonging to
 another party came up and said:
 
 "Senor, that high hill yonder is called the Queen's Chair--"
 
 "Sir, I am a helpless orphan in a foreign land.  Have pity on me.  Don't
 --now don't inflict that most in-FERNAL old legend on me anymore today!"
 
 There--I had used strong language after promising I would never do so
 again; but the provocation was more than human nature could bear.  If you
 had been bored so, when you had the noble panorama of Spain and Africa
 and the blue Mediterranean spread abroad at your feet, and wanted to gaze
 and enjoy and surfeit yourself in its beauty in silence, you might have
--**--**--
 alongside of it."
 
 "The ultimate one--that is a good word--but the pillars are not both on
 the same side of the strait."  (I saw he had been deceived by a
 carelessly written sentence in the guidebook.)
 
 "Well, it ain't for you to say, nor for me.  Some authors states it that
 way, and some states it different.  Old Gibbons don't say nothing about
 it--just shirks it complete--Gibbons always done that when he got stuck
 --but there is Rolampton, what does he say?  Why, he says that they was
 both on the same side, and Trinculian, and Sobaster, and Syraccus, and
 Langomarganbl----"
 
 "Oh, that will do--that's enough.  If you have got your hand in for
 inventing authors and testimony, I have nothing more to say--let them be
 on the same side."
 
 We don't mind the Oracle.  We rather like him.  We can tolerate the
 Oracle very easily, but we have a poet and a good-natured enterprising
 idiot on board, and they do distress the company.  The one gives copies
 of his verses to consuls, commanders, hotel keepers, Arabs, Dutch--to
 anybody, in fact, who will submit to a grievous infliction most kindly
 meant.  His poetry is all very well on shipboard, notwithstanding when he
 wrote an "Ode to the Ocean in a Storm" in one half hour, and an
 "Apostrophe to the Rooster in the Waist of the Ship" in the next, the
 transition was considered to be rather abrupt; but when he sends an
 invoice of rhymes to the Governor of Fayal and another to the commander
 in chief and other dignitaries in Gibraltar with the compliments of the
 Laureate of the Ship, it is not popular with the passengers.
 
 The other personage I have mentioned is young and green, and not bright,
 not learned, and not wise.  He will be, though, someday if he recollects
--**--**--
 poor ragged Arabs see one they beg to be allowed to kiss it.
 
 They have also a small gold coin worth two dollars.  And that reminds me
 of something.  When Morocco is in a state of war, Arab couriers carry
 letters through the country and charge a liberal postage.  Every now and
 then they fall into the hands of marauding bands and get robbed.
 Therefore, warned by experience, as soon as they have collected two
 dollars' worth of money they exchange it for one of those little gold
 pieces, and when robbers come upon them, swallow it.  The stratagem was
 good while it was unsuspected, but after that the marauders simply gave
 the sagacious United States mail an emetic and sat down to wait.
 
 The Emperor of Morocco is a soulless despot, and the great officers under
 him are despots on a smaller scale.  There is no regular system of
 taxation, but when the Emperor or the Bashaw want money, they levy on
 some rich man, and he has to furnish the cash or go to prison.
 Therefore, few men in Morocco dare to be rich.  It is too dangerous a
 luxury.  Vanity occasionally leads a man to display wealth, but sooner or
 later the Emperor trumps up a charge against him--any sort of one will
 do--and confiscates his property.  Of course, there are many rich men in
 the empire, but their money is buried, and they dress in rags and
 counterfeit poverty.  Every now and then the Emperor imprisons a man who
 is suspected of the crime of being rich, and makes things so
 uncomfortable for him that he is forced to discover where he has hidden
 his money.
 
 Moors and Jews sometimes place themselves under the protection of the
 foreign consuls, and then they can flout their riches in the Emperor's
--**--**--
 gong and tarried to worship!
 
 He said: "Well, that's gorgis, ain't it!  They don't have none of them
 things in our parts, do they?  I consider that them effects is on account
 of the superior refragability, as you may say, of the sun's diramic
 combination with the lymphatic forces of the perihelion of Jubiter.  What
 should you think?"
 
 "Oh, go to bed!" Dan said that, and went away.
 
 "Oh, yes, it's all very well to say go to bed when a man makes an
 argument which another man can't answer.  Dan don't never stand any
 chance in an argument with me.  And he knows it, too.  What should you
 say, Jack?"
 
 "Now, Doctor, don't you come bothering around me with that dictionary
 bosh.  I don't do you any harm, do I?  Then you let me alone."
 
 "He's gone, too.  Well, them fellows have all tackled the old Oracle, as
 they say, but the old man's most too many for 'em.  Maybe the Poet Lariat
 ain't satisfied with them deductions?"
 
 The poet replied with a barbarous rhyme and went below.
 
 "'Pears that he can't qualify, neither.  Well, I didn't expect nothing
 out of him.  I never see one of them poets yet that knowed anything.
 He'll go down now and grind out about four reams of the awfullest slush
 about that old rock and give it to a consul, or a pilot, or a nigger, or
 anybody he comes across first which he can impose on.  Pity but
 somebody'd take that poor old lunatic and dig all that poetry rubbage out
 of him.  Why can't a man put his intellect onto things that's some value?
 Gibbons, and Hippocratus, and Sarcophagus, and all them old ancient
 philosophers was down on poets--"
 
 "Doctor," I said, "you are going to invent authorities now and I'll leave
--**--**--
 sufferers were killed, or crippled, or bruised, or only scared is more
 than I can possibly make out, and yet I would just give anything to know.
 
 We were troubled a little at dinner today by the conduct of an American,
 who talked very loudly and coarsely and laughed boisterously where all
 others were so quiet and well behaved.  He ordered wine with a royal
 flourish and said:
 
 "I never dine without wine, sir" (which was a pitiful falsehood), and
 looked around upon the company to bask in the admiration he expected to
 find in their faces.  All these airs in a land where they would as soon
 expect to leave the soup out of the bill of fare as the wine!--in a land
 where wine is nearly as common among all ranks as water!  This fellow
 said: "I am a free-born sovereign, sir, an American, sir, and I want
 everybody to know it!"  He did not mention that he was a lineal
 descendant of Balaam's ass, but everybody knew that without his telling
 it.
 
 We have driven in the Prado--that superb avenue bordered with patrician
 mansions and noble shade trees--and have visited the chateau Boarely and
 its curious museum.  They showed us a miniature cemetery there--a copy of
 the first graveyard that was ever in Marseilles, no doubt.  The delicate
 little skeletons were lying in broken vaults and had their household gods
 and kitchen utensils with them.  The original of this cemetery was dug up
 in the principal street of the city a few years ago.  It had remained
 there, only twelve feet underground, for a matter of twenty-five hundred
 years or thereabouts.  Romulus was here before he built Rome, and thought
 something of founding a city on this spot, but gave up the idea.  He may
 have been personally acquainted with some of these Phoenicians whose
--**--**--
 know anything.  They sneer at your most inoffensive suggestions; they
 laugh unfeelingly at your treasured dreams of foreign lands; they brand
 the statements of your traveled aunts and uncles as the stupidest
 absurdities; they deride your most trusted authors and demolish the fair
 images they have set up for your willing worship with the pitiless
 ferocity of the fanatic iconoclast!  But still I love the Old Travelers.
 I love them for their witless platitudes, for their supernatural ability
 to bore, for their delightful asinine vanity, for their luxuriant
 fertility of imagination, for their startling, their brilliant, their
 overwhelming mendacity!
 
 By Lyons and the Saone (where we saw the lady of Lyons and thought little
 of her comeliness), by Villa Franca, Tonnere, venerable Sens, Melun,
 Fontainebleau, and scores of other beautiful cities, we swept, always
 noting the absence of hog-wallows, broken fences, cow lots, unpainted
 houses, and mud, and always noting, as well, the presence of cleanliness,
 grace, taste in adorning and beautifying, even to the disposition of a
 tree or the turning of a hedge, the marvel of roads in perfect repair,
 void of ruts and guiltless of even an inequality of surface--we bowled
 along, hour after hour, that brilliant summer day, and as nightfall
 approached we entered a wilderness of odorous flowers and shrubbery, sped
 through it, and then, excited, delighted, and half persuaded that we were
 only the sport of a beautiful dream, lo, we stood in magnificent Paris!
 
 What excellent order they kept about that vast depot!  There was no
 frantic crowding and jostling, no shouting and swearing, and no
 swaggering intrusion of services by rowdy hackmen.  These latter gentry
 stood outside--stood quietly by their long line of vehicles and said
 never a word.  A kind of hackman general seemed to have the whole matter
 of transportation in his hands.  He politely received the passengers and
--**--**--
 and with patches in the faded cloth and invisible obstructions that made
 the balls describe the most astonishing and unsuspected angles and
 perform feats in the way of unlooked-for and almost impossible
 "scratches" that were perfectly bewildering.  We had played at Gibraltar
 with balls the size of a walnut, on a table like a public square--and in
 both instances we achieved far more aggravation than amusement.  We
 expected to fare better here, but we were mistaken.  The cushions were a
 good deal higher than the balls, and as the balls had a fashion of always
 stopping under the cushions, we accomplished very little in the way of
 caroms.  The cushions were hard and unelastic, and the cues were so
 crooked that in making a shot you had to allow for the curve or you would
 infallibly put the "English" on the wrong side of the hall.  Dan was to
 mark while the doctor and I played.  At the end of an hour neither of us
 had made a count, and so Dan was tired of keeping tally with nothing to
 tally, and we were heated and angry and disgusted.  We paid the heavy
 bill--about six cents--and said we would call around sometime when we had
 a week to spend, and finish the game.
 
 We adjourned to one of those pretty cafes and took supper and tested the
 wines of the country, as we had been instructed to do, and found them
 harmless and unexciting.  They might have been exciting, however, if we
 had chosen to drink a sufficiency of them.
 
 To close our first day in Paris cheerfully and pleasantly, we now sought
 our grand room in the Grand Hotel du Louvre and climbed into our
 sumptuous bed to read and smoke--but alas!
 
           It was pitiful,
           In a whole city-full,
--**--**--
 European clothes, almost without ornament or insignia of rank; a red
 Turkish fez on his head; a short, stout, dark man, black-bearded,
 black-eyed, stupid, unprepossessing--a man whose whole appearance
 somehow suggested that if he only had a cleaver in his hand and a white
 apron on, one would not be at all surprised to hear him say: "A mutton
 roast today, or will you have a nice porterhouse steak?"
 
 Napoleon III, the representative of the highest modern civilization,
 progress, and refinement; Abdul-Aziz, the representative of a people by
 nature and training filthy, brutish, ignorant, unprogressive,
 superstitious--and a government whose Three Graces are Tyranny, Rapacity,
 Blood.  Here in brilliant Paris, under this majestic Arch of Triumph, the
 First Century greets the Nineteenth!
 
 NAPOLEON III., Emperor of France!  Surrounded by shouting thousands, by
 military pomp, by the splendors of his capital city, and companioned by
 kings and princes--this is the man who was sneered at and reviled and
 called Bastard--yet who was dreaming of a crown and an empire all the
 while; who was driven into exile--but carried his dreams with him; who
 associated with the common herd in America and ran foot races for a
 wager--but still sat upon a throne in fancy; who braved every danger to
 go to his dying mother--and grieved that she could not be spared to see
 him cast aside his plebeian vestments for the purple of royalty; who kept
 his faithful watch and walked his weary beat a common policeman of
 London--but dreamed the while of a coming night when he should tread the
 long-drawn corridors of the Tuileries; who made the miserable fiasco of
 Strasbourg; saw his poor, shabby eagle, forgetful of its lesson, refuse
 to perch upon his shoulder; delivered his carefully prepared, sententious
 burst of eloquence upon unsympathetic ears; found himself a prisoner, the
--**--**--
 trembling Tam O'Shanter saw the devil and the witches at their orgies
 that stormy night in "Alloway's auld haunted kirk."
 
 We visited the Louvre, at a time when we had no silk purchases in view,
 and looked at its miles of paintings by the old masters.  Some of them
 were beautiful, but at the same time they carried such evidences about
 them of the cringing spirit of those great men that we found small
 pleasure in examining them.  Their nauseous adulation of princely patrons
 was more prominent to me and chained my attention more surely than the
 charms of color and expression which are claimed to be in the pictures.
 Gratitude for kindnesses is well, but it seems to me that some of those
 artists carried it so far that it ceased to be gratitude and became
 worship.  If there is a plausible excuse for the worship of men, then by
 all means let us forgive Rubens and his brethren.
 
 But I will drop the subject, lest I say something about the old masters
 that might as well be left unsaid.
 
 Of course we drove in the Bois de Boulogne, that limitless park, with its
 forests, its lakes, its cascades, and its broad avenues.  There were
 thousands upon thousands of vehicles abroad, and the scene was full of
 life and gaiety.  There were very common hacks, with father and mother
 and all the children in them; conspicuous little open carriages with
 celebrated ladies of questionable reputation in them; there were Dukes
 and Duchesses abroad, with gorgeous footmen perched behind, and equally
 gorgeous outriders perched on each of the six horses; there were blue and
 silver, and green and gold, and pink and black, and all sorts and
 descriptions of stunning and startling liveries out, and I almost yearned
 to be a flunkey myself, for the sake of the fine clothes.
--**--**--
 love-songs of Abelard to Heloise, the case was too plain--love-songs come
 not properly within the teachings of rhetoric and philosophy.
 
 He drove Abelard from his house.  Abelard returned secretly and carried
 Heloise away to Palais, in Brittany, his native country.  Here, shortly
 afterward, she bore a son, who, from his rare beauty, was surnamed
 Astrolabe--William G.  The girl's flight enraged Fulbert, and he longed
 for vengeance, but feared to strike lest retaliation visit Heloise--for
 he still loved her tenderly.  At length Abelard offered to marry Heloise
 --but on a shameful condition: that the marriage should be kept secret
 from the world, to the end that (while her good name remained a wreck, as
 before,) his priestly reputation might be kept untarnished.  It was like
 that miscreant.  Fulbert saw his opportunity and consented.  He would see
 the parties married, and then violate the confidence of the man who had
 taught him that trick; he would divulge the secret and so remove somewhat
 of the obloquy that attached to his niece's fame.  But the niece
 suspected his scheme.  She refused the marriage at first; she said
 Fulbert would betray the secret to save her, and besides, she did not
 wish to drag down a lover who was so gifted, so honored by the world,
 and who had such a splendid career before him.  It was noble,
 self-sacrificing love, and characteristic of the pure-souled Heloise,
 but it was not good sense.
 
 But she was overruled, and the private marriage took place.  Now for
 Fulbert!  The heart so wounded should be healed at last; the proud spirit
 so tortured should find rest again; the humbled head should be lifted up
 once more.  He proclaimed the marriage in the high places of the city and
 rejoiced that dishonor had departed from his house.  But lo!  Abelard
--**--**--
 He comprehended at last that I wanted to see a grisette.  Then he showed
 me dozens of them.  They were like nearly all the Frenchwomen I ever saw
 --homely.  They had large hands, large feet, large mouths; they had pug
 noses as a general thing, and moustaches that not even good breeding
 could overlook; they combed their hair straight back without parting;
 they were ill-shaped, they were not winning, they were not graceful; I
 knew by their looks that they ate garlic and onions; and lastly and
 finally, to my thinking it would be base flattery to call them immoral.
 
 Aroint thee, wench!  I sorrow for the vagabond student of the Latin
 Quarter now, even more than formerly I envied him.  Thus topples to earth
 another idol of my infancy.
 
 We have seen every thing, and tomorrow we go to Versailles.  We shall see
 Paris only for a little while as we come back to take up our line of
 march for the ship, and so I may as well bid the beautiful city a
 regretful farewell.  We shall travel many thousands of miles after we
 leave here and visit many great cities, but we shall find none so
 enchanting as this.
 
 Some of our party have gone to England, intending to take a roundabout
 course and rejoin the vessel at Leghorn or Naples several weeks hence.
 We came near going to Geneva, but have concluded to return to Marseilles
 and go up through Italy from Genoa.
 
 I will conclude this chapter with a remark that I am sincerely proud to
 be able to make--and glad, as well, that my comrades cordially endorse
 it, to wit: by far the handsomest women we have seen in France were born
 and reared in America.
 
 I feel now like a man who has redeemed a failing reputation and shed
--**--**--
 watching eagerly from her French asylum for the form that will never
 come--but I do admire his nerve, his calm self-reliance, his shrewd good
 sense.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII.
 
 We had a pleasant journey of it seaward again.  We found that for the
 three past nights our ship had been in a state of war.  The first night
 the sailors of a British ship, being happy with grog, came down on the
 pier and challenged our sailors to a free fight.  They accepted with
 alacrity, repaired to the pier, and gained--their share of a drawn
 battle.  Several bruised and bloody members of both parties were carried
 off by the police and imprisoned until the following morning.  The next
 night the British boys came again to renew the fight, but our men had had
 strict orders to remain on board and out of sight.  They did so, and the
 besieging party grew noisy and more and more abusive as the fact became
 apparent (to them) that our men were afraid to come out.  They went away
 finally with a closing burst of ridicule and offensive epithets.  The
 third night they came again and were more obstreperous than ever.  They
 swaggered up and down the almost deserted pier, and hurled curses,
 obscenity, and stinging sarcasms at our crew.  It was more than human
 nature could bear.  The executive officer ordered our men ashore--with
 instructions not to fight.  They charged the British and gained a
 brilliant victory.  I probably would not have mentioned this war had it
 ended differently.  But I travel to learn, and I still remember that they
 picture no French defeats in the battle-galleries of Versailles.
 
 It was like home to us to step on board the comfortable ship again and
 smoke and lounge about her breezy decks.  And yet it was not altogether
--**--**--
 great stone staircases, tesselated marble pavements on the floors,
 (sometimes they make a mosaic work, of intricate designs, wrought in
 pebbles or little fragments of marble laid in cement,) and grand salons
 hung with pictures by Rubens, Guido, Titian, Paul Veronese, and so on,
 and portraits of heads of the family, in plumed helmets and gallant coats
 of mail, and patrician ladies in stunning costumes of centuries ago.
 But, of course, the folks were all out in the country for the summer, and
 might not have known enough to ask us to dinner if they had been at home,
 and so all the grand empty salons, with their resounding pavements, their
 grim pictures of dead ancestors, and tattered banners with the dust of
 bygone centuries upon them, seemed to brood solemnly of death and the
 grave, and our spirits ebbed away, and our cheerfulness passed from us.
 We never went up to the eleventh story.  We always began to suspect
 ghosts.  There was always an undertaker-looking servant along, too, who
 handed us a program, pointed to the picture that began the list of the
 salon he was in, and then stood stiff and stark and unsmiling in his
 petrified livery till we were ready to move on to the next chamber,
 whereupon he marched sadly ahead and took up another malignantly
 respectful position as before.  I wasted so much time praying that the
 roof would fall in on these dispiriting flunkies that I had but little
 left to bestow upon palace and pictures.
 
 And besides, as in Paris, we had a guide.  Perdition catch all the
 guides.  This one said he was the most gifted linguist in Genoa, as far
 as English was concerned, and that only two persons in the city beside
 himself could talk the language at all.  He showed us the birthplace of
--**--**--
 
 It is hard to forget repulsive things.  I remember yet how I ran off from
 school once, when I was a boy, and then, pretty late at night, concluded
 to climb into the window of my father's office and sleep on a lounge,
 because I had a delicacy about going home and getting thrashed.  As I lay
 on the lounge and my eyes grew accustomed to the darkness, I fancied I
 could see a long, dusky, shapeless thing stretched upon the floor.  A
 cold shiver went through me.  I turned my face to the wall.  That did not
 answer.  I was afraid that that thing would creep over and seize me in
 the dark.  I turned back and stared at it for minutes and minutes--they
 seemed hours.  It appeared to me that the lagging moonlight never, never
 would get to it.  I turned to the wall and counted twenty, to pass the
 feverish time away.  I looked--the pale square was nearer.  I turned
 again and counted fifty--it was almost touching it.  With desperate will
 I turned again and counted one hundred, and faced about, all in a
 tremble.  A white human hand lay in the moonlight!  Such an awful sinking
 at the heart--such a sudden gasp for breath!  I felt--I cannot tell what
 I felt.  When I recovered strength enough, I faced the wall again.  But
 no boy could have remained so with that mysterious hand behind him.  I
 counted again and looked--the most of a naked arm was exposed.  I put my
 hands over my eyes and counted till I could stand it no longer, and then
 --the pallid face of a man was there, with the corners of the mouth drawn
 down, and the eyes fixed and glassy in death!  I raised to a sitting
 posture and glowered on that corpse till the light crept down the bare
--**--**--
 What, more?  The furniture of the narrow chamber of death we had just
 visited weighed six millions of francs in ounces and carats alone,
 without a penny thrown into the account for the costly workmanship
 bestowed upon them!  But we followed into a large room filled with tall
 wooden presses like wardrobes.  He threw them open, and behold, the
 cargoes of "crude bullion" of the assay offices of Nevada faded out of my
 memory.  There were Virgins and bishops there, above their natural size,
 made of solid silver, each worth, by weight, from eight hundred thousand
 to two millions of francs, and bearing gemmed books in their hands worth
 eighty thousand; there were bas-reliefs that weighed six hundred pounds,
 carved in solid silver; croziers and crosses, and candlesticks six and
 eight feet high, all of virgin gold, and brilliant with precious stones;
 and beside these were all manner of cups and vases, and such things, rich
 in proportion.  It was an Aladdin's palace.  The treasures here, by
 simple weight, without counting workmanship, were valued at fifty
 millions of francs!  If I could get the custody of them for a while, I
 fear me the market price of silver bishops would advance shortly, on
 account of their exceeding scarcity in the Cathedral of Milan.
 
 The priests showed us two of St. Paul's fingers, and one of St. Peter's;
 a bone of Judas Iscariot, (it was black,) and also bones of all the other
 disciples; a handkerchief in which the Saviour had left the impression of
 his face.  Among the most precious of the relics were a stone from the
 Holy Sepulchre, part of the crown of thorns, (they have a whole one at
 Notre Dame,) a fragment of the purple robe worn by the Saviour, a nail
 from the Cross, and a picture of the Virgin and Child painted by the
--**--**--
 I remonstrated against the sending of this note, because it was so mixed
 up that the landlord would never be able to make head or tail of it; but
 Blucher said he guessed the old man could read the French of it and
 average the rest.
 
 Blucher's French is bad enough, but it is not much worse than the English
 one finds in advertisements all over Italy every day.  For instance,
 observe the printed card of the hotel we shall probably stop at on the
 shores of Lake Como:
 
      "NOTISH."
 
      "This hotel which the best it is in Italy and most superb, is
      handsome locate on the best situation of the lake, with the most
      splendid view near the Villas Melzy, to the King of Belgian, and
      Serbelloni.  This hotel have recently enlarge, do offer all
      commodities on moderate price, at the strangers gentlemen who whish
      spend the seasons on the Lake Come."
 
 How is that, for a specimen?  In the hotel is a handsome little chapel
 where an English clergyman is employed to preach to such of the guests of
 the house as hail from England and America, and this fact is also set
 forth in barbarous English in the same advertisement.  Wouldn't you have
 supposed that the adventurous linguist who framed the card would have
 known enough to submit it to that clergyman before he sent it to the
 printer?
 
 Here in Milan, in an ancient tumble-down ruin of a church, is the
 mournful wreck of the most celebrated painting in the world--"The Last
 Supper," by Leonardo da Vinci.  We are not infallible judges of pictures,
 but of course we went there to see this wonderful painting, once so
 beautiful, always so worshipped by masters in art, and forever to be
 famous in song and story.  And the first thing that occurred was the
--**--**--
 mountains is here, but the lake itself is not a basin.  It is as crooked
 as any brook, and only from one-quarter to two-thirds as wide as the
 Mississippi.  There is not a yard of low ground on either side of it
 --nothing but endless chains of mountains that spring abruptly from the
 water's edge and tower to altitudes varying from a thousand to two
 thousand feet.  Their craggy sides are clothed with vegetation, and white
 specks of houses peep out from the luxuriant foliage everywhere; they are
 even perched upon jutting and picturesque pinnacles a thousand feet above
 your head.
 
 Again, for miles along the shores, handsome country seats, surrounded by
 gardens and groves, sit fairly in the water, sometimes in nooks carved by
 Nature out of the vine-hung precipices, and with no ingress or egress
 save by boats.  Some have great broad stone staircases leading down to
 the water, with heavy stone balustrades ornamented with statuary and
 fancifully adorned with creeping vines and bright-colored flowers--for
 all the world like a drop curtain in a theatre, and lacking nothing but
 long-waisted, high-heeled women and plumed gallants in silken tights
 coming down to go serenading in the splendid gondola in waiting.
 
 A great feature of Como's attractiveness is the multitude of pretty
 houses and gardens that cluster upon its shores and on its mountain
 sides.  They look so snug and so homelike, and at eventide when every
 thing seems to slumber, and the music of the vesper bells comes stealing
 over the water, one almost believes that nowhere else than on the lake of
 Como can there be found such a paradise of tranquil repose.
 
 From my window here in Bellaggio, I have a view of the other side of the
 lake now, which is as beautiful as a picture.  A scarred and wrinkled
--**--**--
                               * * * * * * *
 
 Forty-two years waxed and waned; the good fight was won; Godfrey reigned
 in Jerusalem--the Christian hosts reared the banner of the cross above
 the Holy Sepulchre!
 
 Twilight was approaching.  Fifty harlequins, in flowing robes, approached
 this castle wearily, for they were on foot, and the dust upon their
 garments betokened that they had traveled far.  They overtook a peasant,
 and asked him if it were likely they could get food and a hospitable bed
 there, for love of Christian charity, and if perchance, a moral parlor
 entertainment might meet with generous countenance--"for," said they,
 "this exhibition hath no feature that could offend the most fastidious
 taste."
 
 "Marry," quoth the peasant, "an' it please your worships, ye had better
 journey many a good rood hence with your juggling circus than trust your
 bones in yonder castle."
 
 "How now, sirrah!"  exclaimed the chief monk, "explain thy ribald speech,
 or by'r Lady it shall go hard with thee."
 
 "Peace, good mountebank, I did but utter the truth that was in my heart.
 San Paolo be my witness that did ye but find the stout Count Leonardo in
 his cups, sheer from the castle's topmost battlements would he hurl ye
 all!  Alack-a-day, the good Lord Luigi reigns not here in these sad
 times."
 
 "The good Lord Luigi?"
 
 "Aye, none other, please your worship.  In his day, the poor rejoiced in
 plenty and the rich he did oppress; taxes were not known, the fathers of
 the church waxed fat upon his bounty; travelers went and came, with none
 to interfere; and whosoever would, might tarry in his halls in cordial
 welcome, and eat his bread and drink his wine, withal.  But woe is me!
 some two and forty years agone the good count rode hence to fight for
--**--**--
 ye crave."
 
 "Dread lord and mighty, crowded audiences have greeted our humble efforts
 with rapturous applause.  Among our body count we the versatile and
 talented Ugolino; the justly celebrated Rodolpho; the gifted and
 accomplished Roderigo; the management have spared neither pains nor
 expense--"
 
 "S'death!  What can ye do?  Curb thy prating tongue."
 
 "Good my lord, in acrobatic feats, in practice with the dumb-bells, in
 balancing and ground and lofty tumbling are we versed--and sith your
 highness asketh me, I venture here to publish that in the truly marvelous
 and entertaining Zampillaerostation--"
 
 "Gag him! throttle him!  Body of Bacchus! am I a dog that I am to be
 assailed with polysyllabled blasphemy like to this?  But hold!  Lucretia,
 Isabel, stand forth!  Sirrah, behold this dame, this weeping wench.  The
 first I marry, within the hour; the other shall dry her tears or feed the
 vultures.  Thou and thy vagabonds shall crown the wedding with thy
 merry-makings.  Fetch hither the priest!"
 
 The dame sprang toward the chief player.
 
 "O, save me!"  she cried; "save me from a fate far worse than death!
 Behold these sad eyes, these sunken cheeks, this withered frame!  See
 thou the wreck this fiend hath made, and let thy heart be moved with
 pity!  Look upon this damosel; note her wasted form, her halting step,
 her bloomless cheeks where youth should blush and happiness exult in
 smiles!  Hear us and have compassion.  This monster was my husband's
 brother.  He who should have been our shield against all harm, hath kept
 us shut within the noisome caverns of his donjon-keep for lo these thirty
 years.  And for what crime?  None other than that I would not belie my
 troth, root out my strong love for him who marches with the legions of
 the cross in Holy Land, (for O, he is not dead!) and wed with him!  Save
--**--**--
 
 The table around which they had sat was there still, and likewise the
 stations where the masked inquisitors and executioners formerly stood,
 frozen, upright and silent, till they received a bloody order, and then,
 without a word, moved off like the inexorable machines they were, to
 carry it out.  The frescoes on the walls were startlingly suited to the
 place.  In all the other saloons, the halls, the great state chambers of
 the palace, the walls and ceilings were bright with gilding, rich with
 elaborate carving, and resplendent with gallant pictures of Venetian
 victories in war, and Venetian display in foreign courts, and hallowed
 with portraits of the Virgin, the Saviour of men, and the holy saints
 that preached the Gospel of Peace upon earth--but here, in dismal
 contrast, were none but pictures of death and dreadful suffering!--not a
 living figure but was writhing in torture, not a dead one but was smeared
 with blood, gashed with wounds, and distorted with the agonies that had
 taken away its life!
 
 From the palace to the gloomy prison is but a step--one might almost jump
 across the narrow canal that intervenes.  The ponderous stone Bridge of
 Sighs crosses it at the second story--a bridge that is a covered tunnel
 --you can not be seen when you walk in it.  It is partitioned lengthwise,
 and through one compartment walked such as bore light sentences in
 ancient times, and through the other marched sadly the wretches whom the
 Three had doomed to lingering misery and utter oblivion in the dungeons,
 or to sudden and mysterious death.  Down below the level of the water, by
 the light of smoking torches, we were shown the damp, thick-walled cells
 where many a proud patrician's life was eaten away by the long-drawn
 miseries of solitary imprisonment--without light, air, books; naked,
--**--**--
 altogether the scene is as bright and spirited and full of cheerfulness
 as any man could desire.  We enjoy it thoroughly.  Very many of the young
 women are exceedingly pretty and dress with rare good taste.  We are
 gradually and laboriously learning the ill-manners of staring them
 unflinchingly in the face--not because such conduct is agreeable to us,
 but because it is the custom of the country and they say the girls like
 it.  We wish to learn all the curious, outlandish ways of all the
 different countries, so that we can "show off" and astonish people when
 we get home.  We wish to excite the envy of our untraveled friends with
 our strange foreign fashions which we can't shake off.  All our
 passengers are paying strict attention to this thing, with the end in
 view which I have mentioned.  The gentle reader will never, never know
 what a consummate ass he can become, until he goes abroad.  I speak now,
 of course, in the supposition that the gentle reader has not been abroad,
 and therefore is not already a consummate ass.  If the case be otherwise,
 I beg his pardon and extend to him the cordial hand of fellowship and
 call him brother.  I shall always delight to meet an ass after my own
 heart when I shall have finished my travels.
 
 On this subject let me remark that there are Americans abroad in Italy
 who have actually forgotten their mother tongue in three months--forgot
 it in France.  They can not even write their address in English in a
 hotel register.  I append these evidences, which I copied verbatim from
 the register of a hotel in a certain Italian city:
 
      "John P. Whitcomb, Etats Unis.
 
      "Wm. L. Ainsworth, travailleur (he meant traveler, I suppose,)
       Etats Unis.
 
      "George P. Morton et fils, d'Amerique.
--**--**--
 them like our cultivated countrymen from Amerique.
 
 Now it does give me real pain to speak in this almost unappreciative way
 of the old masters and their martyrs, because good friends of mine in the
 ship--friends who do thoroughly and conscientiously appreciate them and
 are in every way competent to discriminate between good pictures and
 inferior ones--have urged me for my own sake not to make public the fact
 that I lack this appreciation and this critical discrimination myself.  I
 believe that what I have written and may still write about pictures will
 give them pain, and I am honestly sorry for it.  I even promised that I
 would hide my uncouth sentiments in my own breast.  But alas!  I never
 could keep a promise.  I do not blame myself for this weakness, because
 the fault must lie in my physical organization.  It is likely that such a
 very liberal amount of space was given to the organ which enables me to
 make promises, that the organ which should enable me to keep them was
 crowded out.  But I grieve not.  I like no half-way things.  I had rather
 have one faculty nobly developed than two faculties of mere ordinary
 capacity.  I certainly meant to keep that promise, but I find I can not
 do it.  It is impossible to travel through Italy without speaking of
 pictures, and can I see them through others' eyes?
 
 If I did not so delight in the grand pictures that are spread before me
 every day of my life by that monarch of all the old masters, Nature, I
 should come to believe, sometimes, that I had in me no appreciation of
 the beautiful, whatsoever.
 
 It seems to me that whenever I glory to think that for once I have
 discovered an ancient painting that is beautiful and worthy of all
--**--**--
 
 "Doctor, it is perfect luxury.  The ship's barber isn't any thing to
 him."
 
 My rough beard wee distressing me beyond measure.  The barber was rolling
 up his apparatus.  The temptation was too strong.  I said:
 
 "Hold on, please.  Shave me also."
 
 I sat down in the chair and closed my eyes.  The barber soaped my face,
 and then took his razor and gave me a rake that well nigh threw me into
 convulsions.  I jumped out of the chair: Dan and the doctor were both
 wiping blood off their faces and laughing.
 
 I said it was a mean, disgraceful fraud.
 
 They said that the misery of this shave had gone so far beyond any thing
 they had ever experienced before, that they could not bear the idea of
 losing such a chance of hearing a cordial opinion from me on the subject.
 
 It was shameful.  But there was no help for it.  The skinning was begun
 and had to be finished.  The tears flowed with every rake, and so did the
 fervent execrations.  The barber grew confused, and brought blood every
 time.  I think the boys enjoyed it better than any thing they have seen
 or heard since they left home.
 
 We have seen the Campanile, and Byron's house and Balbi's the geographer,
 and the palaces of all the ancient dukes and doges of Venice, and we have
 seen their effeminate descendants airing their nobility in fashionable
 French attire in the Grand Square of St. Mark, and eating ices and
 drinking cheap wines, instead of wearing gallant coats of mail and
 destroying fleets and armies as their great ancestors did in the days of
 Venetian glory.  We have seen no bravoes with poisoned stilettos, no
 masks, no wild carnival; but we have seen the ancient pride of Venice,
 the grim Bronze Horses that figure in a thousand legends.  Venice may
--**--**--
 commercial prosperity and the political importance that made it a
 necessity, or rather a possibility.  Surrounded by poverty, decay and
 ruin, it conveys to us a more tangible impression of the former greatness
 of Pisa than books could give us.
 
 The Baptistery, which is a few years older than the Leaning Tower, is a
 stately rotunda, of huge dimensions, and was a costly structure.  In it
 hangs the lamp whose measured swing suggested to Galileo the pendulum.
 It looked an insignificant thing to have conferred upon the world of
 science and mechanics such a mighty extension of their dominions as it
 has.  Pondering, in its suggestive presence, I seemed to see a crazy
 universe of swinging disks, the toiling children of this sedate parent.
 He appeared to have an intelligent expression about him of knowing that
 he was not a lamp at all; that he was a Pendulum; a pendulum disguised,
 for prodigious and inscrutable purposes of his own deep devising, and not
 a common pendulum either, but the old original patriarchal Pendulum--the
 Abraham Pendulum of the world.
 
 This Baptistery is endowed with the most pleasing echo of all the echoes
 we have read of.  The guide sounded two sonorous notes, about half an
 octave apart; the echo answered with the most enchanting, the most
 melodious, the richest blending of sweet sounds that one can imagine.  It
 was like a long-drawn chord of a church organ, infinitely softened by
 distance.  I may be extravagant in this matter, but if this be the case
 my ear is to blame--not my pen.  I am describing a memory--and one that
 will remain long with me.
 
 The peculiar devotional spirit of the olden time, which placed a higher
 confidence in outward forms of worship than in the watchful guarding of
 the heart against sinful thoughts and the hands against sinful deeds, and
--**--**--
 years!  It was a rare good fortune for Italy, the stress of weather that
 drove her to break from this prison-house.
 
 They do not call it confiscating the church property.  That would sound
 too harshly yet.  But it amounts to that.  There are thousands of
 churches in Italy, each with untold millions of treasures stored away in
 its closets, and each with its battalion of priests to be supported.
 And then there are the estates of the Church--league on league of the
 richest lands and the noblest forests in all Italy--all yielding immense
 revenues to the Church, and none paying a cent in taxes to the State.
 In some great districts the Church owns all the property--lands,
 watercourses, woods, mills and factories.  They buy, they sell, they
 manufacture, and since they pay no taxes, who can hope to compete with
 them?
 
 Well, the Government has seized all this in effect, and will yet seize it
 in rigid and unpoetical reality, no doubt.  Something must be done to
 feed a starving treasury, and there is no other resource in all Italy
 --none but the riches of the Church.  So the Government intends to take to
 itself a great portion of the revenues arising from priestly farms,
 factories, etc., and also intends to take possession of the churches and
 carry them on, after its own fashion and upon its own responsibility.
 In a few instances it will leave the establishments of great pet churches
 undisturbed, but in all others only a handful of priests will be retained
 to preach and pray, a few will be pensioned, and the balance turned
 adrift.
 
 Pray glance at some of these churches and their embellishments, and see
 whether the Government is doing a righteous thing or not.  In Venice,
 today, a city of a hundred thousand inhabitants, there are twelve hundred
--**--**--
 which are ridiculous in pattern and can stand no wear.  Yet dressed in
 this fantastic garb, these people laughed at my costume.  In that
 country, books are so common that it is really no curiosity to see one.
 Newspapers also.  They have a great machine which prints such things by
 thousands every hour.
 
 "I saw common men, there--men who were neither priests nor princes--who
 yet absolutely owned the land they tilled.  It was not rented from the
 church, nor from the nobles.  I am ready to take my oath of this.  In
 that country you might fall from a third story window three several
 times, and not mash either a soldier or a priest.--The scarcity of such
 people is astonishing.  In the cities you will see a dozen civilians for
 every soldier, and as many for every priest or preacher.  Jews, there,
 are treated just like human beings, instead of dogs.  They can work at
 any business they please; they can sell brand new goods if they want to;
 they can keep drug-stores; they can practice medicine among Christians;
 they can even shake hands with Christians if they choose; they can
 associate with them, just the same as one human being does with another
 human being; they don't have to stay shut up in one corner of the towns;
 they can live in any part of a town they like best; it is said they even
 have the privilege of buying land and houses, and owning them themselves,
 though I doubt that, myself; they never have had to run races naked
 through the public streets, against jackasses, to please the people in
 carnival time; there they never have been driven by the soldiers into a
 church every Sunday for hundreds of years to hear themselves and their
 religion especially and particularly cursed; at this very day, in that
--**--**--
 that he might baptize them.  But when they showed us the print of Peter's
 face in the hard stone of the prison wall and said he made that by
 falling up against it, we doubted.  And when, also, the monk at the
 church of San Sebastian showed us a paving-stone with two great
 footprints in it and said that Peter's feet made those, we lacked
 confidence again.  Such things do not impress one.  The monk said that
 angels came and liberated Peter from prison by night, and he started away
 from Rome by the Appian Way.  The Saviour met him and told him to go
 back, which he did.  Peter left those footprints in the stone upon which
 he stood at the time.  It was not stated how it was ever discovered whose
 footprints they were, seeing the interview occurred secretly and at
 night.  The print of the face in the prison was that of a man of common
 size; the footprints were those of a man ten or twelve feet high.  The
 discrepancy confirmed our unbelief.
 
 We necessarily visited the Forum, where Caesar was assassinated, and also
 the Tarpeian Rock.  We saw the Dying Gladiator at the Capitol, and I
 think that even we appreciated that wonder of art; as much, perhaps, as
 we did that fearful story wrought in marble, in the Vatican--the Laocoon.
 And then the Coliseum.
 
 Every body knows the picture of the Coliseum; every body recognizes at
 once that "looped and windowed" band-box with a side bitten out.  Being
 rather isolated, it shows to better advantage than any other of the
 monuments of ancient Rome.  Even the beautiful Pantheon, whose pagan
 altars uphold the cross, now, and whose Venus, tricked out in consecrated
 gimcracks, does reluctant duty as a Virgin Mary to-day, is built about
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER XXVII.
 
 So far, good.  If any man has a right to feel proud of himself, and
 satisfied, surely it is I.  For I have written about the Coliseum, and
 the gladiators, the martyrs, and the lions, and yet have never once used
 the phrase "butchered to make a Roman holiday."  I am the only free white
 man of mature age, who has accomplished this since Byron originated the
 expression.
 
 Butchered to make a Roman holiday sounds well for the first seventeen or
 eighteen hundred thousand times one sees it in print, but after that it
 begins to grow tiresome.  I find it in all the books concerning Rome--and
 here latterly it reminds me of Judge Oliver.  Oliver was a young lawyer,
 fresh from the schools, who had gone out to the deserts of Nevada to
 begin life.  He found that country, and our ways of life, there, in those
 early days, different from life in New England or Paris.  But he put on a
 woollen shirt and strapped a navy revolver to his person, took to the
 bacon and beans of the country, and determined to do in Nevada as Nevada
 did.  Oliver accepted the situation so completely that although he must
 have sorrowed over many of his trials, he never complained--that is, he
 never complained but once.  He, two others, and myself, started to the
 new silver mines in the Humboldt mountains--he to be Probate Judge of
 Humboldt county, and we to mine.  The distance was two hundred miles.  It
 was dead of winter.  We bought a two-horse wagon and put eighteen hundred
 pounds of bacon, flour, beans, blasting-powder, picks and shovels in it;
 we bought two sorry-looking Mexican "plugs," with the hair turned the
 wrong way and more corners on their bodies than there are on the mosque
--**--**--
 --especially a new guide.  Our Roman Ferguson is the most patient,
 unsuspecting, long-suffering subject we have had yet.  We shall be sorry
 to part with him.  We have enjoyed his society very much.  We trust he
 has enjoyed ours, but we are harassed with doubts.
 
 We have been in the catacombs.  It was like going down into a very deep
 cellar, only it was a cellar which had no end to it.  The narrow passages
 are roughly hewn in the rock, and on each hand as you pass along, the
 hollowed shelves are carved out, from three to fourteen deep; each held a
 corpse once.  There are names, and Christian symbols, and prayers, or
 sentences expressive of Christian hopes, carved upon nearly every
 sarcophagus.  The dates belong away back in the dawn of the Christian
 era, of course.  Here, in these holes in the ground, the first Christians
 sometimes burrowed to escape persecution.  They crawled out at night to
 get food, but remained under cover in the day time.  The priest told us
 that St. Sebastian lived under ground for some time while he was being
 hunted; he went out one day, and the soldiery discovered and shot him to
 death with arrows.  Five or six of the early Popes--those who reigned
 about sixteen hundred years ago--held their papal courts and advised with
 their clergy in the bowels of the earth.  During seventeen years--from
 A.D. 235 to A.D. 252--the Popes did not appear above ground.  Four were
 raised to the great office during that period.  Four years apiece, or
 thereabouts.  It is very suggestive of the unhealthiness of underground
 graveyards as places of residence.  One Pope afterward spent his entire
 pontificate in the catacombs--eight years.  Another was discovered in
 them and murdered in the episcopal chair.  There was no satisfaction in
--**--**--
      are still preserved in a glass case, and after two centuries the
      heart is still whole.  When the French troops came to Rome, and when
      Pius VII. was carried away prisoner, blood dropped from it."
 
 To read that in a book written by a monk far back in the Middle Ages,
 would surprise no one; it would sound natural and proper; but when it is
 seriously stated in the middle of the nineteenth century, by a man of
 finished education, an LL.D., M. A., and an Archaeological magnate, it
 sounds strangely enough.  Still, I would gladly change my unbelief for
 Neligan's faith, and let him make the conditions as hard as he pleased.
 
 The old gentleman's undoubting, unquestioning simplicity has a rare
 freshness about it in these matter-of-fact railroading and telegraphing
 days.  Hear him, concerning the church of Ara Coeli:
 
      "In the roof of the church, directly above the high altar, is
      engraved, 'Regina Coeli laetare Alleluia.'  In the sixth century
      Rome was visited by a fearful pestilence.  Gregory the Great urged
      the people to do penance, and a general procession was formed.  It
      was to proceed from Ara Coeli to St. Peter's.  As it passed before
      the mole of Adrian, now the Castle of St. Angelo, the sound of
      heavenly voices was heard singing (it was Easter morn,) 'Regina
      Coeli, laetare! alleluia! quia quem meruisti portare, alleluia!
      resurrexit sicut dixit; alleluia!'  The Pontiff, carrying in his
      hands the portrait of the Virgin, (which is over the high altar and
      is said to have been painted by St. Luke,) answered, with the
      astonished people, 'Ora pro nobis Deum, alleluia!'  At the same time
      an angel was seen to put up a sword in a scabbard, and the
      pestilence ceased on the same day.  There are four circumstances
      which 'CONFIRM'--[The italics are mine--M. T.]--this miracle: the
--**--**--
 our frames whose functions and whose methods of working it seems a sort
 of sacrilege to describe by cold physiological names and surgical
 technicalities, and the monk's talk suggested to me something of this
 kind.  Fancy a surgeon, with his nippers lifting tendons, muscles and
 such things into view, out of the complex machinery of a corpse, and
 observing, "Now this little nerve quivers--the vibration is imparted to
 this muscle--from here it is passed to this fibrous substance; here its
 ingredients are separated by the chemical action of the blood--one part
 goes to the heart and thrills it with what is popularly termed emotion,
 another part follows this nerve to the brain and communicates
 intelligence of a startling character--the third part glides along this
 passage and touches the spring connected with the fluid receptacles that
 lie in the rear of the eye.  Thus, by this simple and beautiful process,
 the party is informed that his mother is dead, and he weeps."  Horrible!
 
 I asked the monk if all the brethren up stairs expected to be put in this
 place when they died.  He answered quietly:
 
 "We must all lie here at last."
 
 See what one can accustom himself to.--The reflection that he must some
 day be taken apart like an engine or a clock, or like a house whose owner
 is gone, and worked up into arches and pyramids and hideous frescoes, did
 not distress this monk in the least.  I thought he even looked as if he
 were thinking, with complacent vanity, that his own skull would look well
 on top of the heap and his own ribs add a charm to the frescoes which
 possibly they lacked at present.
 
 Here and there, in ornamental alcoves, stretched upon beds of bones, lay
 dead and dried-up monks, with lank frames dressed in the black robes one
--**--**--
 that is worth a fortune; when a man digs up an ancient statue in the
 Campagna, the Pope gives him a fortune in gold coin.  We can make
 something of a guess at a man's character by the style of nose he carries
 on his face.  The Vatican and the Patent Office are governmental noses,
 and they bear a deal of character about them.
 
 The guide showed us a colossal statue of Jupiter, in the Vatican, which
 he said looked so damaged and rusty--so like the God of the Vagabonds
 --because it had but recently been dug up in the Campagna.  He asked how
 much we supposed this Jupiter was worth?  I replied, with intelligent
 promptness, that he was probably worth about four dollars--may be four
 and a half.  "A hundred thousand dollars!"  Ferguson said.  Ferguson
 said, further, that the Pope permits no ancient work of this kind to
 leave his dominions.  He appoints a commission to examine discoveries
 like this and report upon the value; then the Pope pays the discoverer
 one-half of that assessed value and takes the statue.  He said this
 Jupiter was dug from a field which had just been bought for thirty-six
 thousand dollars, so the first crop was a good one for the new farmer.
 I do not know whether Ferguson always tells the truth or not, but I
 suppose he does.  I know that an exorbitant export duty is exacted upon
 all pictures painted by the old masters, in order to discourage the sale
 of those in the private collections.  I am satisfied, also, that genuine
 old masters hardly exist at all, in America, because the cheapest and
 most insignificant of them are valued at the price of a fine farm.  I
 proposed to buy a small trifle of a Raphael, myself, but the price of it
--**--**--
 their names on forever and forevermore.
 
 But the surest way to stop writing about Rome is to stop.  I wished to
 write a real "guide-book" chapter on this fascinating city, but I could
 not do it, because I have felt all the time like a boy in a candy-shop
 --there was every thing to choose from, and yet no choice.  I have drifted
 along hopelessly for a hundred pages of manuscript without knowing where
 to commence.  I will not commence at all.  Our passports have been
 examined.  We will go to Naples.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIX.
 
 The ship is lying here in the harbor of Naples--quarantined.  She has
 been here several days and will remain several more.  We that came by
 rail from Rome have escaped this misfortune.  Of course no one is allowed
 to go on board the ship, or come ashore from her.  She is a prison, now.
 The passengers probably spend the long, blazing days looking out from
 under the awnings at Vesuvius and the beautiful city--and in swearing.
 Think of ten days of this sort of pastime!--We go out every day in a boat
 and request them to come ashore.  It soothes them.  We lie ten steps from
 the ship and tell them how splendid the city is; and how much better the
 hotel fare is here than any where else in Europe; and how cool it is; and
 what frozen continents of ice cream there are; and what a time we are
 having cavorting about the country and sailing to the islands in the Bay.
 This tranquilizes them.
 
                            ASCENT OF VESUVIUS.
 
 I shall remember our trip to Vesuvius for many a day--partly because of
 its sight-seeing experiences, but chiefly on account of the fatigue of
 the journey.  Two or three of us had been resting ourselves among the
--**--**--
 And, speaking of wages, reminds me of prices of merchandise.  In Paris
 you pay twelve dollars a dozen for Jouvin's best kid gloves; gloves of
 about as good quality sell here at three or four dollars a dozen.  You
 pay five and six dollars apiece for fine linen shirts in Paris; here and
 in Leghorn you pay two and a half.  In Marseilles you pay forty dollars
 for a first-class dress coat made by a good tailor, but in Leghorn you
 can get a full dress suit for the same money.  Here you get handsome
 business suits at from ten to twenty dollars, and in Leghorn you can get
 an overcoat for fifteen dollars that would cost you seventy in New York.
 Fine kid boots are worth eight dollars in Marseilles and four dollars
 here.  Lyons velvets rank higher in America than those of Genoa.  Yet the
 bulk of Lyons velvets you buy in the States are made in Genoa and
 imported into Lyons, where they receive the Lyons stamp and are then
 exported to America.  You can buy enough velvet in Genoa for twenty-five
 dollars to make a five hundred dollar cloak in New York--so the ladies
 tell me.  Of course these things bring me back, by a natural and easy
 transition, to the
 
                      ASCENT OF VESUVIUS--CONTINUED.
 
 And thus the wonderful Blue Grotto is suggested to me.  It is situated on
 the Island of Capri, twenty-two miles from Naples.  We chartered a little
 steamer and went out there.  Of course, the police boarded us and put us
 through a health examination, and inquired into our politics, before they
 would let us land.  The airs these little insect Governments put on are
 in the last degree ridiculous.  They even put a policeman on board of our
 boat to keep an eye on us as long as we were in the Capri dominions.
--**--**--
 
                                THE DESCENT.
 
 The descent of the mountain was a labor of only four minutes.  Instead of
 stalking down the rugged path we ascended, we chose one which was bedded
 knee-deep in loose ashes, and ploughed our way with prodigious strides
 that would almost have shamed the performance of him of the seven-league
 boots.
 
 The Vesuvius of today is a very poor affair compared to the mighty
 volcano of Kilauea, in the Sandwich Islands, but I am glad I visited it.
 It was well worth it.
 
 It is said that during one of the grand eruptions of Vesuvius it
 discharged massy rocks weighing many tons a thousand feet into the air,
 its vast jets of smoke and steam ascended thirty miles toward the
 firmament, and clouds of its ashes were wafted abroad and fell upon the
 decks of ships seven hundred and fifty miles at sea!  I will take the
 ashes at a moderate discount, if any one will take the thirty miles of
 smoke, but I do not feel able to take a commanding interest in the whole
 story by myself.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXI.
 
                         THE BURIED CITY OF POMPEII
 
 They pronounce it Pom-pay-e.  I always had an idea that you went down
 into Pompeii with torches, by the way of damp, dark stairways, just as
 you do in silver mines, and traversed gloomy tunnels with lava overhead
 and something on either hand like dilapidated prisons gouged out of the
 solid earth, that faintly resembled houses.  But you do nothing the kind.
 Fully one-half of the buried city, perhaps, is completely exhumed and
 thrown open freely to the light of day; and there stand the long rows of
 solidly-built brick houses (roofless) just as they stood eighteen hundred
 years ago, hot with the flaming sun; and there lie their floors,
 clean-swept, and not a bright fragment tarnished or waiting of the
--**--**--
 because circumstances compelled him to leave in such a hurry.
 
 In one house (the only building in Pompeii which no woman is now allowed
 to enter,) were the small rooms and short beds of solid masonry, just as
 they were in the old times, and on the walls were pictures which looked
 almost as fresh as if they were painted yesterday, but which no pen could
 have the hardihood to describe; and here and there were Latin
 inscriptions--obscene scintillations of wit, scratched by hands that
 possibly were uplifted to Heaven for succor in the midst of a driving
 storm of fire before the night was done.
 
 In one of the principal streets was a ponderous stone tank, and a
 water-spout that supplied it, and where the tired, heated toilers from the
 Campagna used to rest their right hands when they bent over to put their
 lips to the spout, the thick stone was worn down to a broad groove an
 inch or two deep.  Think of the countless thousands of hands that had
 pressed that spot in the ages that are gone, to so reduce a stone that
 is as hard as iron!
 
 They had a great public bulletin board in Pompeii--a place where
 announcements for gladiatorial combats, elections, and such things, were
 posted--not on perishable paper, but carved in enduring stone.  One lady,
 who, I take it, was rich and well brought up, advertised a dwelling or so
 to rent, with baths and all the modern improvements, and several hundred
 shops, stipulating that the dwellings should not be put to immoral
 purposes.  You can find out who lived in many a house in Pompeii by the
 carved stone door-plates affixed to them: and in the same way you can
 tell who they were that occupy the tombs.  Every where around are things
--**--**--
 We followed it.  It was broad, and smooth, and white--handsome and in
 perfect repair, and shaded on both sides for a mile or so with single
 ranks of trees, and also with luxuriant vineyards.  Twice we entered and
 stole grapes, and the second time somebody shouted at us from some
 invisible place.  Whereupon we left again.  We speculated in grapes no
 more on that side of Athens.
 
 Shortly we came upon an ancient stone aqueduct, built upon arches, and
 from that time forth we had ruins all about us--we were approaching our
 journey's end.  We could not see the Acropolis now or the high hill,
 either, and I wanted to follow the road till we were abreast of them, but
 the others overruled me, and we toiled laboriously up the stony hill
 immediately in our front--and from its summit saw another--climbed it and
 saw another!  It was an hour of exhausting work.  Soon we came upon a row
 of open graves, cut in the solid rock--(for a while one of them served
 Socrates for a prison)--we passed around the shoulder of the hill, and
 the citadel, in all its ruined magnificence, burst upon us!  We hurried
 across the ravine and up a winding road, and stood on the old Acropolis,
 with the prodigious walls of the citadel towering above our heads.  We
 did not stop to inspect their massive blocks of marble, or measure their
 height, or guess at their extraordinary thickness, but passed at once
 through a great arched passage like a railway tunnel, and went straight
 to the gate that leads to the ancient temples.  It was locked!  So, after
 all, it seemed that we were not to see the great Parthenon face to face.
 We sat down and held a council of war.  Result: the gate was only a
--**--**--
 the gossip-loving Athenians.  We climbed the stone steps St. Paul
 ascended, and stood in the square-cut place he stood in, and tried to
 recollect the Bible account of the matter--but for certain reasons, I
 could not recall the words.  I have found them since:
 
      "Now while Paul waited for them at Athens, his spirit was stirred in
      him, when he saw the city wholly given up to idolatry.  Therefore
      disputed he in the synagogue with the Jews, and with the devout
      persons, and in the market daily with them that met with him.
                          * * * * * * * * *
      "And they took him and brought him unto Areopagus, saying, May we
      know what this new doctrine whereof thou speakest is?
                          * * * * * * * * *
      "Then Paul stood in the midst of Mars hill, and said, Ye men of
      Athens, I perceive that in all things ye are too superstitious; For
      as I passed by and beheld your devotions, I found an altar with this
      inscription: To THE UNKNOWN GOD.  Whom, therefore, ye ignorantly
      worship, him declare I unto you."--Acts, ch. xvii."
 
 It occurred to us, after a while, that if we wanted to get home before
 daylight betrayed us, we had better be moving.  So we hurried away.  When
 far on our road, we had a parting view of the Parthenon, with the
 moonlight streaming through its open colonnades and touching its capitals
 with silver.  As it looked then, solemn, grand, and beautiful it will
 always remain in our memories.
 
 As we marched along, we began to get over our fears, and ceased to care
 much about quarantine scouts or any body else.  We grew bold and
 reckless; and once, in a sudden burst of courage, I even threw a stone at
--**--**--
 
 Just as the earliest tinges of the dawn flushed the eastern sky and
 turned the pillared Parthenon to a broken harp hung in the pearly
 horizon, we closed our thirteenth mile of weary, round-about marching,
 and emerged upon the sea-shore abreast the ships, with our usual escort
 of fifteen hundred Piraean dogs howling at our heels.  We hailed a boat
 that was two or three hundred yards from shore, and discovered
 in a moment that it was a police-boat on the lookout for any
 quarantine-breakers that might chance to be abroad.  So we dodged--we
 were used to that by this time--and when the scouts reached the spot we
 had so lately occupied, we were absent.  They cruised along the shore,
 but in the wrong direction, and shortly our own boat issued from the
 gloom and took us aboard.  They had heard our signal on the ship.  We
 rowed noiselessly away, and before the police-boat came in sight again,
 we were safe at home once more.
 
 Four more of our passengers were anxious to visit Athens, and started
 half an hour after we returned; but they had not been ashore five minutes
 till the police discovered and chased them so hotly that they barely
 escaped to their boat again, and that was all.  They pursued the
 enterprise no further.
 
 We set sail for Constantinople to-day, but some of us little care for
 that.  We have seen all there was to see in the old city that had its
 birth sixteen hundred years before Christ was born, and was an old town
 before the foundations of Troy were laid--and saw it in its most
 attractive aspect.  Wherefore, why should we worry?
 
 Two other passengers ran the blockade successfully last night.  So we
 learned this morning.  They slipped away so quietly that they were not
--**--**--
 cheek-bones. In Stamboul was a man with a prodigious head, an uncommonly
 long body, legs eight inches long and feet like snow-shoes.  He traveled
 on those feet and his hands, and was as sway-backed as if the Colossus
 of Rhodes had been riding him.  Ah, a beggar has to have exceedingly
 good points to make a living in Constantinople.  A blue-faced man, who
 had nothing to offer except that he had been blown up in a mine, would
 be regarded as a rank impostor, and a mere damaged soldier on crutches
 would never make a cent.  It would pay him to get apiece of his head
 taken off, and cultivate a wen like a carpet sack.
 
 The Mosque of St. Sophia is the chief lion of Constantinople.  You must
 get a firman and hurry there the first thing.  We did that.  We did not
 get a firman, but we took along four or five francs apiece, which is much
 the same thing.
 
 I do not think much of the Mosque of St. Sophia.  I suppose I lack
 appreciation.  We will let it go at that.  It is the rustiest old barn in
 heathendom.  I believe all the interest that attaches to it comes from
 the fact that it was built for a Christian church and then turned into a
 mosque, without much alteration, by the Mohammedan conquerors of the
 land.  They made me take off my boots and walk into the place in my
 stocking-feet.  I caught cold, and got myself so stuck up with a
 complication of gums, slime and general corruption, that I wore out more
 than two thousand pair of boot-jacks getting my boots off that night, and
 even then some Christian hide peeled off with them.  I abate not a single
 boot-jack.
 
 St. Sophia is a colossal church, thirteen or fourteen hundred years old,
--**--**--
      "Sales of one lot Circassians, prime to good, 1852 to 1854, at L240
      @ 242, buyer 30; one forty-niner--damaged--at L23, seller ten, no
      deposit.  Several Georgians, fancy brands, 1852, changed hands to
      fill orders.  The Georgians now on hand are mostly last year's crop,
      which was unusually poor.  The new crop is a little backward, but
      will be coming in shortly.  As regards its quantity and quality, the
      accounts are most encouraging.  In this connection we can safely
      say, also, that the new crop of Circassians is looking extremely
      well.  His Majesty the Sultan has already sent in large orders for
      his new harem, which will be finished within a fortnight, and this
      has naturally strengthened the market and given Circassian stock a
      strong upward tendency.  Taking advantage of the inflated market,
      many of our shrewdest operators are selling short.  There are hints
      of a 'corner' on Wallachians.
 
      "There is nothing new in Nubians.  Slow sale.
 
      "Eunuchs--None offering; however, large cargoes are expected from
      Egypt today."
 
 
 I think the above would be about the style of the commercial report.
 Prices are pretty high now, and holders firm; but, two or three years
 ago, parents in a starving condition brought their young daughters down
 here and sold them for even twenty and thirty dollars, when they could do
 no better, simply to save themselves and the girls from dying of want.
 It is sad to think of so distressing a thing as this, and I for one am
 sincerely glad the prices are up again.
 
 Commercial morals, especially, are bad.  There is no gainsaying that.
 Greek, Turkish and Armenian morals consist only in attending church
 regularly on the appointed Sabbaths, and in breaking the ten commandments
 all the balance of the week.  It comes natural to them to lie and cheat
--**--**--
 just as he was, speechless and motionless, till time had told a hundred
 years!
 
 It was curious to see newsboys selling papers in so dreamy a land as
 that.  And, to say truly, it is comparatively a new thing here.  The
 selling of newspapers had its birth in Constantinople about a year ago,
 and was a child of the Prussian and Austrian war.
 
 There is one paper published here in the English language--The Levant
 Herald--and there are generally a number of Greek and a few French papers
 rising and falling, struggling up and falling again.  Newspapers are not
 popular with the Sultan's Government.  They do not understand journalism.
 The proverb says, "The unknown is always great."  To the court, the
 newspaper is a mysterious and rascally institution.  They know what a
 pestilence is, because they have one occasionally that thins the people
 out at the rate of two thousand a day, and they regard a newspaper as a
 mild form of pestilence.  When it goes astray, they suppress it--pounce
 upon it without warning, and throttle it.  When it don't go astray for a
 long time, they get suspicious and throttle it anyhow, because they think
 it is hatching deviltry.  Imagine the Grand Vizier in solemn council with
 the magnates of the realm, spelling his way through the hated newspaper,
 and finally delivering his profound decision: "This thing means mischief
 --it is too darkly, too suspiciously inoffensive--suppress it!  Warn the
 publisher that we can not have this sort of thing: put the editor in
 prison!"
 
 The newspaper business has its inconveniences in Constantinople.  Two
 Greek papers and one French one were suppressed here within a few days of
 each other.  No victories of the Cretans are allowed to be printed.  From
 time to time the Grand Vizier sends a notice to the various editors that
--**--**--
 vestments, and all manner of curious things they can never have any use
 for.  Murray's invaluable guide-books have mentioned 'Far-away Moses'
 name, and he is a made man.  He rejoices daily in the fact that he is a
 recognized celebrity.  However, we can not alter our established customs
 to please the whims of guides; we can not show partialities this late in
 the day.  Therefore, ignoring this fellow's brilliant fame, and ignoring
 the fanciful name he takes such pride in, we called him Ferguson, just as
 we had done with all other guides.  It has kept him in a state of
 smothered exasperation all the time.  Yet we meant him no harm.  After he
 has gotten himself up regardless of expense, in showy, baggy trowsers,
 yellow, pointed slippers, fiery fez, silken jacket of blue, voluminous
 waist-sash of fancy Persian stuff filled with a battery of silver-mounted
 horse-pistols, and has strapped on his terrible scimitar, he considers it
 an unspeakable humiliation to be called Ferguson.  It can not be helped.
 All guides are Fergusons to us.  We can not master their dreadful foreign
 names.
 
 Sebastopol is probably the worst battered town in Russia or any where
 else.  But we ought to be pleased with it, nevertheless, for we have been
 in no country yet where we have been so kindly received, and where we
 felt that to be Americans was a sufficient visa for our passports.  The
 moment the anchor was down, the Governor of the town immediately
 dispatched an officer on board to inquire if he could be of any
 assistance to us, and to invite us to make ourselves at home in
 Sebastopol!  If you know Russia, you know that this was a wild stretch of
 hospitality.  They are usually so suspicious of strangers that they worry
 them excessively with the delays and aggravations incident to a
--**--**--
 next twelve hours we had the general appearance, somehow, of being at a
 funeral, where every body was sorry the death had occurred, but glad it
 was over--where every body was smiling, and yet broken-hearted.
 
 A committee went ashore to wait on his Excellency the Governor-General,
 and learn our fate.  At the end of three hours of boding suspense, they
 came back and said the Emperor would receive us at noon the next day
 --would send carriages for us--would hear the address in person.  The Grand
 Duke Michael had sent to invite us to his palace also.  Any man could see
 that there was an intention here to show that Russia's friendship for
 America was so genuine as to render even her private citizens objects
 worthy of kindly attentions.
 
 At the appointed hour we drove out three miles, and assembled in the
 handsome garden in front of the Emperor's palace.
 
 We formed a circle under the trees before the door, for there was no one
 room in the house able to accommodate our three-score persons
 comfortably, and in a few minutes the imperial family came out bowing and
 smiling, and stood in our midst.  A number of great dignitaries of the
 Empire, in undress unit forms, came with them.  With every bow, his
 Majesty said a word of welcome.  I copy these speeches.  There is
 character in them--Russian character--which is politeness itself, and the
 genuine article.  The French are polite, but it is often mere ceremonious
 politeness.  A Russian imbues his polite things with a heartiness, both
 of phrase and expression, that compels belief in their sincerity.  As I
 was saying, the Czar punctuated his speeches with bows:
 
 "Good morning--I am glad to see you--I am gratified--I am delighted--I am
 happy to receive you!"
 
 All took off their hats, and the Consul inflicted the address on him.  He
--**--**--
 his young daughter's into consideration, I wondered if it would not tax
 the Czar's firmness to the utmost to condemn a supplicating wretch to
 misery in the wastes of Siberia if she pleaded for him.  Every time
 their eyes met, I saw more and more what a tremendous power that weak,
 diffident school-girl could wield if she chose to do it.  Many and many
 a time she might rule the Autocrat of Russia, whose lightest word is law
 to seventy millions of human beings!  She was only a girl, and she
 looked like a thousand others I have seen, but never a girl provoked
 such a novel and peculiar interest in me before.  A strange, new
 sensation is a rare thing in this hum-drum life, and I had it here.
 There was nothing stale or worn out about the thoughts and feelings the
 situation and the circumstances created.  It seemed strange--stranger
 than I can tell--to think that the central figure in the cluster of men
 and women, chatting here under the trees like the most ordinary
 individual in the land, was a man who could open his lips and ships
 would fly through the waves, locomotives would speed over the plains,
 couriers would hurry from village to village, a hundred telegraphs would
 flash the word to the four corners of an Empire that stretches its vast
 proportions over a seventh part of the habitable globe, and a countless
 multitude of men would spring to do his bidding.  I had a sort of vague
 desire to examine his hands and see if they were of flesh and blood,
 like other men's.  Here was a man who could do this wonderful thing, and
 yet if I chose I could knock him down.  The case was plain, but it
 seemed preposterous, nevertheless--as preposterous as trying to knock
--**--**--
 boy may have suggested the breakfast, but I hope he did not.  It went off
 well, anyhow.  The illustrious host moved about from place to place, and
 helped to destroy the provisions and keep the conversation lively, and
 the Grand Duchess talked with the verandah parties and such as had
 satisfied their appetites and straggled out from the reception room.
 
 The Grand Duke's tea was delicious.  They give one a lemon to squeeze
 into it, or iced milk, if he prefers it.  The former is best.  This tea
 is brought overland from China.  It injures the article to transport it
 by sea.
 
 When it was time to go, we bade our distinguished hosts good-bye, and
 they retired happy and contented to their apartments to count their
 spoons.
 
 We had spent the best part of half a day in the home of royalty, and had
 been as cheerful and comfortable all the time as we could have been in
 the ship.  I would as soon have thought of being cheerful in Abraham's
 bosom as in the palace of an Emperor.  I supposed that Emperors were
 terrible people.  I thought they never did any thing but wear magnificent
 crowns and red velvet dressing-gowns with dabs of wool sewed on them in
 spots, and sit on thrones and scowl at the flunkies and the people in the
 parquette, and order Dukes and Duchesses off to execution.  I find,
 however, that when one is so fortunate as to get behind the scenes and
 see them at home and in the privacy of their firesides, they are
 strangely like common mortals.  They are pleasanter to look upon then
 than they are in their theatrical aspect.  It seems to come as natural to
 them to dress and act like other people as it is to put a friend's cedar
--**--**--
 Armenians.  The Armenians, of course, are Christians.  Their houses are
 large, clean, airy, handsomely paved with black and white squares of
 marble, and in the centre of many of them is a square court, which has in
 it a luxuriant flower-garden and a sparkling fountain; the doors of all
 the rooms open on this.  A very wide hall leads to the street door, and
 in this the women sit, the most of the day.  In the cool of the evening
 they dress up in their best raiment and show themselves at the door.
 They are all comely of countenance, and exceedingly neat and cleanly;
 they look as if they were just out of a band-box.  Some of the young
 ladies--many of them, I may say--are even very beautiful; they average a
 shade better than American girls--which treasonable words I pray may be
 forgiven me.  They are very sociable, and will smile back when a stranger
 smiles at them, bow back when he bows, and talk back if he speaks to
 them.  No introduction is required.  An hour's chat at the door with a
 pretty girl one never saw before, is easily obtained, and is very
 pleasant.  I have tried it.  I could not talk anything but English, and
 the girl knew nothing but Greek, or Armenian, or some such barbarous
 tongue, but we got along very well.  I find that in cases like these, the
 fact that you can not comprehend each other isn't much of a drawback.
 In that Russia n town of Yalta I danced an astonishing sort of dance an
 hour long, and one I had not heard of before, with a very pretty girl,
 and we talked incessantly, and laughed exhaustingly, and neither one ever
 knew what the other was driving at.  But it was splendid.  There were
--**--**--
 of marble, wherein, tradition says, St. Paul was imprisoned eighteen
 centuries ago.  From these old walls you have the finest view of the
 desolate scene where once stood Ephesus, the proudest city of ancient
 times, and whose Temple of Diana was so noble in design, and so exquisite
 of workmanship, that it ranked high in the list of the Seven Wonders of
 the World.
 
 Behind you is the sea; in front is a level green valley, (a marsh, in
 fact,) extending far away among the mountains; to the right of the front
 view is the old citadel of Ayassalook, on a high hill; the ruined Mosque
 of the Sultan Selim stands near it in the plain, (this is built over the
 grave of St. John, and was formerly Christian Church); further toward
 you is the hill of Pion, around whose front is clustered all that remains
 of the ruins of Ephesus that still stand; divided from it by a narrow
 valley is the long, rocky, rugged mountain of Coressus.  The scene is a
 pretty one, and yet desolate--for in that wide plain no man can live, and
 in it is no human habitation.  But for the crumbling arches and monstrous
 piers and broken walls that rise from the foot of the hill of Pion, one
 could not believe that in this place once stood a city whose renown is
 older than tradition itself.  It is incredible to reflect that things as
 familiar all over the world to-day as household words, belong in the
 history and in the shadowy legends of this silent, mournful solitude.
 We speak of Apollo and of Diana--they were born here; of the
 metamorphosis of Syrinx into a reed--it was done here; of the great god
 Pan--he dwelt in the caves of this hill of Coressus; of the Amazons--this
--**--**--
 
 
 CHAPTER XLI.
 
 When I last made a memorandum, we were at Ephesus.  We are in Syria, now,
 encamped in the mountains of Lebanon.  The interregnum has been long,
 both as to time and distance.  We brought not a relic from Ephesus!
 After gathering up fragments of sculptured marbles and breaking ornaments
 from the interior work of the Mosques; and after bringing them at a cost
 of infinite trouble and fatigue, five miles on muleback to the railway
 depot, a government officer compelled all who had such things to
 disgorge!  He had an order from Constantinople to look out for our party,
 and see that we carried nothing off.  It was a wise, a just, and a
 well-deserved rebuke, but it created a sensation.  I never resist a
 temptation to plunder a stranger's premises without feeling insufferably
 vain about it.  This time I felt proud beyond expression.  I was serene
 in the midst of the scoldings that were heaped upon the Ottoman
 government for its affront offered to a pleasuring party of entirely
 respectable gentlemen and ladies I said, "We that have free souls, it
 touches us not."  The shoe not only pinched our party, but it pinched
 hard; a principal sufferer discovered that the imperial order was
 inclosed in an envelop bearing the seal of the British Embassy at
 Constantinople, and therefore must have been inspired by the
 representative of the Queen.  This was bad--very bad.  Coming solely
 from the Ottomans, it might have signified only Ottoman hatred of
 Christians, and a vulgar ignorance as to genteel methods of expressing
 it; but coming from the Christianized, educated, politic British
 legation, it simply intimated that we were a sort of gentlemen and
 ladies who would bear watching!  So the party regarded it, and were
 incensed accordingly.  The truth doubtless was, that the same
--**--**--
 
 For the last two months we have been in a worry about one portion of this
 Holy Land pilgrimage.  I refer to transportation service.  We knew very
 well that Palestine was a country which did not do a large passenger
 business, and every man we came across who knew any thing about it gave
 us to understand that not half of our party would be able to get dragomen
 and animals.  At Constantinople every body fell to telegraphing the
 American Consuls at Alexandria and Beirout to give notice that we wanted
 dragomen and transportation.  We were desperate--would take horses,
 jackasses, cameleopards, kangaroos--any thing.  At Smyrna, more
 telegraphing was done, to the same end.  Also fearing for the worst, we
 telegraphed for a large number of seats in the diligence for Damascus,
 and horses for the ruins of Baalbec.
 
 As might have been expected, a notion got abroad in Syria and Egypt that
 the whole population of the Province of America (the Turks consider us a
 trifling little province in some unvisited corner of the world,) were
 coming to the Holy Land--and so, when we got to Beirout yesterday, we
 found the place full of dragomen and their outfits.  We had all intended
 to go by diligence to Damascus, and switch off to Baalbec as we went
 along--because we expected to rejoin the ship, go to Mount Carmel, and
 take to the woods from there.  However, when our own private party of
 eight found that it was possible, and proper enough, to make the "long
 trip," we adopted that programme.  We have never been much trouble to a
 Consul before, but we have been a fearful nuisance to our Consul at
 Beirout.  I mention this because I can not help admiring his patience,
 his industry, and his accommodating spirit.  I mention it also, because I
--**--**--
 make a heavy traveling trunk stand for twenty-five pounds of baggage
 --because it weighs a good deal more.  But that was all we could take
 --twenty-five pounds each.  So we had to snatch our trunks open, and make a
 selection in a good deal of a hurry.  We put our lawful twenty-five
 pounds apiece all in one valise, and shipped the trunks back to St. Louis
 again.  It was a sad parting, for now we had no swallow-tail coats and
 white kid gloves to wear at Pawnee receptions in the Rocky Mountains, and
 no stove-pipe hats nor patent-leather boots, nor anything else necessary
 to make life calm and peaceful.  We were reduced to a war-footing.  Each
 of us put on a rough, heavy suit of clothing, woolen army shirt and
 "stogy" boots included; and into the valise we crowded a few white
 shirts, some under-clothing and such things.  My brother, the Secretary,
 took along about four pounds of United States statutes and six pounds of
 Unabridged Dictionary; for we did not know--poor innocents--that such
 things could be bought in San Francisco on one day and received in Carson
 City the next.  I was armed to the teeth with a pitiful little Smith &
 Wesson's seven-shooter, which carried a ball like a homoeopathic pill,
 and it took the whole seven to make a dose for an adult.  But I thought
 it was grand.  It appeared to me to be a dangerous weapon.  It only had
 one fault--you could not hit anything with it.  One of our "conductors"
 practiced awhile on a cow with it, and as long as she stood still and
 behaved herself she was safe; but as soon as she went to moving about,
 and he got to shooting at other things, she came to grief.  The Secretary
--**--**--
 After supper a woman got in, who lived about fifty miles further on, and
 we three had to take turns at sitting outside with the driver and
 conductor.  Apparently she was not a talkative woman.  She would sit
 there in the gathering twilight and fasten her steadfast eyes on a
 mosquito rooting into her arm, and slowly she would raise her other hand
 till she had got his range, and then she would launch a slap at him that
 would have jolted a cow; and after that she would sit and contemplate the
 corpse with tranquil satisfaction--for she never missed her mosquito; she
 was a dead shot at short range.  She never removed a carcase, but left
 them there for bait.  I sat by this grim Sphynx and watched her kill
 thirty or forty mosquitoes--watched her, and waited for her to say
 something, but she never did.  So I finally opened the conversation
 myself.  I said:
 
 "The mosquitoes are pretty bad, about here, madam."
 
 "You bet!"
 
 "What did I understand you to say, madam?"
 
 "You BET!"
 
 Then she cheered up, and faced around and said:
 
 "Danged if I didn't begin to think you fellers was deef and dumb.  I did,
 b'gosh.  Here I've sot, and sot, and sot, a-bust'n muskeeters and
 wonderin' what was ailin' ye.  Fust I thot you was deef and dumb, then I
 thot you was sick or crazy, or suthin', and then by and by I begin to
 reckon you was a passel of sickly fools that couldn't think of nothing to
 say.  Wher'd ye come from?"
 
 The Sphynx was a Sphynx no more!  The fountains of her great deep were
 broken up, and she rained the nine parts of speech forty days and forty
 nights, metaphorically speaking, and buried us under a desolating deluge
--**--**--
 Presently he comes down to a long, graceful "lope," and shortly he
 mysteriously disappears.  He has crouched behind a sage-bush, and will
 sit there and listen and tremble until you get within six feet of him,
 when he will get under way again.  But one must shoot at this creature
 once, if he wishes to see him throw his heart into his heels, and do the
 best he knows how.  He is frightened clear through, now, and he lays his
 long ears down on his back, straightens himself out like a yard-stick
 every spring he makes, and scatters miles behind him with an easy
 indifference that is enchanting.
 
 Our party made this specimen "hump himself," as the conductor said.  The
 secretary started him with a shot from the Colt; I commenced spitting at
 him with my weapon; and all in the same instant the old "Allen's" whole
 broadside let go with a rattling crash, and it is not putting it too
 strong to say that the rabbit was frantic!  He dropped his ears, set up
 his tail, and left for San Francisco at a speed which can only be
 described as a flash and a vanish!  Long after he was out of sight we
 could hear him whiz.
 
 I do not remember where we first came across "sage-brush," but as I have
 been speaking of it I may as well describe it.
 
 This is easily done, for if the reader can imagine a gnarled and
 venerable live oak-tree reduced to a little shrub two feet-high, with its
 rough bark, its foliage, its twisted boughs, all complete, he can picture
 the "sage-brush" exactly.  Often, on lazy afternoons in the mountains, I
 have lain on the ground with my face under a sage-bush, and entertained
 myself with fancying that the gnats among its foliage were liliputian
--**--**--
 where it would lie as quiet as possible, and placed the water-canteens
 and pistols where we could find them in the dark.  Then we smoked a final
 pipe, and swapped a final yarn; after which, we put the pipes, tobacco
 and bag of coin in snug holes and caves among the mail-bags, and then
 fastened down the coach curtains all around, and made the place as "dark
 as the inside of a cow," as the conductor phrased it in his picturesque
 way.  It was certainly as dark as any place could be--nothing was even
 dimly visible in it.  And finally, we rolled ourselves up like
 silk-worms, each person in his own blanket, and sank peacefully to sleep.
 
 Whenever the stage stopped to change horses, we would wake up, and try to
 recollect where we were--and succeed--and in a minute or two the stage
 would be off again, and we likewise.  We began to get into country, now,
 threaded here and there with little streams.  These had high, steep banks
 on each side, and every time we flew down one bank and scrambled up the
 other, our party inside got mixed somewhat.  First we would all be down
 in a pile at the forward end of the stage, nearly in a sitting posture,
 and in a second we would shoot to the other end, and stand on our heads.
 And we would sprawl and kick, too, and ward off ends and corners of
 mail-bags that came lumbering over us and about us; and as the dust rose
 from the tumult, we would all sneeze in chorus, and the majority of us
 would grumble, and probably say some hasty thing, like: "Take your elbow
 out of my ribs!--can't you quit crowding?"
 
 Every time we avalanched from one end of the stage to the other, the
--**--**--
 never honored a particular individual with a remark, but addressed it
 with a broad generality to the horses, the stables, the surrounding
 country and the human underlings); when he discharged a facetious
 insulting personality at a hostler, that hostler was happy for the day;
 when he uttered his one jest--old as the hills, coarse, profane, witless,
 and inflicted on the same audience, in the same language, every time his
 coach drove up there--the varlets roared, and slapped their thighs, and
 swore it was the best thing they'd ever heard in all their lives.  And
 how they would fly around when he wanted a basin of water, a gourd of the
 same, or a light for his pipe!--but they would instantly insult a
 passenger if he so far forgot himself as to crave a favor at their hands.
 They could do that sort of insolence as well as the driver they copied it
 from--for, let it be borne in mind, the overland driver had but little
 less contempt for his passengers than he had for his hostlers.
 
 The hostlers and station-keepers treated the really powerful conductor of
 the coach merely with the best of what was their idea of civility, but
 the driver was the only being they bowed down to and worshipped.  How
 admiringly they would gaze up at him in his high seat as he gloved
 himself with lingering deliberation, while some happy hostler held the
 bunch of reins aloft, and waited patiently for him to take it!  And how
 they would bombard him with glorifying ejaculations as he cracked his
 long whip and went careering away.
 
 The station buildings were long, low huts, made of sundried, mud-colored
 bricks, laid up without mortar (adobes, the Spaniards call these bricks,
 and Americans shorten it to 'dobies).  The roofs, which had no slant to
--**--**--
 when he came to, he turned away and said, as one who communes with
 himself upon a matter too vast to grasp:
 
 "Coffee!  Well, if that don't go clean ahead of me, I'm d---d!"
 
 We could not eat, and there was no conversation among the hostlers and
 herdsmen--we all sat at the same board.  At least there was no
 conversation further than a single hurried request, now and then, from
 one employee to another.  It was always in the same form, and always
 gruffly friendly.  Its western freshness and novelty startled me, at
 first, and interested me; but it presently grew monotonous, and lost its
 charm.  It was:
 
 "Pass the bread, you son of a skunk!"  No, I forget--skunk was not the
 word; it seems to me it was still stronger than that; I know it was, in
 fact, but it is gone from my memory, apparently.  However, it is no
 matter--probably it was too strong for print, anyway.  It is the landmark
 in my memory which tells me where I first encountered the vigorous new
 vernacular of the occidental plains and mountains.
 
 We gave up the breakfast, and paid our dollar apiece and went back to our
 mail-bag bed in the coach, and found comfort in our pipes.  Right here we
 suffered the first diminution of our princely state.  We left our six
 fine horses and took six mules in their place.  But they were wild
 Mexican fellows, and a man had to stand at the head of each of them and
 hold him fast while the driver gloved and got himself ready.  And when at
 last he grasped the reins and gave the word, the men sprung suddenly away
 from the mules' heads and the coach shot from the station as if it had
 issued from a cannon.  How the frantic animals did scamper!  It was a
--**--**--
 you have got him in line you need a rifled cannon, and by the time you
 have "drawn a bead" on him you see well enough that nothing but an
 unusually long-winded streak of lightning could reach him where he is
 now.  But if you start a swift-footed dog after him, you will enjoy it
 ever so much--especially if it is a dog that has a good opinion of
 himself, and has been brought up to think he knows something about speed.
 
 The cayote will go swinging gently off on that deceitful trot of his, and
 every little while he will smile a fraudful smile over his shoulder that
 will fill that dog entirely full of encouragement and worldly ambition,
 and make him lay his head still lower to the ground, and stretch his neck
 further to the front, and pant more fiercely, and stick his tail out
 straighter behind, and move his furious legs with a yet wilder frenzy,
 and leave a broader and broader, and higher and denser cloud of desert
 sand smoking behind, and marking his long wake across the level plain!
 And all this time the dog is only a short twenty feet behind the cayote,
 and to save the soul of him he cannot understand why it is that he cannot
 get perceptibly closer; and he begins to get aggravated, and it makes him
 madder and madder to see how gently the cayote glides along and never
 pants or sweats or ceases to smile; and he grows still more and more
 incensed to see how shamefully he has been taken in by an entire
 stranger, and what an ignoble swindle that long, calm, soft-footed trot
 is; and next he notices that he is getting fagged, and that the cayote
 actually has to slacken speed a little to keep from running away from
--**--**--
 
 A great portion of this vast machinery--these hundreds of men and
 coaches, and thousands of mules and horses--was in the hands of Mr. Ben
 Holliday.  All the western half of the business was in his hands.  This
 reminds me of an incident of Palestine travel which is pertinent here, so
 I will transfer it just in the language in which I find it set down in my
 Holy Land note-book:
 
       No doubt everybody has heard of Ben Holliday--a man of prodigious
       energy, who used to send mails and passengers flying across the
       continent in his overland stage-coaches like a very whirlwind--two
       thousand long miles in fifteen days and a half, by the watch!  But
       this fragment of history is not about Ben Holliday, but about a
       young New York boy by the name of Jack, who traveled with our small
       party of pilgrims in the Holy Land (and who had traveled to
       California in Mr. Holliday's overland coaches three years before,
       and had by no means forgotten it or lost his gushing admiration of
       Mr. H.) Aged nineteen.  Jack was a good boy--a good-hearted and
       always well-meaning boy, who had been reared in the city of New
       York, and although he was bright and knew a great many useful
       things, his Scriptural education had been a good deal neglected--to
       such a degree, indeed, that all Holy Land history was fresh and new
       to him, and all Bible names mysteries that had never disturbed his
       virgin ear.
 
       Also in our party was an elderly pilgrim who was the reverse of
       Jack, in that he was learned in the Scriptures and an enthusiast
       concerning them.  He was our encyclopedia, and we were never tired
       of listening to his speeches, nor he of making them.  He never
       passed a celebrated locality, from Bashan to Bethlehem, without
--**--**--
 sat.  I cautiously unwound the lariat from the pommel of my saddle----"
 
 "Your saddle?  Did you take your saddle up in the tree with you?"
 
 "Take it up in the tree with me?  Why, how you talk.  Of course I didn't.
 No man could do that.  It fell in the tree when it came down."
 
 "Oh--exactly."
 
 "Certainly.  I unwound the lariat, and fastened one end of it to the
 limb.  It was the very best green raw-hide, and capable of sustaining
 tons.  I made a slip-noose in the other end, and then hung it down to see
 the length.  It reached down twenty-two feet--half way to the ground.
 I then loaded every barrel of the Allen with a double charge.  I felt
 satisfied.  I said to myself, if he never thinks of that one thing that I
 dread, all right--but if he does, all right anyhow--I am fixed for him.
 But don't you know that the very thing a man dreads is the thing that
 always happens?  Indeed it is so.  I watched the bull, now, with anxiety
 --anxiety which no one can conceive of who has not been in such a
 situation and felt that at any moment death might come.  Presently a
 thought came into the bull's eye.  I knew it! said I--if my nerve fails
 now, I am lost.  Sure enough, it was just as I had dreaded, he started in
 to climb the tree----"
 
 "What, the bull?"
 
 "Of course--who else?"
 
 "But a bull can't climb a tree."
 
 "He can't, can't he?  Since you know so much about it, did you ever see a
 bull try?"
 
 "No!  I never dreamt of such a thing."
 
 "Well, then, what is the use of your talking that way, then?  Because you
 never saw a thing done, is that any reason why it can't be done?"
--**--**--
 came as near as anything to starving to death in the midst of abundance,
 because they kept him so leaky with bullet holes that he "couldn't hold
 his vittles."
 
 This person's statement were not generally believed.
 
 We shut the blinds down very tightly that first night in the hostile
 Indian country, and lay on our arms.  We slept on them some, but most of
 the time we only lay on them.  We did not talk much, but kept quiet and
 listened.  It was an inky-black night, and occasionally rainy.  We were
 among woods and rocks, hills and gorges--so shut in, in fact, that when
 we peeped through a chink in a curtain, we could discern nothing.  The
 driver and conductor on top were still, too, or only spoke at long
 intervals, in low tones, as is the way of men in the midst of invisible
 dangers.  We listened to rain-drops pattering on the roof; and the
 grinding of the wheels through the muddy gravel; and the low wailing of
 the wind; and all the time we had that absurd sense upon us, inseparable
 from travel at night in a close-curtained vehicle, the sense of remaining
 perfectly still in one place, notwithstanding the jolting and swaying of
 the vehicle, the trampling of the horses, and the grinding of the wheels.
 We listened a long time, with intent faculties and bated breath; every
 time one of us would relax, and draw a long sigh of relief and start to
 say something, a comrade would be sure to utter a sudden "Hark!" and
 instantly the experimenter was rigid and listening again.  So the
 tiresome minutes and decades of minutes dragged away, until at last our
 tense forms filmed over with a dulled consciousness, and we slept, if one
 might call such a condition by so strong a name--for it was a sleep set
--**--**--
 Julesburg, in place of Mr. Jules, removed.  For some time previously, the
 company's horses had been frequently stolen, and the coaches delayed, by
 gangs of outlaws, who were wont to laugh at the idea of any man's having
 the temerity to resent such outrages.  Slade resented them promptly.
 
 The outlaws soon found that the new agent was a man who did not fear
 anything that breathed the breath of life.  He made short work of all
 offenders.  The result was that delays ceased, the company's property was
 let alone, and no matter what happened or who suffered, Slade's coaches
 went through, every time!  True, in order to bring about this wholesome
 change, Slade had to kill several men--some say three, others say four,
 and others six--but the world was the richer for their loss.  The first
 prominent difficulty he had was with the ex-agent Jules, who bore the
 reputation of being a reckless and desperate man himself.  Jules hated
 Slade for supplanting him, and a good fair occasion for a fight was all
 he was waiting for.  By and by Slade dared to employ a man whom Jules had
 once discharged.  Next, Slade seized a team of stage-horses which he
 accused Jules of having driven off and hidden somewhere for his own use.
 War was declared, and for a day or two the two men walked warily about
 the streets, seeking each other, Jules armed with a double-barreled shot
 gun, and Slade with his history-creating revolver.  Finally, as Slade
 stepped into a store Jules poured the contents of his gun into him from
 behind the door.  Slade was plucky, and Jules got several bad pistol
 wounds in return.
 
 Then both men fell, and were carried to their respective lodgings, both
 swearing that better aim should do deadlier work next time.  Both were
--**--**--
       mentioned that the overt act which was the last round on the fatal
       ladder leading to the scaffold on which Slade perished, was the
       tearing in pieces and stamping upon a writ of this court, followed
       by his arrest of the Judge Alex. Davis, by authority of a presented
       Derringer, and with his own hands.
 
       J. A. Slade was himself, we have been informed, a Vigilante; he
       openly boasted of it, and said he knew all that they knew.  He was
       never accused, or even suspected, of either murder or robbery,
       committed in this Territory (the latter crime was never laid to his
       charge, in any place); but that he had killed several men in other
       localities was notorious, and his bad reputation in this respect was
       a most powerful argument in determining his fate, when he was
       finally arrested for the offence above mentioned.  On returning from
       Milk River he became more and more addicted to drinking, until at
       last it was a common feat for him and his friends to "take the
       town."  He and a couple of his dependents might often be seen on one
       horse, galloping through the streets, shouting and yelling, firing
       revolvers, etc.  On many occasions he would ride his horse into
       stores, break up bars, toss the scales out of doors and use most
       insulting language to parties present.  Just previous to the day of
       his arrest, he had given a fearful beating to one of his followers;
       but such was his influence over them that the man wept bitterly at
       the gallows, and begged for his life with all his power.  It had
       become quite common, when Slade was on a spree, for the shop-keepers
       and citizens to close the stores and put out all the lights; being
       fearful of some outrage at his hands.  For his wanton destruction of
--**--**--
       their hands to deal with him.  Off, at hot speed, rode the leader of
       the Nevada men to join his command.
 
       Slade had found out what was intended, and the news sobered him
       instantly.  He went into P. S. Pfouts' store, where Davis was, and
       apologized for his conduct, saying that he would take it all back.
 
       The head of the column now wheeled into Wallace street and marched
       up at quick time.  Halting in front of the store, the executive
       officer of the committee stepped forward and arrested Slade, who was
       at once informed of his doom, and inquiry was made as to whether he
       had any business to settle.  Several parties spoke to him on the
       subject; but to all such inquiries he turned a deaf ear, being
       entirely absorbed in the terrifying reflections on his own awful
       position.  He never ceased his entreaties for life, and to see his
       dear wife.  The unfortunate lady referred to, between whom and Slade
       there existed a warm affection, was at this time living at their
       ranch on the Madison.  She was possessed of considerable personal
       attractions; tall, well-formed, of graceful carriage, pleasing
       manners, and was, withal, an accomplished horsewoman.
 
       A messenger from Slade rode at full speed to inform her of her
       husband's arrest.  In an instant she was in the saddle, and with all
       the energy that love and despair could lend to an ardent temperament
       and a strong physique, she urged her fleet charger over the twelve
       miles of rough and rocky ground that intervened between her and the
       object of her passionate devotion.
 
       Meanwhile a party of volunteers had made the necessary preparations
       for the execution, in the valley traversed by the branch.  Beneath
       the site of Pfouts and Russell's stone building there was a corral,
--**--**--
 frequently defying and inviting the vengeance of banded Rocky Mountain
 cut-throats by shooting down their comrades and leaders, and never
 offering to hide or fly, Slade showed that he was a man of peerless
 bravery.  No coward would dare that.  Many a notorious coward, many a
 chicken-livered poltroon, coarse, brutal, degraded, has made his dying
 speech without a quaver in his voice and been swung into eternity with
 what looked liked the calmest fortitude, and so we are justified in
 believing, from the low intellect of such a creature, that it was not
 moral courage that enabled him to do it.  Then, if moral courage is not
 the requisite quality, what could it have been that this stout-hearted
 Slade lacked?--this bloody, desperate, kindly-mannered, urbane gentleman,
 who never hesitated to warn his most ruffianly enemies that he would kill
 them whenever or wherever he came across them next!  I think it is a
 conundrum worth investigating.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII.
 
 Just beyond the breakfast-station we overtook a Mormon emigrant train of
 thirty-three wagons; and tramping wearily along and driving their herd of
 loose cows, were dozens of coarse-clad and sad-looking men, women and
 children, who had walked as they were walking now, day after day for
 eight lingering weeks, and in that time had compassed the distance our
 stage had come in eight days and three hours--seven hundred and
 ninety-eight miles!  They were dusty and uncombed, hatless, bonnetless
 and ragged, and they did look so tired!
 
 After breakfast, we bathed in Horse Creek, a (previously) limpid,
 sparkling stream--an appreciated luxury, for it was very seldom that our
 furious coach halted long enough for an indulgence of that kind.  We
 changed horses ten or twelve times in every twenty-four hours--changed
 mules, rather--six mules--and did it nearly every time in four minutes.
 It was lively work.  As our coach rattled up to each station six
--**--**--
 men and women, and many a disgusted sheep and cow.
 
 In the wofully dusty horseman in charge of the expedition I recognized
 John -----.  Of all persons in the world to meet on top of the Rocky
 Mountains thousands of miles from home, he was the last one I should have
 looked for.  We were school-boys together and warm friends for years.
 But a boyish prank of mine had disruptured this friendship and it had
 never been renewed.  The act of which I speak was this.  I had been
 accustomed to visit occasionally an editor whose room was in the third
 story of a building and overlooked the street.  One day this editor gave
 me a watermelon which I made preparations to devour on the spot, but
 chancing to look out of the window, I saw John standing directly under it
 and an irresistible desire came upon me to drop the melon on his head,
 which I immediately did.  I was the loser, for it spoiled the melon, and
 John never forgave me and we dropped all intercourse and parted, but now
 met again under these circumstances.
 
 We recognized each other simultaneously, and hands were grasped as warmly
 as if no coldness had ever existed between us, and no allusion was made
 to any.  All animosities were buried and the simple fact of meeting a
 familiar face in that isolated spot so far from home, was sufficient to
 make us forget all things but pleasant ones, and we parted again with
 sincere "good-bye" and "God bless you" from both.
 
 We had been climbing up the long shoulders of the Rocky Mountains for
 many tedious hours--we started down them, now.  And we went spinning away
 at a round rate too.
 
 We left the snowy Wind River Mountains and Uinta Mountains behind, and
--**--**--
 exhausting deserts--and it was two days' journey from water to water, in
 one or two of them.  Mr. Street's contract was a vast work, every way one
 looked at it; and yet to comprehend what the vague words "eight hundred
 miles of rugged mountains and dismal deserts" mean, one must go over the
 ground in person--pen and ink descriptions cannot convey the dreary
 reality to the reader.  And after all, Mr. S.'s mightiest difficulty
 turned out to be one which he had never taken into the account at all.
 Unto Mormons he had sub-let the hardest and heaviest half of his great
 undertaking, and all of a sudden they concluded that they were going to
 make little or nothing, and so they tranquilly threw their poles
 overboard in mountain or desert, just as it happened when they took the
 notion, and drove home and went about their customary business!  They
 were under written contract to Mr. Street, but they did not care anything
 for that.  They said they would "admire" to see a "Gentile" force a
 Mormon to fulfil a losing contract in Utah!  And they made themselves
 very merry over the matter.  Street said--for it was he that told us
 these things:
 
 "I was in dismay.  I was under heavy bonds to complete my contract in a
 given time, and this disaster looked very much like ruin.  It was an
 astounding thing; it was such a wholly unlooked-for difficulty, that I
 was entirely nonplussed.  I am a business man--have always been a
 business man--do not know anything but business--and so you can imagine
 how like being struck by lightning it was to find myself in a country
 where written contracts were worthless!--that main security, that
 sheet-anchor, that absolute necessity, of business.  My confidence left
 me. There was no use in making new contracts--that was plain.  I talked
--**--**--
 
 According to these Gentile friends of ours, Brigham Young's harem
 contains twenty or thirty wives.  They said that some of them had grown
 old and gone out of active service, but were comfortably housed and cared
 for in the henery--or the Lion House, as it is strangely named.  Along
 with each wife were her children--fifty altogether.  The house was
 perfectly quiet and orderly, when the children were still.  They all took
 their meals in one room, and a happy and home-like sight it was
 pronounced to be.  None of our party got an opportunity to take dinner
 with Mr. Young, but a Gentile by the name of Johnson professed to have
 enjoyed a sociable breakfast in the Lion House.  He gave a preposterous
 account of the "calling of the roll," and other preliminaries, and the
 carnage that ensued when the buckwheat cakes came in.  But he embellished
 rather too much.  He said that Mr. Young told him several smart sayings
 of certain of his "two-year-olds," observing with some pride that for
 many years he had been the heaviest contributor in that line to one of
 the Eastern magazines; and then he wanted to show Mr. Johnson one of the
 pets that had said the last good thing, but he could not find the child.
 
 He searched the faces of the children in detail, but could not decide
 which one it was.  Finally he gave it up with a sigh and said:
 
 "I thought I would know the little cub again but I don't."  Mr. Johnson
 said further, that Mr. Young observed that life was a sad, sad thing
 --"because the joy of every new marriage a man contracted was so apt to be
 blighted by the inopportune funeral of a less recent bride."  And Mr.
 Johnson said that while he and Mr. Young were pleasantly conversing in
--**--**--
       THE BOOK OF MORMON: AN ACCOUNT WRITTEN BY THE HAND OF MORMON, UPON
       PLATES TAKEN FROM THE PLATES OF NEPHI.
 
       Wherefore it is an abridgment of the record of the people of Nephi,
       and also of the Lamanites; written to the Lamanites, who are a
       remnant of the House of Israel; and also to Jew and Gentile; written
       by way of commandment, and also by the spirit of prophecy and of
       revelation.  Written and sealed up, and hid up unto the Lord, that
       they might not be destroyed; to come forth by the gift and power of
       God unto the interpretation thereof; sealed by the hand of Moroni,
       and hid up unto the Lord, to come forth in due time by the way of
       Gentile; the interpretation thereof by the gift of God.  An
       abridgment taken from the Book of Ether also; which is a record of
       the people of Jared; who were scattered at the time the Lord
       confounded the language of the people when they were building a
       tower to get to Heaven.
 
 "Hid up" is good.  And so is "wherefore"--though why "wherefore"?  Any
 other word would have answered as well--though--in truth it would not
 have sounded so Scriptural.
 
 Next comes:
 
       THE TESTIMONY OF THREE WITNESSES.
       Be it known unto all nations, kindreds, tongues, and people unto
       whom this work shall come, that we, through the grace of God the
       Father, and our Lord Jesus Christ, have seen the plates which
       contain this record, which is a record of the people of Nephi, and
       also of the Lamanites, their brethren, and also of the people of
       Jared, who came from the tower of which hath been spoken; and we
       also know that they have been translated by the gift and power of
       God, for His voice hath declared it unto us; wherefore we know of a
--**--**--
       Behold, the Lamanites your brethren, whom ye hate, because of their
       filthiness and the cursings which hath come upon their skins, are
       more righteous than you; for they have not forgotten the commandment
       of the Lord, which was given unto our fathers, that they should
       have, save it were one wife; and concubines they should have none.
 
 The following verse (from Chapter IX. of the Book of Nephi) appears to
 contain information not familiar to everybody:
 
       And now it came to pass that when Jesus had ascended into heaven,
       the multitude did disperse, and every man did take his wife and his
       children, and did return to his own home.
 
       And it came to pass that on the morrow, when the multitude was
       gathered together, behold, Nephi and his brother whom he had raised
       from the dead, whose name was Timothy, and also his son, whose name
       was Jonas, and also Mathoni, and Mathonihah, his brother, and Kumen,
       and Kumenenhi, and Jeremiah, and Shemnon, and Jonas, and Zedekiah,
       and Isaiah; now these were the names of the disciples whom Jesus had
       chosen.
 
 In order that the reader may observe how much more grandeur and
 picturesqueness (as seen by these Mormon twelve) accompanied on of the
 tenderest episodes in the life of our Saviour than other eyes seem to
 have been aware of, I quote the following from the same "book"--Nephi:
 
       And it came to pass that Jesus spake unto them, and bade them arise.
       And they arose from the earth, and He said unto them, Blessed are ye
       because of your faith.  And now behold, My joy is full.  And when He
       had said these words, He wept, and the multitude bear record of it,
       and He took their little children, one by one, and blessed them, and
       prayed unto the Father for them.  And when He had done this He wept
--**--**--
 several years afterward that Mrs. Waite's book, "The Mormon Prophet,"
 came out with Judge Cradlebaugh's trial of the accused parties in it and
 revealed the truth that the latter version was the correct one and that
 the Mormons were the assassins.  All our "information" had three sides to
 it, and so I gave up the idea that I could settle the "Mormon question"
 in two days.  Still I have seen newspaper correspondents do it in one.
 
 I left Great Salt Lake a good deal confused as to what state of things
 existed there--and sometimes even questioning in my own mind whether a
 state of things existed there at all or not.  But presently I remembered
 with a lightening sense of relief that we had learned two or three
 trivial things there which we could be certain of; and so the two days
 were not wholly lost.  For instance, we had learned that we were at last
 in a pioneer land, in absolute and tangible reality.
 
 The high prices charged for trifles were eloquent of high freights and
 bewildering distances of freightage.  In the east, in those days, the
 smallest moneyed denomination was a penny and it represented the smallest
 purchasable quantity of any commodity.  West of Cincinnati the smallest
 coin in use was the silver five-cent piece and no smaller quantity of an
 article could be bought than "five cents' worth."  In Overland City the
 lowest coin appeared to be the ten-cent piece; but in Salt Lake there did
 not seem to be any money in circulation smaller than a quarter, or any
 smaller quantity purchasable of any commodity than twenty-five cents'
 worth.  We had always been used to half dimes and "five cents' worth" as
 the minimum of financial negotiations; but in Salt Lake if one wanted a
--**--**--
 deeply coated with ashes that they are all one colorless color; imagine
 ash-drifts roosting above moustaches and eyebrows like snow accumulations
 on boughs and bushes.  This is the reality of it.
 
 The sun beats down with dead, blistering, relentless malignity; the
 perspiration is welling from every pore in man and beast, but scarcely a
 sign of it finds its way to the surface--it is absorbed before it gets
 there; there is not the faintest breath of air stirring; there is not a
 merciful shred of cloud in all the brilliant firmament; there is not a
 living creature visible in any direction whither one searches the blank
 level that stretches its monotonous miles on every hand; there is not a
 sound--not a sigh--not a whisper--not a buzz, or a whir of wings, or
 distant pipe of bird--not even a sob from the lost souls that doubtless
 people that dead air.  And so the occasional sneezing of the resting
 mules, and the champing of the bits, grate harshly on the grim stillness,
 not dissipating the spell but accenting it and making one feel more
 lonesome and forsaken than before.
 
 The mules, under violent swearing, coaxing and whip-cracking, would make
 at stated intervals a "spurt," and drag the coach a hundred or may be two
 hundred yards, stirring up a billowy cloud of dust that rolled back,
 enveloping the vehicle to the wheel-tops or higher, and making it seem
 afloat in a fog.  Then a rest followed, with the usual sneezing and
 bit-champing.  Then another "spurt" of a hundred yards and another rest at
 the end of it.  All day long we kept this up, without water for the mules
 and without ever changing the team.  At least we kept it up ten hours,
 which, I take it, is a day, and a pretty honest one, in an alkali desert.
--**--**--
 most rocky, wintry, repulsive wastes that our country or any other can
 exhibit.
 
 The Bushmen and our Goshoots are manifestly descended from the self-same
 gorilla, or kangaroo, or Norway rat, which-ever animal--Adam the
 Darwinians trace them to.
 
 One would as soon expect the rabbits to fight as the Goshoots, and yet
 they used to live off the offal and refuse of the stations a few months
 and then come some dark night when no mischief was expected, and burn
 down the buildings and kill the men from ambush as they rushed out.
 And once, in the night, they attacked the stage-coach when a District
 Judge, of Nevada Territory, was the only passenger, and with their first
 volley of arrows (and a bullet or two) they riddled the stage curtains,
 wounded a horse or two and mortally wounded the driver.  The latter was
 full of pluck, and so was his passenger.  At the driver's call Judge Mott
 swung himself out, clambered to the box and seized the reins of the team,
 and away they plunged, through the racing mob of skeletons and under a
 hurtling storm of missiles.  The stricken driver had sunk down on the
 boot as soon as he was wounded, but had held on to the reins and said he
 would manage to keep hold of them until relieved.
 
 And after they were taken from his relaxing grasp, he lay with his head
 between Judge Mott's feet, and tranquilly gave directions about the road;
 he said he believed he could live till the miscreants were outrun and
 left behind, and that if he managed that, the main difficulty would be at
 an end, and then if the Judge drove so and so (giving directions about
 bad places in the road, and general course) he would reach the next
--**--**--
 he told us a good deal about the country and the Gregory Diggings.
 He seemed a very entertaining person and a man well posted in the affairs
 of Colorado.  By and by he remarked:
 
 "I can tell you a most laughable thing indeed, if you would like to
 listen to it.  Horace Greeley went over this road once.  When he was
 leaving Carson City he told the driver, Hank Monk, that he had an
 engagement to lecture at Placerville and was very anxious to go through
 quick.  Hank Monk cracked his whip and started off at an awful pace.  The
 coach bounced up and down in such a terrific way that it jolted the
 buttons all off of Horace's coat, and finally shot his head clean through
 the roof of the stage, and then he yelled at Hank Monk and begged him to
 go easier--said he warn't in as much of a hurry as he was awhile ago.
 But Hank Monk said, 'Keep your seat, Horace, and I'll get you there on
 time!'--and you bet you he did, too, what was left of him!"
 
 At Fort Bridger, some days after this, we took on board a cavalry
 sergeant, a very proper and soldierly person indeed.  From no other man
 during the whole journey, did we gather such a store of concise and
 well-arranged military information.  It was surprising to find in the
 desolate wilds of our country a man so thoroughly acquainted with
 everything useful to know in his line of life, and yet of such inferior
 rank and unpretentious bearing.  For as much as three hours we listened
 to him with unabated interest.  Finally he got upon the subject of
 trans-continental travel, and presently said:
 
 "I can tell you a very laughable thing indeed, if you would like to
--**--**--
 strange to the upper air--things living and dead, that flitted hither and
 thither, going and coming, appearing and disappearing among the rolling
 billows of dust--hats, chickens and parasols sailing in the remote
 heavens; blankets, tin signs, sage-brush and shingles a shade lower;
 door-mats and buffalo robes lower still; shovels and coal scuttles on the
 next grade; glass doors, cats and little children on the next; disrupted
 lumber yards, light buggies and wheelbarrows on the next; and down only
 thirty or forty feet above ground was a scurrying storm of emigrating
 roofs and vacant lots.
 
 It was something to see that much.  I could have seen more, if I could
 have kept the dust out of my eyes.
 
 But seriously a Washoe wind is by no means a trifling matter.  It blows
 flimsy houses down, lifts shingle roofs occasionally, rolls up tin ones
 like sheet music, now and then blows a stage coach over and spills the
 passengers; and tradition says the reason there are so many bald people
 there, is, that the wind blows the hair off their heads while they are
 looking skyward after their hats.  Carson streets seldom look inactive on
 Summer afternoons, because there are so many citizens skipping around
 their escaping hats, like chambermaids trying to head off a spider.
 
 The "Washoe Zephyr" (Washoe is a pet nickname for Nevada) is a peculiar
 Scriptural wind, in that no man knoweth "whence it cometh."  That is to
 say, where it originates.  It comes right over the mountains from the
 West, but when one crosses the ridge he does not find any of it on the
 other side!  It probably is manufactured on the mountain-top for the
 occasion, and starts from there.  It is a pretty regular wind, in the
 summer time.  Its office hours are from two in the afternoon till two the
--**--**--
 brigade in the dark, and a general tumbling and sprawling over each other
 in the narrow aisle between the bedrows.  In the midst of the turmoil,
 Bob H---- sprung up out of a sound sleep, and knocked down a shelf with
 his head.  Instantly he shouted:
 
 "Turn out, boys--the tarantulas is loose!"
 
 No warning ever sounded so dreadful.  Nobody tried, any longer, to leave
 the room, lest he might step on a tarantula.  Every man groped for a
 trunk or a bed, and jumped on it.  Then followed the strangest silence--a
 silence of grisly suspense it was, too--waiting, expectancy, fear.  It
 was as dark as pitch, and one had to imagine the spectacle of those
 fourteen scant-clad men roosting gingerly on trunks and beds, for not a
 thing could be seen.  Then came occasional little interruptions of the
 silence, and one could recognize a man and tell his locality by his
 voice, or locate any other sound a sufferer made by his gropings or
 changes of position.  The occasional voices were not given to much
 speaking--you simply heard a gentle ejaculation of "Ow!" followed by a
 solid thump, and you knew the gentleman had felt a hairy blanket or
 something touch his bare skin and had skipped from a bed to the floor.
 Another silence.  Presently you would hear a gasping voice say:
 
 "Su--su--something's crawling up the back of my neck!"
 
 Every now and then you could hear a little subdued scramble and a
 sorrowful "O Lord!" and then you knew that somebody was getting away from
 something he took for a tarantula, and not losing any time about it,
 either.  Directly a voice in the corner rang out wild and clear:
 
 "I've got him!  I've got him!" [Pause, and probable change of
 circumstances.]  "No, he's got me!  Oh, ain't they never going to fetch a
--**--**--
 signified the locality of the camp.  I got Johnny to row--not because I
 mind exertion myself, but because it makes me sick to ride backwards when
 I am at work.  But I steered.  A three-mile pull brought us to the camp
 just as the night fell, and we stepped ashore very tired and wolfishly
 hungry.  In a "cache" among the rocks we found the provisions and the
 cooking utensils, and then, all fatigued as I was, I sat down on a
 boulder and superintended while Johnny gathered wood and cooked supper.
 Many a man who had gone through what I had, would have wanted to rest.
 
 It was a delicious supper--hot bread, fried bacon, and black coffee.
 It was a delicious solitude we were in, too.  Three miles away was a
 saw-mill and some workmen, but there were not fifteen other human beings
 throughout the wide circumference of the lake.  As the darkness closed
 down and the stars came out and spangled the great mirror with jewels, we
 smoked meditatively in the solemn hush and forgot our troubles and our
 pains.  In due time we spread our blankets in the warm sand between two
 large boulders and soon feel asleep, careless of the procession of ants
 that passed in through rents in our clothing and explored our persons.
 Nothing could disturb the sleep that fettered us, for it had been fairly
 earned, and if our consciences had any sins on them they had to adjourn
 court for that night, any way.  The wind rose just as we were losing
 consciousness, and we were lulled to sleep by the beating of the surf
 upon the shore.
 
 It is always very cold on that lake shore in the night, but we had plenty
 of blankets and were warm enough.  We never moved a muscle all night, but
--**--**--
 
 In the afternoon I brought the creature into the plaza, and certain
 citizens held him by the head, and others by the tail, while I mounted
 him.  As soon as they let go, he placed all his feet in a bunch together,
 lowered his back, and then suddenly arched it upward, and shot me
 straight into the air a matter of three or four feet!  I came as straight
 down again, lit in the saddle, went instantly up again, came down almost
 on the high pommel, shot up again, and came down on the horse's neck--all
 in the space of three or four seconds.  Then he rose and stood almost
 straight up on his hind feet, and I, clasping his lean neck desperately,
 slid back into the saddle and held on.  He came down, and immediately
 hoisted his heels into the air, delivering a vicious kick at the sky, and
 stood on his forefeet.  And then down he came once more, and began the
 original exercise of shooting me straight up again.  The third time I
 went up I heard a stranger say:
 
 "Oh, don't he buck, though!"
 
 While I was up, somebody struck the horse a sounding thwack with a
 leathern strap, and when I arrived again the Genuine Mexican Plug was not
 there.  A California youth chased him up and caught him, and asked if he
 might have a ride.  I granted him that luxury.  He mounted the Genuine,
 got lifted into the air once, but sent his spurs home as he descended,
 and the horse darted away like a telegram.  He soared over three fences
 like a bird, and disappeared down the road toward the Washoe Valley.
 
 I sat down on a stone, with a sigh, and by a natural impulse one of my
 hands sought my forehead, and the other the base of my stomach.  I
--**--**--
 
 The United States was too much accustomed to employing dollar-and-a-half
 thieves in all manner of official capacities to regard his explanation of
 the voucher as having any foundation in fact.
 
 But the next time the Indian sawed wood for us I taught him to make a
 cross at the bottom of the voucher--it looked like a cross that had been
 drunk a year--and then I "witnessed" it and it went through all right.
 The United States never said a word.  I was sorry I had not made the
 voucher for a thousand loads of wood instead of one.
 
 The government of my country snubs honest simplicity but fondles artistic
 villainy, and I think I might have developed into a very capable
 pickpocket if I had remained in the public service a year or two.
 
 That was a fine collection of sovereigns, that first Nevada legislature.
 They levied taxes to the amount of thirty or forty thousand dollars and
 ordered expenditures to the extent of about a million.  Yet they had
 their little periodical explosions of economy like all other bodies of
 the kind.  A member proposed to save three dollars a day to the nation by
 dispensing with the Chaplain.  And yet that short-sighted man needed the
 Chaplain more than any other member, perhaps, for he generally sat with
 his feet on his desk, eating raw turnips, during the morning prayer.
 
 The legislature sat sixty days, and passed private tollroad franchises
 all the time.  When they adjourned it was estimated that every citizen
 owned about three franchises, and it was believed that unless Congress
 gave the Territory another degree of longitude there would not be room
 enough to accommodate the toll-roads.  The ends of them were hanging over
 the boundary line everywhere like a fringe.
 
 The fact is, the freighting business had grown to such important
--**--**--
 word, was a secret between himself and his Maker.  He was one of the best
 and kindest hearted men that ever graced a humble sphere of life.  He was
 gentleness and simplicity itself--and unselfishness, too.  Although he
 was more than twice as old as the eldest of us, he never gave himself any
 airs, privileges, or exemptions on that account.  He did a young man's
 share of the work; and did his share of conversing and entertaining from
 the general stand-point of any age--not from the arrogant, overawing
 summit-height of sixty years.  His one striking peculiarity was his
 Partingtonian fashion of loving and using big words for their own sakes,
 and independent of any bearing they might have upon the thought he was
 purposing to convey.  He always let his ponderous syllables fall with an
 easy unconsciousness that left them wholly without offensiveness.
 In truth his air was so natural and so simple that one was always
 catching himself accepting his stately sentences as meaning something,
 when they really meant nothing in the world.  If a word was long and
 grand and resonant, that was sufficient to win the old man's love, and he
 would drop that word into the most out-of-the-way place in a sentence or
 a subject, and be as pleased with it as if it were perfectly luminous
 with meaning.
 
 We four always spread our common stock of blankets together on the frozen
 ground, and slept side by side; and finding that our foolish, long-legged
 hound pup had a deal of animal heat in him, Oliphant got to admitting him
 to the bed, between himself and Mr. Ballou, hugging the dog's warm back
 to his breast and finding great comfort in it.  But in the night the pup
 would get stretchy and brace his feet against the old man's back and
--**--**--
 accustomed to associating the term "river" with a high degree of watery
 grandeur.  Consequently, such people feel rather disappointed when they
 stand on the shores of the Humboldt or the Carson and find that a "river"
 in Nevada is a sickly rivulet which is just the counterpart of the Erie
 canal in all respects save that the canal is twice as long and four times
 as deep.  One of the pleasantest and most invigorating exercises one can
 contrive is to run and jump across the Humboldt river till he is
 overheated, and then drink it dry.
 
 On the fifteenth day we completed our march of two hundred miles and
 entered Unionville, Humboldt county, in the midst of a driving
 snow-storm.  Unionville consisted of eleven cabins and a liberty-pole.
 Six of the cabins were strung along one side of a deep canyon, and the
 other five faced them.  The rest of the landscape was made up of bleak
 mountain walls that rose so high into the sky from both sides of the
 canyon that the village was left, as it were, far down in the bottom of a
 crevice. It was always daylight on the mountain tops a long time before
 the darkness lifted and revealed Unionville.
 
 We built a small, rude cabin in the side of the crevice and roofed it
 with canvas, leaving a corner open to serve as a chimney, through which
 the cattle used to tumble occasionally, at night, and mash our furniture
 and interrupt our sleep.  It was very cold weather and fuel was scarce.
 Indians brought brush and bushes several miles on their backs; and when
 we could catch a laden Indian it was well--and when we could not (which
 was the rule, not the exception), we shivered and bore it.
 
 I confess, without shame, that I expected to find masses of silver lying
--**--**--
 of the cabin and I could point it out at any moment.  Smothered hilarity
 began to oppress me, presently.  It was hard to resist the impulse to
 burst out with exultation and reveal everything; but I did resist.  I
 said within myself that I would filter the great news through my lips
 calmly and be serene as a summer morning while I watched its effect in
 their faces.  I said:
 
 "Where have you all been?"
 
 "Prospecting."
 
 "What did you find?"
 
 "Nothing."
 
 "Nothing?  What do you think of the country?"
 
 "Can't tell, yet," said Mr. Ballou, who was an old gold miner, and had
 likewise had considerable experience among the silver mines.
 
 "Well, haven't you formed any sort of opinion?"
 
 "Yes, a sort of a one.  It's fair enough here, may be, but overrated.
 Seven thousand dollar ledges are scarce, though.
 
 "That Sheba may be rich enough, but we don't own it; and besides, the rock
 is so full of base metals that all the science in the world can't work
 it.  We'll not starve, here, but we'll not get rich, I'm afraid."
 
 "So you think the prospect is pretty poor?"
 
 "No name for it!"
 
 "Well, we'd better go back, hadn't we?"
 
 "Oh, not yet--of course not.  We'll try it a riffle, first."
 
 "Suppose, now--this is merely a supposition, you know--suppose you could
 find a ledge that would yield, say, a hundred and fifty dollars a ton
 --would that satisfy you?"
 
 "Try us once!" from the whole party.
 
 "Or suppose--merely a supposition, of course--suppose you were to find a
 ledge that would yield two thousand dollars a ton--would that satisfy
 you?"
 
 "Here--what do you mean?  What are you coming at?  Is there some mystery
 behind all this?"
 
 "Never mind.  I am not saying anything.  You know perfectly well there
 are no rich mines here--of course you do.  Because you have been around
--**--**--
 our mine; but that the wall or ledge of rock called the "Monarch of the
 Mountains," extended down hundreds and hundreds of feet into the earth
 --he illustrated by saying it was like a curb-stone, and maintained a
 nearly uniform thickness-say twenty feet--away down into the bowels of
 the earth, and was perfectly distinct from the casing rock on each side
 of it; and that it kept to itself, and maintained its distinctive
 character always, no matter how deep it extended into the earth or how
 far it stretched itself through and across the hills and valleys.  He
 said it might be a mile deep and ten miles long, for all we knew; and
 that wherever we bored into it above ground or below, we would find gold
 and silver in it, but no gold or silver in the meaner rock it was cased
 between.  And he said that down in the great depths of the ledge was its
 richness, and the deeper it went the richer it grew.  Therefore, instead
 of working here on the surface, we must either bore down into the rock
 with a shaft till we came to where it was rich--say a hundred feet or so
 --or else we must go down into the valley and bore a long tunnel into the
 mountain side and tap the ledge far under the earth.  To do either was
 plainly the labor of months; for we could blast and bore only a few feet
 a day--some five or six.  But this was not all.  He said that after we
 got the ore out it must be hauled in wagons to a distant silver-mill,
 ground up, and the silver extracted by a tedious and costly process.  Our
 fortune seemed a century away!
 
 But we went to work.  We decided to sink a shaft.  So, for a week we
--**--**--
 gold?  And the streak of silver?  That's from the Uncle Abe.  There's a
 hundred thousand tons like that in sight!  Right in sight, mind you!
 And when we get down on it and the ledge comes in solid, it will be the
 richest thing in the world!  Look at the assay!  I don't want you to
 believe me--look at the assay!"
 
 Then he would get out a greasy sheet of paper which showed that the
 portion of rock assayed had given evidence of containing silver and gold
 in the proportion of so many hundreds or thousands of dollars to the ton.
 
 
 I little knew, then, that the custom was to hunt out the richest piece of
 rock and get it assayed!  Very often, that piece, the size of a filbert,
 was the only fragment in a ton that had a particle of metal in it--and
 yet the assay made it pretend to represent the average value of the ton
 of rubbish it came from!
 
 On such a system of assaying as that, the Humboldt world had gone crazy.
 On the authority of such assays its newspaper correspondents were
 frothing about rock worth four and seven thousand dollars a ton!
 
 And does the reader remember, a few pages back, the calculations, of a
 quoted correspondent, whereby the ore is to be mined and shipped all the
 way to England, the metals extracted, and the gold and silver contents
 received back by the miners as clear profit, the copper, antimony and
 other things in the ore being sufficient to pay all the expenses
 incurred?  Everybody's head was full of such "calculations" as those
 --such raving insanity, rather.  Few people took work into their
 calculations--or outlay of money either; except the work and expenditures
 of other people.
 
 We never touched our tunnel or our shaft again.  Why?  Because we judged
--**--**--
 when he died."
 
 "Was that all that you said?"
 
 "Yes, that was all."
 
 "Didn't say nothing but that?"
 
 "No--nothing."
 
 Then an uncomfortable silence.
 
 Arkansas played with his glass a moment, lolling on his elbows on the
 counter.  Then he meditatively scratched his left shin with his right
 boot, while the awkward silence continued.  But presently he loafed away
 toward the stove, looking dissatisfied; roughly shouldered two or three
 men out of a comfortable position; occupied it himself, gave a sleeping
 dog a kick that sent him howling under a bench, then spread his long legs
 and his blanket-coat tails apart and proceeded to warm his back.  In a
 little while he fell to grumbling to himself, and soon he slouched back
 to the bar and said:
 
 "Lan'lord, what's your idea for rakin' up old personalities and blowin'
 about your father?  Ain't this company agreeable to you?  Ain't it?  If
 this company ain't agreeable to you, p'r'aps we'd better leave.  Is that
 your idea?  Is that what you're coming at?"
 
 "Why bless your soul, Arkansas, I warn't thinking of such a thing.  My
 father and my mother--"
 
 "Lan'lord, don't crowd a man!  Don't do it.  If nothing'll do you but a
 disturbance, out with it like a man ('ic)--but don't rake up old bygones
 and fling'em in the teeth of a passel of people that wants to be
 peaceable if they could git a chance.  What's the matter with you this
 mornin', anyway?  I never see a man carry on so."
 
 "Arkansas, I reely didn't mean no harm, and I won't go on with it if it's
 onpleasant to you.  I reckon my licker's got into my head, and what with
 the flood, and havin' so many to feed and look out for--"
 
 "So that's what's a-ranklin' in your heart, is it?  You want us to leave
--**--**--
 placid comfort compared to it.  There was a sudden leap and stir of blood
 that had been asleep for an hour, and as sudden a rousing of all the
 drowsing activities in our minds and bodies.  We were alive and awake at
 once--and shaking and quaking with consternation, too.  There was an
 instant halting and dismounting, a bending low and an anxious scanning of
 the road-bed.  Useless, of course; for if a faint depression could not be
 discerned from an altitude of four or five feet above it, it certainly
 could not with one's nose nearly against it.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXII.
 
 We seemed to be in a road, but that was no proof.  We tested this by
 walking off in various directions--the regular snow-mounds and the
 regular avenues between them convinced each man that he had found the
 true road, and that the others had found only false ones.  Plainly the
 situation was desperate.  We were cold and stiff and the horses were
 tired.  We decided to build a sage-brush fire and camp out till morning.
 This was wise, because if we were wandering from the right road and the
 snow-storm continued another day our case would be the next thing to
 hopeless if we kept on.
 
 All agreed that a camp fire was what would come nearest to saving us,
 now, and so we set about building it.  We could find no matches, and so
 we tried to make shift with the pistols.  Not a man in the party had ever
 tried to do such a thing before, but not a man in the party doubted that
 it could be done, and without any trouble--because every man in the party
 had read about it in books many a time and had naturally come to believe
 it, with trusting simplicity, just as he had long ago accepted and
--**--**--
 pure and blemishless without eschewing them.  "And therefore," continued
 he, "in doing this act I already feel more in sympathy with that
 spiritual saturnalia necessary to entire and obsolete reform."  These
 rolling syllables touched him as no intelligible eloquence could have
 done, and the old man sobbed with a mournfulness not unmingled with
 satisfaction.
 
 My own remarks were of the same tenor as those of my comrades, and I know
 that the feelings that prompted them were heartfelt and sincere.  We were
 all sincere, and all deeply moved and earnest, for we were in the
 presence of death and without hope.  I threw away my pipe, and in doing
 it felt that at last I was free of a hated vice and one that had ridden
 me like a tyrant all my days.  While I yet talked, the thought of the
 good I might have done in the world and the still greater good I might
 now do, with these new incentives and higher and better aims to guide me
 if I could only be spared a few years longer, overcame me and the tears
 came again.  We put our arms about each other's necks and awaited the
 warning drowsiness that precedes death by freezing.
 
 It came stealing over us presently, and then we bade each other a last
 farewell.  A delicious dreaminess wrought its web about my yielding
 senses, while the snow-flakes wove a winding sheet about my conquered
 body.  Oblivion came.  The battle of life was done.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXIII.
 
 I do not know how long I was in a state of forgetfulness, but it seemed
 an age.  A vague consciousness grew upon me by degrees, and then came a
 gathering anguish of pain in my limbs and through all my body.  I
 shuddered.  The thought flitted through my brain, "this is death--this is
--**--**--
 for the pure gratification of it and partly because his salary was
 Territorially meagre (which is a strong expression).  Now the older
 citizens of a new territory look down upon the rest of the world with a
 calm, benevolent compassion, as long as it keeps out of the way--when it
 gets in the way they snub it.  Sometimes this latter takes the shape of a
 practical joke.
 
 One morning Dick Hyde rode furiously up to General Buncombe's door in
 Carson city and rushed into his presence without stopping to tie his
 horse.  He seemed much excited.  He told the General that he wanted him
 to conduct a suit for him and would pay him five hundred dollars if he
 achieved a victory.  And then, with violent gestures and a world of
 profanity, he poured out his grief.  He said it was pretty well known
 that for some years he had been farming (or ranching as the more
 customary term is) in Washoe District, and making a successful thing of
 it, and furthermore it was known that his ranch was situated just in the
 edge of the valley, and that Tom Morgan owned a ranch immediately above
 it on the mountain side.
 
 And now the trouble was, that one of those hated and dreaded land-slides
 had come and slid Morgan's ranch, fences, cabins, cattle, barns and
 everything down on top of his ranch and exactly covered up every single
 vestige of his property, to a depth of about thirty-eight feet.  Morgan
 was in possession and refused to vacate the premises--said he was
 occupying his own cabin and not interfering with anybody else's--and said
 the cabin was standing on the same dirt and same ranch it had always
 stood on, and he would like to see anybody make him vacate.
 
 "And when I reminded him," said Hyde, weeping, "that it was on top of my
--**--**--
 a creamy paste.  The minutest particles were driven through a fine wire
 screen which fitted close around the battery, and were washed into great
 tubs warmed by super-heated steam--amalgamating pans, they are called.
 The mass of pulp in the pans was kept constantly stirred up by revolving
 "mullers."  A quantity of quicksilver was kept always in the battery, and
 this seized some of the liberated gold and silver particles and held on
 to them; quicksilver was shaken in a fine shower into the pans, also,
 about every half hour, through a buckskin sack.  Quantities of coarse
 salt and sulphate of copper were added, from time to time to assist the
 amalgamation by destroying base metals which coated the gold and silver
 and would not let it unite with the quicksilver.
 
 All these tiresome things we had to attend to constantly.  Streams of
 dirty water flowed always from the pans and were carried off in broad
 wooden troughs to the ravine.  One would not suppose that atoms of gold
 and silver would float on top of six inches of water, but they did; and
 in order to catch them, coarse blankets were laid in the troughs, and
 little obstructing "riffles" charged with quicksilver were placed here
 and there across the troughs also.  These riffles had to be cleaned and
 the blankets washed out every evening, to get their precious
 accumulations--and after all this eternity of trouble one third of the
 silver and gold in a ton of rock would find its way to the end of the
 troughs in the ravine at last and have to be worked over again some day.
 There is nothing so aggravating as silver milling.  There never was any
 idle time in that mill.  There was always something to do.  It is a pity
 that Adam could not have gone straight out of Eden into a quartz mill, in
--**--**--
 We put our pile of quicksilver balls into an iron retort that had a pipe
 leading from it to a pail of water, and then applied a roasting heat.
 The quicksilver turned to vapor, escaped through the pipe into the pail,
 and the water turned it into good wholesome quicksilver again.
 Quicksilver is very costly, and they never waste it.  On opening the
 retort, there was our week's work--a lump of pure white, frosty looking
 silver, twice as large as a man's head.  Perhaps a fifth of the mass was
 gold, but the color of it did not show--would not have shown if two
 thirds of it had been gold.  We melted it up and made a solid brick of it
 by pouring it into an iron brick-mould.
 
 By such a tedious and laborious process were silver bricks obtained.
 This mill was but one of many others in operation at the time.  The first
 one in Nevada was built at Egan Canyon and was a small insignificant
 affair and compared most unfavorably with some of the immense
 establishments afterwards located at Virginia City and elsewhere.
 
 From our bricks a little corner was chipped off for the "fire-assay"--a
 method used to determine the proportions of gold, silver and base metals
 in the mass.  This is an interesting process.  The chip is hammered out
 as thin as paper and weighed on scales so fine and sensitive that if you
 weigh a two-inch scrap of paper on them and then write your name on the
 paper with a course, soft pencil and weigh it again, the scales will take
 marked notice of the addition.
 
 Then a little lead (also weighed) is rolled up with the flake of silver
 and the two are melted at a great heat in a small vessel called a cupel,
--**--**--
 entered into a conspiracy against him, and let some prominent citizens
 into the secret in order to show that they meant fairly.  Then they broke
 a little fragment off a carpenter's grindstone and got a stranger to take
 it to the popular scientist and get it assayed.  In the course of an hour
 the result came--whereby it appeared that a ton of that rock would yield
 $1,184.40 in silver and $366.36 in gold!
 
 Due publication of the whole matter was made in the paper, and the
 popular assayer left town "between two days."
 
 I will remark, in passing, that I only remained in the milling business
 one week.  I told my employer I could not stay longer without an advance
 in my wages; that I liked quartz milling, indeed was infatuated with it;
 that I had never before grown so tenderly attached to an occupation in so
 short a time; that nothing, it seemed to me, gave such scope to
 intellectual activity as feeding a battery and screening tailings, and
 nothing so stimulated the moral attributes as retorting bullion and
 washing blankets--still, I felt constrained to ask an increase of salary.
 He said he was paying me ten dollars a week, and thought it a good round
 sum.  How much did I want?
 
 I said about four hundred thousand dollars a month, and board, was about
 all I could reasonably ask, considering the hard times.
 
 I was ordered off the premises!  And yet, when I look back to those days
 and call to mind the exceeding hardness of the labor I performed in that
 mill, I only regret that I did not ask him seven hundred thousand.
 
 Shortly after this I began to grow crazy, along with the rest of the
 population, about the mysterious and wonderful "cement mine," and to make
--**--**--
 down to Welch's, right away."
 
 They left and I was glad.  I did not care whither they went, so they
 went.  I was willing they should visit Welch, and the sooner the better.
 
 As soon as they closed their cabin door my comrades emerged from the
 gloom; they had caught the horses and were waiting for a clear coast
 again.  We remounted the cargo on the pack horse and got under way, and
 as day broke we reached the "divide" and joined Van Dorn.  Then we
 journeyed down into the valley of the Lake, and feeling secure, we halted
 to cook breakfast, for we were tired and sleepy and hungry.  Three hours
 later the rest of the population filed over the "divide" in a long
 procession, and drifted off out of sight around the borders of the Lake!
 
 Whether or not my accident had produced this result we never knew, but at
 least one thing was certain--the secret was out and Whiteman would not
 enter upon a search for the cement mine this time.  We were filled with
 chagrin.
 
 We held a council and decided to make the best of our misfortune and
 enjoy a week's holiday on the borders of the curious Lake.  Mono, it is
 sometimes called, and sometimes the "Dead Sea of California."  It is one
 of the strangest freaks of Nature to be found in any land, but it is
 hardly ever mentioned in print and very seldom visited, because it lies
 away off the usual routes of travel and besides is so difficult to get at
 that only men content to endure the roughest life will consent to take
 upon themselves the discomforts of such a trip.  On the morning of our
 second day, we traveled around to a remote and particularly wild spot on
--**--**--
 our boat, and sailed a quarter of a mile, and the job was complete, all
 to the wringing out.  If we threw the water on our heads and gave them a
 rub or so, the white lather would pile up three inches high.  This water
 is not good for bruised places and abrasions of the skin.  We had a
 valuable dog.  He had raw places on him.  He had more raw places on him
 than sound ones.  He was the rawest dog I almost ever saw.  He jumped
 overboard one day to get away from the flies.  But it was bad judgment.
 In his condition, it would have been just as comfortable to jump into the
 fire.
 
 The alkali water nipped him in all the raw places simultaneously, and he
 struck out for the shore with considerable interest.  He yelped and
 barked and howled as he went--and by the time he got to the shore there
 was no bark to him--for he had barked the bark all out of his inside, and
 the alkali water had cleaned the bark all off his outside, and he
 probably wished he had never embarked in any such enterprise.  He ran
 round and round in a circle, and pawed  the earth and clawed the air, and
 threw double somersaults, sometimes backward and sometimes forward, in
 the most extraordinary manner.  He was not a demonstrative dog, as a
 general thing, but rather of a grave and serious turn of mind, and I
 never saw him take so much interest in anything before.  He finally
 struck out over the mountains, at a gait which we estimated at about two
 hundred and fifty miles an hour, and he is going yet.  This was about
 nine years ago.  We look for what is left of him along here every day.
--**--**--
 and drove partly through the weather-boarding beyond.  I was as white as
 a sheet and as weak as a kitten and speechless.  But the Indian betrayed
 no trepidation, no distress, not even discomfort.  He simply stopped
 washing, leaned forward and surveyed the clean, blank ground a moment,
 and then remarked:
 
 "Mph!  Dam stove heap gone!"--and resumed his scrubbing as placidly as if
 it were an entirely customary thing for a stove to do.  I will explain,
 that "heap" is "Injun-English" for "very much."  The reader will perceive
 the exhaustive expressiveness of it in the present instance.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XL.
 I now come to a curious episode--the most curious, I think, that had yet
 accented my slothful, valueless, heedless career.  Out of a hillside
 toward the upper end of the town, projected a wall of reddish looking
 quartz-croppings, the exposed comb of a silver-bearing ledge that
 extended deep down into the earth, of course.  It was owned by a company
 entitled the "Wide West."  There was a shaft sixty or seventy feet deep
 on the under side of the croppings, and everybody was acquainted with the
 rock that came from it--and tolerably rich rock it was, too, but nothing
 extraordinary.  I will remark here, that although to the inexperienced
 stranger all the quartz of a particular "district" looks about alike, an
 old resident of the camp can take a glance at a mixed pile of rock,
 separate the fragments and tell you which mine each came from, as easily
 as a confectioner can separate and classify the various kinds and
 qualities of candy in a mixed heap of the article.
 
 All at once the town was thrown into a state of extraordinary excitement.
 In mining parlance the Wide West had "struck it rich!"  Everybody went to
 see the new developments, and for some days there was such a crowd of
--**--**--
 "All right."
 
 Another pause.
 
 "Where are you going to live?"  said Higbie.
 
 "San Francisco."
 
 "That's me!"
 
 Pause.
 
 "Too high--too much climbing"--from Higbie.
 
 "What is?"
 
 "I was thinking of Russian Hill--building a house up there."
 
 "Too much climbing?  Shan't you keep a carriage?"
 
 "Of course.  I forgot that."
 
 Pause.
 
 "Cal., what kind of a house are you going to build?"
 
 "I was thinking about that.  Three-story and an attic."
 
 "But what kind?"
 
 "Well, I don't hardly know.  Brick, I suppose."
 
 "Brick--bosh."
 
 "Why?  What is your idea?"
 
 "Brown stone front--French plate glass--billiard-room off the
 dining-room--statuary and paintings--shrubbery and two-acre grass plat
 --greenhouse--iron dog on the front stoop--gray horses--landau, and a
 coachman with a bug on his hat!"
 
 "By George!"
 
 A long pause.
 
 "Cal., when are you going to Europe?"
 
 "Well--I hadn't thought of that.  When are you?"
 
 "In the Spring."
 
 "Going to be gone all summer?"
 
 "All summer!  I shall remain there three years."
 
 "No--but are you in earnest?"
 
 "Indeed I am."
 
 "I will go along too."
 
 "Why of course you will."
 
 "What part of Europe shall you go to?"
 
 "All parts.  France, England, Germany--Spain, Italy, Switzerland, Syria,
 Greece, Palestine, Arabia, Persia, Egypt--all over--everywhere."
 
 "I'm agreed."
 
 "All right."
 
 "Won't it be a swell trip!"
 
 "We'll spend forty or fifty thousand dollars trying to make it one,
 anyway."
 
 Another long pause.
 
 "Higbie, we owe the butcher six dollars, and he has been threatening to
 stop our--"
 
 "Hang the butcher!"
 
 "Amen."
 
 And so it went on.  By three o'clock we found it was no use, and so we
 got up and played cribbage and smoked pipes till sunrise.  It was my week
 to cook.  I always hated cooking--now, I abhorred it.
 
 The news was all over town.  The former excitement was great--this one
 was greater still.  I walked the streets serene and happy.  Higbie said
--**--**--
 I sat down, in the cabin, and gave myself up to solid misery--so to
 speak.  Now in pleasanter days I had amused myself with writing letters
 to the chief paper of the Territory, the Virginia Daily Territorial
 Enterprise, and had always been surprised when they appeared in print.
 My good opinion of the editors had steadily declined; for it seemed to me
 that they might have found something better to fill up with than my
 literature.  I had found a letter in the post office as I came home from
 the hill side, and finally I opened it.  Eureka!  [I never did know what
 Eureka meant, but it seems to be as proper a word to heave in as any when
 no other that sounds pretty offers.] It was a deliberate offer to me of
 Twenty-Five Dollars a week to come up to Virginia and be city editor of
 the Enterprise.
 
 I would have challenged the publisher in the "blind lead" days--I wanted
 to fall down and worship him, now.  Twenty-Five Dollars a week--it looked
 like bloated luxury--a fortune a sinful and lavish waste of money.
 But my transports cooled when I thought of my inexperience and consequent
 unfitness for the position--and straightway, on top of this, my long
 array of failures rose up before me.  Yet if I refused this place I must
 presently become dependent upon somebody for my bread, a thing
 necessarily distasteful to a man who had never experienced such a
 humiliation since he was thirteen years old.  Not much to be proud of,
 since it is so common--but then it was all I had to be proud of.  So I
 was scared into being a city editor.  I would have declined, otherwise.
 Necessity is the mother of "taking chances."  I do not doubt that if, at
--**--**--
 desire to do it.  I wrote up the murder with a hungry attention to
 details, and when it was finished experienced but one regret--namely,
 that they had not hanged my benefactor on the spot, so that I could work
 him up too.
 
 Next I discovered some emigrant wagons going into camp on the plaza and
 found that they had lately come through the hostile Indian country and
 had fared rather roughly.  I made the best of the item that the
 circumstances permitted, and felt that if I were not confined within
 rigid limits by the presence of the reporters of the other papers I could
 add particulars that would make the article much more interesting.
 However, I found one wagon that was going on to California, and made some
 judicious inquiries of the proprietor.  When I learned, through his short
 and surly answers to my cross-questioning, that he was certainly going on
 and would not be in the city next day to make trouble, I got ahead of the
 other papers, for I took down his list of names and added his party to
 the killed and wounded.  Having more scope here, I put this wagon through
 an Indian fight that to this day has no parallel in history.
 
 My two columns were filled.  When I read them over in the morning I felt
 that I had found my legitimate occupation at last.  I reasoned within
 myself that news, and stirring news, too, was what a paper needed, and I
 felt that I was peculiarly endowed with the ability to furnish it.
 Mr. Goodman said that I was as good a reporter as Dan.  I desired no
 higher commendation.  With encouragement like that, I felt that I could
 take my pen and murder all the immigrants on the plains if need be and
--**--**--
 "hurdy-gurdy houses," wide-open gambling palaces, political pow-wows,
 civic processions, street fights, murders, inquests, riots, a whiskey
 mill every fifteen steps, a Board of Aldermen, a Mayor, a City Surveyor,
 a City Engineer, a Chief of the Fire Department, with First, Second and
 Third Assistants, a Chief of Police, City Marshal and a large police
 force, two Boards of Mining Brokers, a dozen breweries and half a dozen
 jails and station-houses in full operation, and some talk of building a
 church.  The "flush times" were in magnificent flower!  Large fire-proof
 brick buildings were going up in the principal streets, and the wooden
 suburbs were spreading out in all directions.  Town lots soared up to
 prices that were amazing.
 
 The great "Comstock lode" stretched its opulent length straight through
 the town from north to south, and every mine on it was in diligent
 process of development.  One of these mines alone employed six hundred
 and seventy-five men, and in the matter of elections the adage was, "as
 the 'Gould and Curry' goes, so goes the city."  Laboring men's wages were
 four and six dollars a day, and they worked in three "shifts" or gangs,
 and the blasting and picking and shoveling went on without ceasing, night
 and day.
 
 The "city" of Virginia roosted royally midway up the steep side of Mount
 Davidson, seven thousand two hundred feet above the level of the sea, and
 in the clear Nevada atmosphere was visible from a distance of fifty
 miles!  It claimed a population of fifteen thousand to eighteen thousand,
 and all day long half of this little army swarmed the streets like bees
 and the other half swarmed among the drifts and tunnels of the
 "Comstock," hundreds of feet down in the earth directly under those same
 streets.  Often we felt our chairs jar, and heard the faint boom of a
--**--**--
 Women plunged into the crowd, trimly attired, fought their way to the
 cart with their coin, and emerged again, by and by, with their apparel in
 a state of hopeless dilapidation.  It was the wildest mob Virginia had
 ever seen and the most determined and ungovernable; and when at last it
 abated its fury and dispersed, it had not a penny in its pocket.
 
 To use its own phraseology, it came there "flush" and went away "busted."
 
 After that, the Commission got itself into systematic working order, and
 for weeks the contributions flowed into its treasury in a generous
 stream.  Individuals and all sorts of organizations levied upon
 themselves a regular weekly tax for the sanitary fund, graduated
 according to their means, and there was not another grand universal
 outburst till the famous "Sanitary Flour Sack" came our way.  Its history
 is peculiar and interesting.  A former schoolmate of mine, by the name of
 Reuel Gridley, was living at the little city of Austin, in the Reese
 river country, at this time, and was the Democratic candidate for mayor.
 He and the Republican candidate made an agreement that the defeated man
 should be publicly presented with a fifty-pound sack of flour by the
 successful one, and should carry it home on his shoulder.  Gridley was
 defeated.  The new mayor gave him the sack of flour, and he shouldered it
 and carried it a mile or two, from Lower Austin to his home in Upper
 Austin, attended by a band of music and the whole population.  Arrived
 there, he said he did not need the flour, and asked what the people
 thought he had better do with it.  A voice said:
 
 "Sell it to the highest bidder, for the benefit of the Sanitary fund."
 
 The suggestion was greeted with a round of applause, and Gridley mounted
--**--**--
 peculiarity of the "flush times" which I could not present so strikingly
 in any other way, and which some mention of was necessary to a realizing
 comprehension of the time and the country.
 
 I was personally acquainted with the majority of the nabobs I have
 referred to, and so, for old acquaintance sake, I have shifted their
 occupations and experiences around in such a way as to keep the Pacific
 public from recognizing these once notorious men.  No longer notorious,
 for the majority of them have drifted back into poverty and obscurity
 again.
 
 In Nevada there used to be current the story of an adventure of two of
 her nabobs, which may or may not have occurred.  I give it for what it is
 worth:
 
 Col. Jim had seen somewhat of the world, and knew more or less of its
 ways; but Col. Jack was from the back settlements of the States, had led
 a life of arduous toil, and had never seen a city.  These two, blessed
 with sudden wealth, projected a visit to New York,--Col. Jack to see the
 sights, and Col. Jim to guard his unsophistication from misfortune.  They
 reached San Francisco in the night, and sailed in the morning.  Arrived
 in New York, Col.  Jack said:
 
 "I've heard tell of carriages all my life, and now I mean to have a ride
 in one; I don't care what it costs.  Come along."
 
 They stepped out on the sidewalk, and Col. Jim called a stylish barouche.
 But Col. Jack said:
 
 "No, sir!  None of your cheap-John turn-outs for me.  I'm here to have a
 good time, and money ain't any object.  I mean to have the nobbiest rig
 that's going.  Now here comes the very trick.  Stop that yaller one with
 the pictures on it--don't you fret--I'll stand all the expenses myself."
--**--**--
 fair to say of Scotty, however, in passing, that he had a warm heart, and
 a strong love for his friends, and never entered into a quarrel when he
 could reasonably keep out of it.  Indeed, it was commonly said that
 whenever one of Scotty's fights was investigated, it always turned out
 that it had originally been no affair of his, but that out of native
 good-heartedness he had dropped in of his own accord to help the man who
 was getting the worst of it.  He and Buck Fanshaw were bosom friends, for
 years, and had often taken adventurous "pot-luck" together.  On one
 occasion, they had thrown off their coats and taken the weaker side in a
 fight among strangers, and after gaining a hard-earned victory, turned
 and found that the men they were helping had deserted early, and not only
 that, but had stolen their coats and made off with them!  But to return
 to Scotty's visit to the minister.  He was on a sorrowful mission, now,
 and his face was the picture of woe.  Being admitted to the presence he
 sat down before the clergyman, placed his fire-hat on an unfinished
 manuscript sermon under the minister's nose, took from it a red silk
 handkerchief, wiped his brow and heaved a sigh of dismal impressiveness,
 explanatory of his business.
 
 He choked, and even shed tears; but with an effort he mastered his voice
 and said in lugubrious tones:
 
 "Are you the duck that runs the gospel-mill next door?"
 
 "Am I the--pardon me, I believe I do not understand?"
 
 With another sigh and a half-sob, Scotty rejoined:
 
 "Why you see we are in a bit of trouble, and the boys thought maybe you
 would give us a lift, if we'd tackle you--that is, if I've got the rights
--**--**--
 
 "Never shook his mother?"
 
 "That's it--any of the boys will tell you so."
 
 "Well, but why should he shake her?"
 
 "That's what I say--but some people does."
 
 "Not people of any repute?"
 
 "Well, some that averages pretty so-so."
 
 "In my opinion the man that would offer personal violence to his own
 mother, ought to--"
 
 "Cheese it, pard; you've banked your ball clean outside the string.
 What I was a drivin' at, was, that he never throwed off on his mother
 --don't you see?  No indeedy.  He give her a house to live in, and town
 lots, and plenty of money; and he looked after her and took care of her
 all the time; and when she was down with the small-pox I'm d---d if he
 didn't set up nights and nuss her himself!  Beg your pardon for saying
 it, but it hopped out too quick for yours truly.
 
 "You've treated me like a gentleman, pard, and I ain't the man to hurt
 your feelings intentional.  I think you're white.  I think you're a
 square man, pard.  I like you, and I'll lick any man that don't.  I'll
 lick him till he can't tell himself from a last year's corpse!  Put it
 there!" [Another fraternal hand-shake--and exit.]
 
 The obsequies were all that "the boys" could desire.  Such a marvel of
 funeral pomp had never been seen in Virginia.  The plumed hearse, the
 dirge-breathing brass bands, the closed marts of business, the flags
 drooping at half mast, the long, plodding procession of uniformed secret
 societies, military battalions and fire companies, draped engines,
 carriages of officials, and citizens in vehicles and on foot, attracted
 multitudes of spectators to the sidewalks, roofs and windows; and for
 years afterward, the degree of grandeur attained by any civic display in
 Virginia was determined by comparison with Buck Fanshaw's funeral.
--**--**--
 wisdom could contrive.  For how could he imagine that we simpletons would
 go on using his jury plan after circumstances had stripped it of its
 usefulness, any more than he could imagine that we would go on using his
 candle-clock after we had invented chronometers?  In his day news could
 not travel fast, and hence he could easily find a jury of honest,
 intelligent men who had not heard of the case they were called to try
 --but in our day of telegraphs and newspapers his plan compels us to swear
 in juries composed of fools and rascals, because the system rigidly
 excludes honest men and men of brains.
 
 I remember one of those sorrowful farces, in Virginia, which we call a
 jury trial.  A noted desperado killed Mr. B., a good citizen, in the most
 wanton and cold-blooded way.  Of course the papers were full of it, and
 all men capable of reading, read about it.  And of course all men not
 deaf and dumb and idiotic, talked about it.  A jury-list was made out,
 and Mr. B. L., a prominent banker and a valued citizen, was questioned
 precisely as he would have been questioned in any court in America:
 
 "Have you heard of this homicide?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Have you held conversations upon the subject?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Have you formed or expressed opinions about it?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Have you read the newspaper accounts of it?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "We do not want you."
 
 A minister, intelligent, esteemed, and greatly respected; a merchant of
 high character and known probity; a mining superintendent of intelligence
 and unblemished reputation; a quartz mill owner of excellent standing,
 were all questioned in the same way, and all set aside.  Each said the
 public talk and the newspaper reports had not so biased his mind but that
 sworn testimony would overthrow his previously formed opinions and enable
--**--**--
       Reeder said it was a most cowardly act to shoot a man in such a way,
       giving him "no show."  Gumbert said that Williams had "as good a
       show as he gave Billy Brown," meaning the man killed by Williams
       last March.  Reeder said it was a d---d lie, that Williams had no
       show at all.  At this, Gumbert drew a knife and stabbed Reeder,
       cutting him in two places in the back.  One stroke of the knife cut
       into the sleeve of Reeder's coat and passed downward in a slanting
       direction through his clothing, and entered his body at the small of
       the back; another blow struck more squarely, and made a much more
       dangerous wound.  Gumbert gave himself up to the officers of
       justice, and was shortly after discharged by Justice Atwill, on his
       own recognizance, to appear for trial at six o'clock in the evening.
       In the meantime Reeder had been taken into the office of Dr. Owens,
       where his wounds were properly dressed.  One of his wounds was
       considered quite dangerous, and it was thought by many that it would
       prove fatal.  But being considerably under the influence of liquor,
       Reeder did not feel his wounds as he otherwise would, and he got up
       and went into the street.  He went to the meat market and renewed
       his quarrel with Gumbert, threatening his life.  Friends tried to
       interfere to put a stop to the quarrel and get the parties away from
       each other.  In the Fashion Saloon Reeder made threats against the
       life of Gumbert, saying he would kill him, and it is said that he
       requested the officers not to arrest Gumbert, as he intended to kill
       him.  After these threats Gumbert went off and procured a
       double-barreled shot gun, loaded with buck-shot or revolver balls,
--**--**--
 there was no government; the islands belonged to Peru, and Peru was far
 away; she had no official representative on the ground; and neither had
 any other nation.
 
 However, Capt. Ned was not perplexing his head about such things.  They
 concerned him not.  He was boiling with rage and furious for justice.
 At nine o'clock at night he loaded a double-barreled gun with slugs,
 fished out a pair of handcuffs, got a ship's lantern, summoned his
 quartermaster, and went ashore.  He said:
 
 "Do you see that ship there at the dock?"
 
 "Ay-ay, sir."
 
 "It's the Venus."
 
 "Ay-ay, sir."
 
 "You--you know me."
 
 "Ay-ay, sir."
 
 "Very well, then.  Take the lantern.  Carry it just under your chin.
 I'll walk behind you and rest this gun-barrel on your shoulder, p'inting
 forward--so.  Keep your lantern well up so's I can see things ahead of
 you good.  I'm going to march in on Noakes--and take him--and jug the
 other chaps.  If you flinch--well, you know me."
 
 "Ay-ay, sir."
 
 In this order they filed aboard softly, arrived at Noakes's den, the
 quartermaster pushed the door open, and the lantern revealed the three
 desperadoes sitting on the floor.  Capt.  Ned said:
 
 "I'm Ned Blakely.  I've got you under fire.  Don't you move without
 orders--any of you.  You two kneel down in the corner; faces to the wall
 --now.  Bill Noakes, put these handcuffs on; now come up close.
 Quartermaster, fasten 'em.  All right.  Don't stir, sir.  Quartermaster,
 put the key in the outside of the door.  Now, men, I'm going to lock you
 two in; and if you try to burst through this door--well, you've heard of
 me.  Bill Noakes, fall in ahead, and march.  All set.  Quartermaster,
 lock the door."
 
 Noakes spent the night on board Blakely's ship, a prisoner under strict
 guard.  Early in the morning Capt. Ned called in all the sea-captains in
--**--**--
 The Weekly Occidental, "devoted to literature," made its appearance in
 Virginia.  All the literary people were engaged to write for it.  Mr. F.
 was to edit it.  He was a felicitous skirmisher with a pen, and a man who
 could say happy things in a crisp, neat way.  Once, while editor of the
 Union, he had disposed of a labored, incoherent, two-column attack made
 upon him by a contemporary, with a single line, which, at first glance,
 seemed to contain a solemn and tremendous compliment--viz.: "THE LOGIC OF
 OUR ADVERSARY RESEMBLES THE PEACE OF GOD,"--and left it to the reader's
 memory and after-thought to invest the remark with another and "more
 different" meaning by supplying for himself and at his own leisure the
 rest of the Scripture--"in that it passeth understanding."  He once said
 of a little, half-starved, wayside community that had no subsistence
 except what they could get by preying upon chance passengers who stopped
 over with them a day when traveling by the overland stage, that in their
 Church service they had altered the Lord's Prayer to read: "Give us this
 day our daily stranger!"
 
 We expected great things of the Occidental.  Of course it could not get
 along without an original novel, and so we made arrangements to hurl into
 the work the full strength of the company.  Mrs. F. was an able romancist
 of the ineffable school--I know no other name to apply to a school whose
 heroes are all dainty and all perfect.  She wrote the opening chapter,
 and introduced a lovely blonde simpleton who talked nothing but pearls
 and poetry and who was virtuous to the verge of eccentricity.  She also
 introduced a young French Duke of aggravated refinement, in love with the
 blonde.  Mr. F. followed next week, with a brilliant lawyer who set about
--**--**--
 to be of the party.  They judged that the Duke's constant presence and
 the lawyer's protracted absence would do the rest--for they did not
 invite the lawyer.
 
 So they set sail in a steamer for America--and the third day out, when
 their sea-sickness called truce and permitted them to take their first
 meal at the public table, behold there sat the lawyer!  The Duke and
 party made the best of an awkward situation; the voyage progressed, and
 the vessel neared America.
 
 But, by and by, two hundred miles off New Bedford, the ship took fire;
 she burned to the water's edge; of all her crew and passengers, only
 thirty were saved.  They floated about the sea half an afternoon and all
 night long.  Among them were our friends.  The lawyer, by superhuman
 exertions, had saved the blonde and her parents, swimming back and forth
 two hundred yards and bringing one each time--(the girl first).  The Duke
 had saved himself.  In the morning two whale ships arrived on the scene
 and sent their boats.  The weather was stormy and the embarkation was
 attended with much confusion and excitement.  The lawyer did his duty
 like a man; helped his exhausted and insensible blonde, her parents and
 some others into a boat (the Duke helped himself in); then a child fell
 overboard at the other end of the raft and the lawyer rushed thither and
 helped half a dozen people fish it out, under the stimulus of its
 mother's screams.  Then he ran back--a few seconds too late--the blonde's
 boat was under way.  So he had to take the other boat, and go to the
 other ship.  The storm increased and drove the vessels out of sight of
 each other--drove them whither it would.
 
 When it calmed, at the end of three days, the blonde's ship was seven
--**--**--
 And mothers that grieved would be.
 
 But of all the children of misery there
 On that poor sinking frame,
 But one spake words of hope and faith,
 And I worshipped as they came:
 Said Dollinger the pilot man,
 --(O brave heart, strong and true!)
 --"Fear not, but trust in Dollinger,
 For he will fetch you through."
 
 Lo!  scarce the words have passed his lips
 The dauntless prophet say'th,
 When every soul about him seeth
 A wonder crown his faith!
 
 "And count ye all, both great and small,
 As numbered with the dead:
 For mariner for forty year,
 On Erie, boy and man,
 I never yet saw such a storm,
 Or one't with it began!"
 
 So overboard a keg of nails
 And anvils three we threw,
 Likewise four bales of gunny-sacks,
 Two hundred pounds of glue,
 Two sacks of corn, four ditto wheat,
 A box of books, a cow,
 A violin, Lord Byron's works,
 A rip-saw and a sow.
 
 A curve!  a curve!  the dangers grow!
 "Labbord!--stabbord!--s-t-e-a-d-y!--so!
 --Hard-a-port, Dol!--hellum-a-lee!
 Haw the head mule!--the aft one gee!
 Luff!--bring her to the wind!"
 
 For straight a farmer brought a plank,
 --(Mysteriously inspired)
 --And laying it unto the ship,
 In silent awe retired.
 
 Then every sufferer stood amazed
 That pilot man before;
 A moment stood.  Then wondering turned,
 And speechless walked ashore.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER LII.
 
 Since I desire, in this chapter, to say an instructive word or two about
 the silver mines, the reader may take this fair warning and skip, if he
 chooses.  The year 1863 was perhaps the very top blossom and culmination
 of the "flush times."  Virginia swarmed with men and vehicles to that
 degree that the place looked like a very hive--that is when one's vision
 could pierce through the thick fog of alkali dust that was generally
 blowing in summer.  I will say, concerning this dust, that if you drove
--**--**--
 Every now and then, in these days, the boys used to tell me I ought to
 get one Jim Blaine to tell me the stirring story of his grandfather's old
 ram--but they always added that I must not mention the matter unless Jim
 was drunk at the time--just comfortably and sociably drunk.  They kept
 this up until my curiosity was on the rack to hear the story.  I got to
 haunting Blaine; but it was of no use, the boys always found fault with
 his condition; he was often moderately but never satisfactorily drunk.
 I never watched a man's condition with such absorbing interest, such
 anxious solicitude; I never so pined to see a man uncompromisingly drunk
 before.  At last, one evening I hurried to his cabin, for I learned that
 this time his situation was such that even the most fastidious could find
 no fault with it--he was tranquilly, serenely, symmetrically drunk--not a
 hiccup to mar his voice, not a cloud upon his brain thick enough to
 obscure his memory.  As I entered, he was sitting upon an empty
 powder-keg, with a clay pipe in one hand and the other raised to command
 silence.  His face was round, red, and very serious; his throat was bare
 and his hair tumbled; in general appearance and costume he was a stalwart
 miner of the period.  On the pine table stood a candle, and its dim light
 revealed "the boys" sitting here and there on bunks, candle-boxes,
 powder-kegs, etc.  They said:
 
 "Sh--!  Don't speak--he's going to commence."
 
 
                 THE STORY OF THE OLD RAM.
 
 I found a seat at once, and Blaine said:
 
 'I don't reckon them times will ever come again.  There never was a more
 bullier old ram than what he was.  Grandfather fetched him from Illinois
 --got him of a man by the name of Yates--Bill Yates--maybe you might have
--**--**--
 merchant, and Marquette the priest, crossed the country and reached the
 banks of the Mississippi. They went by way of the Great Lakes; and from
 Green Bay, in canoes, by way of Fox River and the Wisconsin. Marquette
 had solemnly contracted, on the feast of the Immaculate Conception, that
 if the Virgin would permit him to discover the great river, he would
 name it Conception, in her honor. He kept his word. In that day, all
 explorers traveled with an outfit of priests. De Soto had twenty-four
 with him. La Salle had several, also. The expeditions were often out of
 meat, and scant of clothes, but they always had the furniture and other
 requisites for the mass; they were always prepared, as one of the quaint
 chroniclers of the time phrased it, to 'explain hell to the savages.'
 
 On the 17th of June, 1673, the canoes of Joliet and Marquette and
 their five subordinates reached the junction of the Wisconsin with the
 Mississippi. Mr. Parkman says: 'Before them a wide and rapid current
 coursed athwart their way, by the foot of lofty heights wrapped thick
 in forests.' He continues: 'Turning southward, they paddled down the
 stream, through a solitude unrelieved by the faintest trace of man.'
 
 A big cat-fish collided with Marquette's canoe, and startled him; and
 reasonably enough, for he had been warned by the Indians that he was
 on a foolhardy journey, and even a fatal one, for the river contained
 a demon 'whose roar could be heard at a great distance, and who would
 engulf them in the abyss where he dwelt.' I have seen a Mississippi
 catfish that was more than six feet long, and weighed two hundred and
 fifty pounds; and if Marquette's fish was the fellow to that one, he had
 a fair right to think the river's roaring demon was come.
--**--**--
 deserts and grassy prairies, watered by a thousand rivers, ranged by
 a thousand warlike tribes, passed beneath the scepter of the Sultan of
 Versailles; and all by virtue of a feeble human voice, inaudible at half
 a mile.'
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 3 Frescoes from the Past
 
 APPARENTLY the river was ready for business, now. But no, the
 distribution of a population along its banks was as calm and deliberate
 and time-devouring a process as the discovery and exploration had been.
 
 Seventy years elapsed, after the exploration, before the river's borders
 had a white population worth considering; and nearly fifty more before
 the river had a commerce. Between La Salle's opening of the river and
 the time when it may be said to have become the vehicle of anything like
 a regular and active commerce, seven sovereigns had occupied the throne
 of England, America had become an independent nation, Louis XIV. and
 Louis XV. had rotted and died, the French monarchy had gone down in
 the red tempest of the revolution, and Napoleon was a name that was
 beginning to be talked about. Truly, there were snails in those days.
 
 The river's earliest commerce was in great barges--keelboats,
 broadhorns. They floated and sailed from the upper rivers to New
 Orleans, changed cargoes there, and were tediously warped and poled back
 by hand. A voyage down and back sometimes occupied nine months. In time
 this commerce increased until it gave employment to hordes of rough and
 hardy men; rude, uneducated, brave, suffering terrific hardships with
 sailor-like stoicism; heavy drinkers, coarse frolickers in moral sties
 like the Natchez-under-the-hill of that day, heavy fighters, reckless
 fellows, every one, elephantinely jolly, foul-witted, profane; prodigal
 of their money, bankrupt at the end of the trip, fond of barbaric
 finery, prodigious braggarts; yet, in the main, honest, trustworthy,
--**--**--
 every time. He flung off a buckskin coat that was all hung with fringes,
 and says, 'You lay thar tell the chawin-up's done;' and flung his hat
 down, which was all over ribbons, and says, 'You lay thar tell his
 sufferin's is over.'
 
 Then he jumped up in the air and cracked his heels together again and
 shouted out--
 
 'Whoo-oop! I'm the old original iron-jawed, brass-mounted,
 copper-bellied corpse-maker from the wilds of Arkansaw!--Look at me!
 I'm the man they call Sudden Death and General Desolation! Sired by a
 hurricane, dam'd by an earthquake, half-brother to the cholera, nearly
 related to the small-pox on the mother's side! Look at me! I take
 nineteen alligators and a bar'l of whiskey for breakfast when I'm in
 robust health, and a bushel of rattlesnakes and a dead body when I'm
 ailing! I split the everlasting rocks with my glance, and I squench the
 thunder when I speak! Whoo-oop! Stand back and give me room according
 to my strength! Blood's my natural drink, and the wails of the dying is
 music to my ear! Cast your eye on me, gentlemen!--and lay low and hold
 your breath, for I'm bout to turn myself loose!'
 
 All the time he was getting this off, he was shaking his head and
 looking fierce, and kind of swelling around in a little circle, tucking
 up his wrist-bands, and now and then straightening up and beating his
 breast with his fist, saying, 'Look at me, gentlemen!' When he got
 through, he jumped up and cracked his heels together three times, and
 let off a roaring 'Whoo-oop! I'm the bloodiest son of a wildcat that
 lives!'
 
 Then the man that had started the row tilted his old slouch hat down
 over his right eye; then he bent stooping forward, with his back sagged
--**--**--
 heels together three times before he lit (they cheered him again), and
 as he come down he shouted out: 'Whoo-oop! bow your neck and spread, for
 the pet child of calamity's a-coming!'
 
 Then the other one went to swelling around and blowing again--the first
 one--the one they called Bob; next, the Child of Calamity chipped in
 again, bigger than ever; then they both got at it at the same time,
 swelling round and round each other and punching their fists most into
 each other's faces, and whooping and jawing like Injuns; then Bob called
 the Child names, and the Child called him names back again: next, Bob
 called him a heap rougher names and the Child come back at him with the
 very worst kind of language; next, Bob knocked the Child's hat off, and
 the Child picked it up and kicked Bob's ribbony hat about six foot; Bob
 went and got it and said never mind, this warn't going to be the last
 of this thing, because he was a man that never forgot and never forgive,
 and so the Child better look out, for there was a time a-coming, just
 as sure as he was a living man, that he would have to answer to him with
 the best blood in his body. The Child said no man was willinger than
 he was for that time to come, and he would give Bob fair warning, now,
 never to cross his path again, for he could never rest till he had waded
 in his blood, for such was his nature, though he was sparing him now on
 account of his family, if he had one.
 
 Both of them was edging away in different directions, growling and
 shaking their heads and going on about what they was going to do; but a
--**--**--
 
 'After dark the off watch didn't turn in; nobody sung, nobody talked;
 the boys didn't scatter around, neither; they sort of huddled together,
 forrard; and for two hours they set there, perfectly still, looking
 steady in the one direction, and heaving a sigh once in a while. And
 then, here comes the bar'l again. She took up her old place. She staid
 there all night; nobody turned in. The storm come on again, after
 midnight. It got awful dark; the rain poured down; hail, too; the
 thunder boomed and roared and bellowed; the wind blowed a hurricane; and
 the lightning spread over everything in big sheets of glare, and showed
 the whole raft as plain as day; and the river lashed up white as milk
 as far as you could see for miles, and there was that bar'l jiggering
 along, same as ever. The captain ordered the watch to man the after
 sweeps for a crossing, and nobody would go--no more sprained ankles for
 them, they said. They wouldn't even walk aft. Well then, just then the
 sky split wide open, with a crash, and the lightning killed two men of
 the after watch, and crippled two more. Crippled them how, says you?
 Why, sprained their ankles!
 
 'The bar'l left in the dark betwixt lightnings, towards dawn. Well, not
 a body eat a bite at breakfast that morning. After that the men loafed
 around, in twos and threes, and talked low together. But none of them
 herded with Dick Allbright. They all give him the cold shake. If he come
 around where any of the men was, they split up and sidled away. They
 wouldn't man the sweeps with him. The captain had all the skiffs hauled
 up on the raft, alongside of his wigwam, and wouldn't let the dead men
--**--**--
 'Aleck Hopkins, sir. Aleck James Hopkins.'
 
 'Well, Aleck, where did you come from, here?'
 
 'From a trading scow. She lays up the bend yonder. I was born on her.
 Pap has traded up and down here all his life; and he told me to swim off
 here, because when you went by he said he would like to get some of you
 to speak to a Mr. Jonas Turner, in Cairo, and tell him--'
 
 'Oh, come!'
 
 'Yes, sir; it's as true as the world; Pap he says--'
 
 'Oh, your grandmother!'
 
 They all laughed, and I tried again to talk, but they broke in on me and
 stopped me.
 
 'Now, looky-here,' says Davy; 'you're scared, and so you talk wild.
 Honest, now, do you live in a scow, or is it a lie?'
 
 'Yes, sir, in a trading scow. She lays up at the head of the bend. But I
 warn't born in her. It's our first trip.'
 
 'Now you're talking! What did you come aboard here, for? To steal?'
 
 'No, sir, I didn't.--It was only to get a ride on the raft. All boys
 does that.'
 
 'Well, I know that. But what did you hide for?'
 
 'Sometimes they drive the boys off.'
 
 'So they do. They might steal. Looky-here; if we let you off this time,
 will you keep out of these kind of scrapes hereafter?'
 
 ''Deed I will, boss. You try me.'
 
 'All right, then. You ain't but little ways from shore. Overboard with
 you, and don't you make a fool of yourself another time this way.--Blast
 it, boy, some raftsmen would rawhide you till you were black and blue!'
 
 I didn't wait to kiss good-bye, but went overboard and broke for shore.
 When Jim come along by and by, the big raft was away out of sight around
--**--**--
 signs of being mightily bored with traveling.
 
 I kept my hat off all the time, and stayed where the wind and the sun
 could strike me, because I wanted to get the bronzed and weather-beaten
 look of an old traveler. Before the second day was half gone I
 experienced a joy which filled me with the purest gratitude; for I saw
 that the skin had begun to blister and peel off my face and neck. I
 wished that the boys and girls at home could see me now.
 
 We reached Louisville in time--at least the neighborhood of it. We stuck
 hard and fast on the rocks in the middle of the river, and lay there
 four days. I was now beginning to feel a strong sense of being a part
 of the boat's family, a sort of infant son to the captain and younger
 brother to the officers. There is no estimating the pride I took in this
 grandeur, or the affection that began to swell and grow in me for those
 people. I could not know how the lordly steamboatman scorns that sort
 of presumption in a mere landsman. I particularly longed to acquire the
 least trifle of notice from the big stormy mate, and I was on the alert
 for an opportunity to do him a service to that end. It came at last. The
 riotous powwow of setting a spar was going on down on the forecastle,
 and I went down there and stood around in the way--or mostly skipping
 out of it--till the mate suddenly roared a general order for somebody to
 bring him a capstan bar. I sprang to his side and said: 'Tell me where
 it is--I'll fetch it!'
 
 If a rag-picker had offered to do a diplomatic service for the Emperor
 of Russia, the monarch could not have been more astounded than the mate
--**--**--
 so I presently gave up trying to, and dozed off to sleep. Pretty soon
 the watchman was back again, and this time he was gruff. I was annoyed.
 I said:--
 
 'What do you want to come bothering around here in the middle of the
 night for. Now as like as not I'll not get to sleep again to-night.'
 
 The watchman said--
 
 'Well, if this an't good, I'm blest.'
 
 The 'off-watch' was just turning in, and I heard some brutal laughter
 from them, and such remarks as 'Hello, watchman! an't the new cub turned
 out yet? He's delicate, likely. Give him some sugar in a rag and send
 for the chambermaid to sing rock-a-by-baby to him.'
 
 About this time Mr. Bixby appeared on the scene. Something like a minute
 later I was climbing the pilot-house steps with some of my clothes on
 and the rest in my arms. Mr. Bixby was close behind, commenting. Here
 was something fresh--this thing of getting up in the middle of the night
 to go to work. It was a detail in piloting that had never occurred to
 me at all. I knew that boats ran all night, but somehow I had never
 happened to reflect that somebody had to get up out of a warm bed to run
 them. I began to fear that piloting was not quite so romantic as I had
 imagined it was; there was something very real and work-like about this
 new phase of it.
 
 It was a rather dingy night, although a fair number of stars were out.
 The big mate was at the wheel, and he had the old tub pointed at a star
 and was holding her straight up the middle of the river. The shores on
 either hand were not much more than half a mile apart, but they seemed
--**--**--
 
 'Well, you're a smart one,' said Mr. Bixby. 'What's the name of the NEXT
 point?'
 
 Once more I didn't know.
 
 'Well, this beats anything. Tell me the name of ANY point or place I
 told you.'
 
 I studied a while and decided that I couldn't.
 
 'Look here! What do you start out from, above Twelve-Mile Point, to
 cross over?'
 
 'I--I--don't know.'
 
 'You--you--don't know?' mimicking my drawling manner of speech. 'What DO
 you know?'
 
 'I--I--nothing, for certain.'
 
 'By the great Caesar's ghost, I believe you! You're the stupidest
 dunderhead I ever saw or ever heard of, so help me Moses! The idea of
 you being a pilot--you! Why, you don't know enough to pilot a cow down a
 lane.'
 
 Oh, but his wrath was up! He was a nervous man, and he shuffled from one
 side of his wheel to the other as if the floor was hot. He would boil a
 while to himself, and then overflow and scald me again.
 
 'Look here! What do you suppose I told you the names of those points
 for?'
 
 I tremblingly considered a moment, and then the devil of temptation
 provoked me to say:--
 
 'Well--to--to--be entertaining, I thought.'
 
 This was a red rag to the bull. He raged and stormed so (he was crossing
 the river at the time) that I judge it made him blind, because he ran
 over the steering-oar of a trading-scow. Of course the traders sent up
 a volley of red-hot profanity. Never was a man so grateful as Mr. Bixby
 was: because he was brim full, and here were subjects who would TALK
 BACK. He threw open a window, thrust his head out, and such an irruption
 followed as I never had heard before. The fainter and farther away the
 scowmen's curses drifted, the higher Mr. Bixby lifted his voice and the
--**--**--
 'I don't want to find fault with your leadsmen, but that's a good deal
 of water for Plum Point, it seems to me.'
 
 There was an approving nod all around as this quiet snub dropped on
 the boaster and 'settled' him. And so they went on talk-talk-talking.
 Meantime, the thing that was running in my mind was, 'Now if my ears
 hear aright, I have not only to get the names of all the towns and
 islands and bends, and so on, by heart, but I must even get up a warm
 personal acquaintanceship with every old snag and one-limbed cotton-wood
 and obscure wood pile that ornaments the banks of this river for twelve
 hundred miles; and more than that, I must actually know where these
 things are in the dark, unless these guests are gifted with eyes that
 can pierce through two miles of solid blackness; I wish the piloting
 business was in Jericho and I had never thought of it.'
 
 At dusk Mr. Bixby tapped the big bell three times (the signal to land),
 and the captain emerged from his drawing-room in the forward end of the
 texas, and looked up inquiringly. Mr. Bixby said--
 
 'We will lay up here all night, captain.'
 
 'Very well, sir.'
 
 That was all. The boat came to shore and was tied up for the night. It
 seemed to me a fine thing that the pilot could do as he pleased, without
 asking so grand a captain's permission. I took my supper and
 went immediately to bed, discouraged by my day's observations and
 experiences. My late voyage's note-booking was but a confusion of
 meaningless names. It had tangled me all up in a knot every time I had
 looked at it in the daytime. I now hoped for respite in sleep; but
--**--**--
 
 There was no more trouble after that. Mr. Bixby was a hero that night;
 and it was some little time, too, before his exploit ceased to be talked
 about by river men.
 
 Fully to realize the marvelous precision required in laying the great
 steamer in her marks in that murky waste of water, one should know that
 not only must she pick her intricate way through snags and blind
 reefs, and then shave the head of the island so closely as to brush
 the overhanging foliage with her stern, but at one place she must pass
 almost within arm's reach of a sunken and invisible wreck that would
 snatch the hull timbers from under her if she should strike it, and
 destroy a quarter of a million dollars' worth of steam-boat and cargo
 in five minutes, and maybe a hundred and fifty human lives into the
 bargain.
 
 The last remark I heard that night was a compliment to Mr. Bixby,
 uttered in soliloquy and with unction by one of our guests. He said--
 
 'By the Shadow of Death, but he's a lightning pilot!'
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 8 Perplexing Lessons
 
 At the end of what seemed a tedious while, I had managed to pack my
 head full of islands, towns, bars, 'points,' and bends; and a curiously
 inanimate mass of lumber it was, too. However, inasmuch as I could shut
 my eyes and reel off a good long string of these names without leaving
 out more than ten miles of river in every fifty, I began to feel that
 I could take a boat down to New Orleans if I could make her skip those
 little gaps. But of course my complacency could hardly get start enough
 to lift my nose a trifle into the air, before Mr. Bixby would think of
--**--**--
 
 'That's the very main virtue of the thing. If the shapes didn't change
 every three seconds they wouldn't be of any use. Take this place where
 we are now, for instance. As long as that hill over yonder is only one
 hill, I can boom right along the way I'm going; but the moment it splits
 at the top and forms a V, I know I've got to scratch to starboard in a
 hurry, or I'll bang this boat's brains out against a rock; and then the
 moment one of the prongs of the V swings behind the other, I've got to
 waltz to larboard again, or I'll have a misunderstanding with a snag
 that would snatch the keelson out of this steamboat as neatly as if it
 were a sliver in your hand. If that hill didn't change its shape on bad
 nights there would be an awful steamboat grave-yard around here inside
 of a year.'
 
 It was plain that I had got to learn the shape of the river in all the
 different ways that could be thought of,--upside down, wrong end first,
 inside out, fore-and-aft, and 'thortships,'--and then know what to do on
 gray nights when it hadn't any shape at all. So I set about it. In the
 course of time I began to get the best of this knotty lesson, and my
 self-complacency moved to the front once more. Mr. Bixby was all fixed,
 and ready to start it to the rear again. He opened on me after this
 fashion--
 
 'How much water did we have in the middle crossing at Hole-in-the-Wall,
 trip before last?'
 
 I considered this an outrage. I said--
 
 'Every trip, down and up, the leadsmen are singing through that tangled
 place for three-quarters of an hour on a stretch. How do you reckon I
--**--**--
 before you land, so that the engineers can get ready.'
 
 I blushed under the sarcasm, and said I hadn't had any hail.
 
 'Ah! Then it was for wood, I suppose. The officer of the watch will tell
 you when he wants to wood up.'
 
 I went on consuming and said I wasn't after wood.
 
 'Indeed? Why, what could you want over here in the bend, then? Did you
 ever know of a boat following a bend up-stream at this stage of the
 river?'
 
 'No sir,--and I wasn't trying to follow it. I was getting away from a
 bluff reef.'
 
 'No, it wasn't a bluff reef; there isn't one within three miles of where
 you were.'
 
 'But I saw it. It was as bluff as that one yonder.'
 
 'Just about. Run over it!'
 
 'Do you give it as an order?'
 
 'Yes. Run over it.'
 
 'If I don't, I wish I may die.'
 
 'All right; I am taking the responsibility.' I was just as anxious to
 kill the boat, now, as I had been to save her before. I impressed my
 orders upon my memory, to be used at the inquest, and made a straight
 break for the reef. As it disappeared under our bows I held my breath;
 but we slid over it like oil.
 
 'Now don't you see the difference? It wasn't anything but a WIND reef.
 The wind does that.'
 
 'So I see. But it is exactly like a bluff reef. How am I ever going to
 tell them apart?'
 
 'I can't tell you. It is an instinct. By and by you will just naturally
 KNOW one from the other, but you never will be able to explain why or
 how you know them apart'
 
 It turned out to be true. The face of the water, in time, became a
--**--**--
 everlasting measuring of the banks of this river, twelve hundred miles,
 month in and month out?'
 
 'Of course!'
 
 My emotions were too deep for words for a while. Presently I said--'
 
 And how about these chutes. Are there many of them?'
 
 'I should say so. I fancy we shan't run any of the river this trip as
 you've ever seen it run before--so to speak. If the river begins to rise
 again, we'll go up behind bars that you've always seen standing out of
 the river, high and dry like the roof of a house; we'll cut across low
 places that you've never noticed at all, right through the middle of
 bars that cover three hundred acres of river; we'll creep through cracks
 where you've always thought was solid land; we'll dart through the woods
 and leave twenty-five miles of river off to one side; we'll see the
 hind-side of every island between New Orleans and Cairo.'
 
 'Then I've got to go to work and learn just as much more river as I
 already know.'
 
 'Just about twice as much more, as near as you can come at it.'
 
 'Well, one lives to find out. I think I was a fool when I went into this
 business.'
 
 'Yes, that is true. And you are yet. But you'll not be when you've
 learned it.'
 
 'Ah, I never can learn it.'
 
 'I will see that you DO.'
 
 By and by I ventured again--
 
 'Have I got to learn all this thing just as I know the rest of the
 river--shapes and all--and so I can run it at night?'
 
 'Yes. And you've got to have good fair marks from one end of the river
 to the other, that will help the bank tell you when there is water
 enough in each of these countless places--like that stump, you know.
--**--**--
 cramping up around a bar, while a string of these small-fry rascals
 were drifting down into the head of the bend away above and beyond us a
 couple of miles. Now a skiff would dart away from one of them, and come
 fighting its laborious way across the desert of water. It would 'ease
 all,' in the shadow of our forecastle, and the panting oarsmen would
 shout, 'Gimme a pa-a-per!' as the skiff drifted swiftly astern. The
 clerk would throw over a file of New Orleans journals. If these were
 picked up without comment, you might notice that now a dozen other
 skiffs had been drifting down upon us without saying anything. You
 understand, they had been waiting to see how No. 1 was going to fare.
 No. 1 making no comment, all the rest would bend to their oars and
 come on, now; and as fast as they came the clerk would heave over
 neat bundles of religious tracts, tied to shingles. The amount of hard
 swearing which twelve packages of religious literature will command when
 impartially divided up among twelve raftsmen's crews, who have pulled a
 heavy skiff two miles on a hot day to get them, is simply incredible.
 
 As I have said, the big rise brought a new world under my vision. By the
 time the river was over its banks we had forsaken our old paths and were
 hourly climbing over bars that had stood ten feet out of water before;
 we were shaving stumpy shores, like that at the foot of Madrid Bend,
 which I had always seen avoided before; we were clattering through
 chutes like that of 82, where the opening at the foot was an unbroken
 wall of timber till our nose was almost at the very spot. Some of these
--**--**--
 
 'X.'
 
 'Dart for the pilot-house, quicker than lightning!'
 
 The next moment both men were flying up the pilot-house companion way,
 three steps at a jump! Nobody there! The great steamer was whistling
 down the middle of the river at her own sweet will! The watchman shot
 out of the place again; Ealer seized the wheel, set an engine back with
 power, and held his breath while the boat reluctantly swung away from
 a 'towhead' which she was about to knock into the middle of the Gulf of
 Mexico!
 
 By and by the watchman came back and said--
 
 'Didn't that lunatic tell you he was asleep, when he first came up
 here?'
 
 'NO.'
 
 'Well, he was. I found him walking along on top of the railings just as
 unconcerned as another man would walk a pavement; and I put him to bed;
 now just this minute there he was again, away astern, going through that
 sort of tight-rope deviltry the same as before.'
 
 'Well, I think I'll stay by, next time he has one of those fits. But I
 hope he'll have them often. You just ought to have seen him take this
 boat through Helena crossing. I never saw anything so gaudy before. And
 if he can do such gold-leaf, kid-glove, diamond-breastpin piloting when
 he is sound asleep, what COULDN'T he do if he was dead!'
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 12 Sounding
 
 WHEN the river is very low, and one's steamboat is 'drawing all the
 water' there is in the channel,--or a few inches more, as was often
 the case in the old times,--one must be painfully circumspect in his
 piloting. We used to have to 'sound' a number of particularly bad places
 almost every trip when the river was at a very low stage.
 
 Sounding is done in this way. The boat ties up at the shore, just above
--**--**--
 to some extent, but then he always had a way of embroidering. However,
 virtue is its own reward, so I was a barely perceptible trifle ahead
 in the contest. About this time something happened which promised
 handsomely for me: the pilots decided to sound the crossing at the head
 of 21. This would occur about nine or ten o'clock at night, when
 the passengers would be still up; it would be Mr. Thornburg's watch,
 therefore my chief would have to do the sounding. We had a perfect love
 of a sounding-boat--long, trim, graceful, and as fleet as a greyhound;
 her thwarts were cushioned; she carried twelve oarsmen; one of the mates
 was always sent in her to transmit orders to her crew, for ours was a
 steamer where no end of 'style' was put on.
 
 We tied up at the shore above 21, and got ready. It was a foul night,
 and the river was so wide, there, that a landsman's uneducated eyes
 could discern no opposite shore through such a gloom. The passengers
 were alert and interested; everything was satisfactory. As I hurried
 through the engine-room, picturesquely gotten up in storm toggery, I met
 Tom, and could not forbear delivering myself of a mean speech--
 
 'Ain't you glad YOU don't have to go out sounding?'
 
 Tom was passing on, but he quickly turned, and said--
 
 'Now just for that, you can go and get the sounding-pole yourself. I was
 going after it, but I'd see you in Halifax, now, before I'd do it.'
 
 'Who wants you to get it? I don't. It's in the sounding-boat.'
 
 'It ain't, either. It's been new-painted; and it's been up on the
 ladies' cabin guards two days, drying.'
 
 I flew back, and shortly arrived among the crowd of watching and
 wondering ladies just in time to hear the command:
--**--**--
 man at noon what he had had for breakfast, it would be ten chances to
 one that he could not tell you. Astonishing things can be done with the
 human memory if you will devote it faithfully to one particular line of
 business.
 
 At the time that wages soared so high on the Missouri River, my chief,
 Mr. Bixby, went up there and learned more than a thousand miles of that
 stream with an ease and rapidity that were astonishing. When he had seen
 each division once in the daytime and once at night, his education was
 so nearly complete that he took out a 'daylight' license; a few
 trips later he took out a full license, and went to piloting day and
 night--and he ranked A 1, too.
 
 Mr. Bixby placed me as steersman for a while under a pilot whose feats
 of memory were a constant marvel to me. However, his memory was born in
 him, I think, not built. For instance, somebody would mention a name.
 Instantly Mr. Brown would break in--
 
 'Oh, I knew HIM. Sallow-faced, red-headed fellow, with a little scar on
 the side of his throat, like a splinter under the flesh. He was only
 in the Southern trade six months. That was thirteen years ago. I made a
 trip with him. There was five feet in the upper river then; the "Henry
 Blake" grounded at the foot of Tower Island drawing four and a half; the
 "George Elliott" unshipped her rudder on the wreck of the "Sunflower"--'
 
 'Why, the "Sunflower" didn't sink until--'
 
 'I know when she sunk; it was three years before that, on the 2nd of
 December; Asa Hardy was captain of her, and his brother John was first
 clerk; and it was his first trip in her, too; Tom Jones told me these
--**--**--
 church steeple.'
 
 'You think so, do you?'
 
 The very tone of the question shook my confidence. That was what Mr.
 Bixby was expecting. He left, without saying anything more. I began to
 imagine all sorts of things. Mr. Bixby, unknown to me, of course, sent
 somebody down to the forecastle with some mysterious instructions to the
 leadsmen, another messenger was sent to whisper among the officers,
 and then Mr. Bixby went into hiding behind a smoke-stack where he could
 observe results. Presently the captain stepped out on the hurricane
 deck; next the chief mate appeared; then a clerk. Every moment or two a
 straggler was added to my audience; and before I got to the head of
 the island I had fifteen or twenty people assembled down there under my
 nose. I began to wonder what the trouble was. As I started across, the
 captain glanced aloft at me and said, with a sham uneasiness in his
 voice--
 
 'Where is Mr. Bixby?'
 
 'Gone below, sir.'
 
 But that did the business for me. My imagination began to construct
 dangers out of nothing, and they multiplied faster than I could keep the
 run of them. All at once I imagined I saw shoal water ahead! The wave
 of coward agony that surged through me then came near dislocating every
 joint in me. All my confidence in that crossing vanished. I seized the
 bell-rope; dropped it, ashamed; seized it again; dropped it once more;
 clutched it tremblingly one again, and pulled it so feebly that I could
 hardly hear the stroke myself. Captain and mate sang out instantly, and
 both together--
 
 'Starboard lead there! and quick about it!'
 
 This was another shock. I began to climb the wheel like a squirrel;
 but I would hardly get the boat started to port before I would see new
--**--**--
 fellow, a tireless talker, and had both wit and humor in him. He had a
 most irreverent independence, too, and was deliciously easy-going and
 comfortable in the presence of age, official dignity, and even the most
 august wealth. He always had work, he never saved a penny, he was a most
 persuasive borrower, he was in debt to every pilot on the river, and to
 the majority of the captains. He could throw a sort of splendor around
 a bit of harum-scarum, devil-may-care piloting, that made it almost
 fascinating--but not to everybody. He made a trip with good old Captain
 Y----once, and was 'relieved' from duty when the boat got to New
 Orleans. Somebody expressed surprise at the discharge. Captain
 Y----shuddered at the mere mention of Stephen. Then his poor, thin old
 voice piped out something like this:--
 
 'Why, bless me! I wouldn't have such a wild creature on my boat for the
 world--not for the whole world! He swears, he sings, he whistles, he
 yells--I never saw such an Injun to yell. All times of the night--it
 never made any difference to him. He would just yell that way, not for
 anything in particular, but merely on account of a kind of devilish
 comfort he got out of it. I never could get into a sound sleep but
 he would fetch me out of bed, all in a cold sweat, with one of those
 dreadful war-whoops. A queer being--very queer being; no respect for
 anything or anybody. Sometimes he called me "Johnny." And he kept a
 fiddle, and a cat. He played execrably. This seemed to distress the cat,
 and so the cat would howl. Nobody could sleep where that man--and his
 family--was. And reckless. There never was anything like it. Now you may
 believe it or not, but as sure as I am sitting here, he brought my boat
--**--**--
 installed a hated association man in his berth. In a very little while,
 idle non-associationists began to be pretty plenty, brisk as business
 was, and much as their services were desired. The laugh was shifting to
 the other side of their mouths most palpably. These victims, together
 with the captains and owners, presently ceased to laugh altogether,
 and began to rage about the revenge they would take when the passing
 business 'spurt' was over.
 
 Soon all the laughers that were left were the owners and crews of boats
 that had two non-association pilots. But their triumph was not very
 long-lived. For this reason: It was a rigid rule of the association
 that its members should never, under any circumstances whatever, give
 information about the channel to any 'outsider.' By this time about half
 the boats had none but association pilots, and the other half had none
 but outsiders. At the first glance one would suppose that when it came
 to forbidding information about the river these two parties could play
 equally at that game; but this was not so. At every good-sized town from
 one end of the river to the other, there was a 'wharf-boat' to land
 at, instead of a wharf or a pier. Freight was stored in it for
 transportation; waiting passengers slept in its cabins. Upon each
 of these wharf-boats the association's officers placed a strong box
 fastened with a peculiar lock which was used in no other service but
 one--the United States mail service. It was the letter-bag lock, a
 sacred governmental thing. By dint of much beseeching the government
 had been persuaded to allow the association to use this lock. Every
 association man carried a key which would open these boxes. That key, or
 rather a peculiar way of holding it in the hand when its owner was asked
--**--**--
 outsiders had been taken into the pilots' association) that if any
 captain employed a non-association pilot, he should be forced to
 discharge him, and also pay a fine of five hundred dollars. Several
 of these heavy fines were paid before the captains' organization grew
 strong enough to exercise full authority over its membership; but that
 all ceased, presently. The captains tried to get the pilots to decree
 that no member of their corporation should serve under a non-association
 captain; but this proposition was declined. The pilots saw that they
 would be backed up by the captains and the underwriters anyhow, and so
 they wisely refrained from entering into entangling alliances.
 
 As I have remarked, the pilots' association was now the compactest
 monopoly in the world, perhaps, and seemed simply indestructible.
 And yet the days of its glory were numbered. First, the new railroad
 stretching up through Mississippi, Tennessee, and Kentucky, to Northern
 railway centers, began to divert the passenger travel from the steamers;
 next the war came and almost entirely annihilated the steamboating
 industry during several years, leaving most of the pilots idle, and the
 cost of living advancing all the time; then the treasurer of the St.
 Louis association put his hand into the till and walked off with
 every dollar of the ample fund; and finally, the railroads intruding
 everywhere, there was little for steamers to do, when the war was over,
 but carry freights; so straightway some genius from the Atlantic coast
 introduced the plan of towing a dozen steamer cargoes down to New
 Orleans at the tail of a vulgar little tug-boat; and behold, in the
 twinkling of an eye, as it were, the association and the noble science
 of piloting were things of the dead and pathetic past!
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 16 Racing Days
 
 IT was always the custom for the boats to leave New Orleans between four
--**--**--
 way. She was dismally slow; still, we often had pretty exciting times
 racing with islands, and rafts, and such things. One trip, however, we
 did rather well. We went to St. Louis in sixteen days. But even at
 this rattling gait I think we changed watches three times in Fort Adams
 reach, which is five miles long. A 'reach' is a piece of straight river,
 and of course the current drives through such a place in a pretty lively
 way.
 
 That trip we went to Grand Gulf, from New Orleans, in four days (three
 hundred and forty miles); the 'Eclipse' and 'Shotwell' did it in one.
 We were nine days out, in the chute of 63 (seven hundred miles); the
 'Eclipse' and 'Shotwell' went there in two days. Something over a
 generation ago, a boat called the 'J. M. White' went from New Orleans
 to Cairo in three days, six hours, and forty-four minutes. In 1853 the
 'Eclipse' made the same trip in three days, three hours, and twenty
 minutes.{footnote [Time disputed. Some authorities add 1 hour and 16
 minutes to this.]} In 1870 the 'R. E. Lee' did it in three days and ONE
 hour. This last is called the fastest trip on record. I will try to show
 that it was not. For this reason: the distance between New Orleans and
 Cairo, when the 'J. M. White' ran it, was about eleven hundred and six
 miles; consequently her average speed was a trifle over fourteen miles
 per hour. In the 'Eclipse's' day the distance between the two ports
 had become reduced to one thousand and eighty miles; consequently her
 average speed was a shade under fourteen and three-eighths miles per
 hour. In the 'R. E. Lee's' time the distance had diminished to about one
 thousand and thirty miles; consequently her average was about
--**--**--
 crooked, that being a rocky country which the river cannot cut much.
 
 The water cuts the alluvial banks of the 'lower' river into deep
 horseshoe curves; so deep, indeed, that in some places if you were to
 get ashore at one extremity of the horseshoe and walk across the neck,
 half or three quarters of a mile, you could sit down and rest a couple
 of hours while your steamer was coming around the long elbow, at a speed
 of ten miles an hour, to take you aboard again. When the river is
 rising fast, some scoundrel whose plantation is back in the country, and
 therefore of inferior value, has only to watch his chance, cut a little
 gutter across the narrow neck of land some dark night, and turn the
 water into it, and in a wonderfully short time a miracle has happened:
 to wit, the whole Mississippi has taken possession of that little ditch,
 and placed the countryman's plantation on its bank (quadrupling its
 value), and that other party's formerly valuable plantation finds itself
 away out yonder on a big island; the old watercourse around it will soon
 shoal up, boats cannot approach within ten miles of it, and down goes
 its value to a fourth of its former worth. Watches are kept on those
 narrow necks, at needful times, and if a man happens to be caught
 cutting a ditch across them, the chances are all against his ever having
 another opportunity to cut a ditch.
 
 Pray observe some of the effects of this ditching business. Once there
 was a neck opposite Port Hudson, Louisiana, which was only half a mile
 across, in its narrowest place. You could walk across there in fifteen
 minutes; but if you made the journey around the cape on a raft, you
--**--**--
 Chapter 18 I Take a Few Extra Lessons
 
 DURING the two or two and a half years of my apprenticeship, I served
 under many pilots, and had experience of many kinds of steamboatmen and
 many varieties of steamboats; for it was not always convenient for Mr.
 Bixby to have me with him, and in such cases he sent me with somebody
 else. I am to this day profiting somewhat by that experience; for in
 that brief, sharp schooling, I got personally and familiarly acquainted
 with about all the different types of human nature that are to be found
 in fiction, biography, or history. The fact is daily borne in upon me,
 that the average shore-employment requires as much as forty years
 to equip a man with this sort of an education. When I say I am still
 profiting by this thing, I do not mean that it has constituted me a
 judge of men--no, it has not done that; for judges of men are born, not
 made. My profit is various in kind and degree; but the feature of it
 which I value most is the zest which that early experience has given
 to my later reading. When I find a well-drawn character in fiction or
 biography, I generally take a warm personal interest in him, for the
 reason that I have known him before--met him on the river.
 
 The figure that comes before me oftenest, out of the shadows of that
 vanished time, is that of Brown, of the steamer 'Pennsylvania'--the man
 referred to in a former chapter, whose memory was so good and tiresome.
 He was a middle-aged, long, slim, bony, smooth-shaven, horse-faced,
 ignorant, stingy, malicious, snarling, fault hunting, mote-magnifying
 tyrant. I early got the habit of coming on watch with dread at my heart.
 No matter how good a time I might have been having with the off-watch
--**--**--
 
 I had committed the crime of crimes--I had lifted my hand against a
 pilot on duty! I supposed I was booked for the penitentiary sure, and
 couldn't be booked any surer if I went on and squared my long account
 with this person while I had the chance; consequently I stuck to him and
 pounded him with my fists a considerable time--I do not know how long,
 the pleasure of it probably made it seem longer than it really was;--but
 in the end he struggled free and jumped up and sprang to the wheel: a
 very natural solicitude, for, all this time, here was this steamboat
 tearing down the river at the rate of fifteen miles an hour and nobody
 at the helm! However, Eagle Bend was two miles wide at this bank-full
 stage, and correspondingly long and deep; and the boat was steering
 herself straight down the middle and taking no chances. Still, that was
 only luck--a body MIGHT have found her charging into the woods.
 
 Perceiving, at a glance, that the 'Pennsylvania' was in no danger, Brown
 gathered up the big spy-glass, war-club fashion, and ordered me out of
 the pilot-house with more than Comanche bluster. But I was not afraid of
 him now; so, instead of going, I tarried, and criticized his grammar; I
 reformed his ferocious speeches for him, and put them into good English,
 calling his attention to the advantage of pure English over the bastard
 dialect of the Pennsylvanian collieries whence he was extracted.
 He could have done his part to admiration in a cross-fire of mere
 vituperation, of course; but he was not equipped for this species of
 controversy; so he presently laid aside his glass and took the wheel,
 muttering and shaking his head; and I retired to the bench. The racket
--**--**--
 rest of the town furnished money, or whatever else was wanted. And
 Memphis knew how to do all these things well; for many a disaster
 like the 'Pennsylvania's' had happened near her doors, and she was
 experienced, above all other cities on the river, in the gracious office
 of the 'Good Samaritan.'
 
 The sight I saw when I entered that large hall was new and strange to
 me. Two long rows of prostrate forms--more than forty, in all--and every
 face and head a shapeless wad of loose raw cotton. It was a gruesome
 spectacle. I watched there six days and nights, and a very melancholy
 experience it was. There was one daily incident which was peculiarly
 depressing: this was the removal of the doomed to a chamber apart. It
 was done in order that the MORALE of the other patients might not be
 injuriously affected by seeing one of their number in the death-agony.
 The fated one was always carried out with as little stir as possible,
 and the stretcher was always hidden from sight by a wall of assistants;
 but no matter: everybody knew what that cluster of bent forms, with
 its muffled step and its slow movement meant; and all eyes watched it
 wistfully, and a shudder went abreast of it like a wave.
 
 I saw many poor fellows removed to the 'death-room,' and saw them no
 more afterward. But I saw our chief mate carried thither more than
 once. His hurts were frightful, especially his scalds. He was clothed in
 linseed oil and raw cotton to his waist, and resembled nothing human.
 He was often out of his mind; and then his pains would make him rave and
 shout and sometimes shriek. Then, after a period of dumb exhaustion, his
 disordered imagination would suddenly transform the great apartment into
--**--**--
 
 However, on the outskirts changes were apparent enough; notably in
 dwelling-house architecture. The fine new homes are noble and beautiful
 and modern. They stand by themselves, too, with green lawns around them;
 whereas the dwellings of a former day are packed together in blocks,
 and are all of one pattern, with windows all alike, set in an arched
 frame-work of twisted stone; a sort of house which was handsome enough
 when it was rarer.
 
 There was another change--the Forest Park. This was new to me. It is
 beautiful and very extensive, and has the excellent merit of having been
 made mainly by nature. There are other parks, and fine ones, notably
 Tower Grove and the Botanical Gardens; for St. Louis interested herself
 in such improvements at an earlier day than did the most of our cities.
 
 The first time I ever saw St. Louis, I could have bought it for six
 million dollars, and it was the mistake of my life that I did not do
 it. It was bitter now to look abroad over this domed and steepled
 metropolis, this solid expanse of bricks and mortar stretching away on
 every hand into dim, measure-defying distances, and remember that I had
 allowed that opportunity to go by. Why I should have allowed it to go
 by seems, of course, foolish and inexplicable to-day, at a first glance;
 yet there were reasons at the time to justify this course.
 
 A Scotchman, Hon. Charles Augustus Murray, writing some forty-five
 or fifty years ago, said--'The streets are narrow, ill paved and ill
 lighted.' Those streets are narrow still, of course; many of them are
 ill paved yet; but the reproach of ill lighting cannot be repeated, now.
 The 'Catholic New Church' was the only notable building then, and Mr.
 Murray was confidently called upon to admire it, with its 'species of
--**--**--
 
 They don't drink it, sir. They can't drink it, sir. Give an Irishman
 lager for a month, and he's a dead man. An Irishman is lined with
 copper, and the beer corrodes it. But whiskey polishes the copper and is
 the saving of him, sir.'
 
 At eight o'clock, promptly, we backed out and crossed the river. As we
 crept toward the shore, in the thick darkness, a blinding glory of white
 electric light burst suddenly from our forecastle, and lit up the
 water and the warehouses as with a noon-day glare. Another big
 change, this--no more flickering, smoky, pitch-dripping, ineffectual
 torch-baskets, now: their day is past. Next, instead of calling out a
 score of hands to man the stage, a couple of men and a hatful of
 steam lowered it from the derrick where it was suspended, launched it,
 deposited it in just the right spot, and the whole thing was over
 and done with before a mate in the olden time could have got his
 profanity-mill adjusted to begin the preparatory services. Why this new
 and simple method of handling the stages was not thought of when the
 first steamboat was built, is a mystery which helps one to realize what
 a dull-witted slug the average human being is.
 
 We finally got away at two in the morning, and when I turned out at
 six, we were rounding to at a rocky point where there was an old
 stone warehouse--at any rate, the ruins of it; two or three decayed
 dwelling-houses were near by, in the shelter of the leafy hills; but
 there were no evidences of human or other animal life to be seen.
 I wondered if I had forgotten the river; for I had no recollection
 whatever of this place; the shape of the river, too, was unfamiliar;
--**--**--
 After rounding-out and finishing-up and polishing-off the alligator
 business, he dropped easily and comfortably into the historical vein,
 and told of some tremendous feats of half-a-dozen old-time steamboats
 of his acquaintance, dwelling at special length upon a certain
 extraordinary performance of his chief favorite among this distinguished
 fleet--and then adding--
 
 'That boat was the "Cyclone,"--last trip she ever made--she sunk, that
 very trip--captain was Tom Ballou, the most immortal liar that ever I
 struck. He couldn't ever seem to tell the truth, in any kind of weather.
 Why, he would make you fairly shudder. He WAS the most scandalous
 liar! I left him, finally; I couldn't stand it. The proverb says, "like
 master, like man;" and if you stay with that kind of a man, you'll come
 under suspicion by and by, just as sure as you live. He paid first-class
 wages; but said I, What's wages when your reputation's in danger? So I
 let the wages go, and froze to my reputation. And I've never regretted
 it. Reputation's worth everything, ain't it? That's the way I look at
 it. He had more selfish organs than any seven men in the world--all
 packed in the stern-sheets of his skull, of course, where they belonged.
 They weighed down the back of his head so that it made his nose tilt up
 in the air. People thought it was vanity, but it wasn't, it was malice.
 If you only saw his foot, you'd take him to be nineteen feet high, but
 he wasn't; it was because his foot was out of drawing. He was intended
 to be nineteen feet high, no doubt, if his foot was made first, but he
 didn't get there; he was only five feet ten. That's what he was, and
 that's what he is. You take the lies out of him, and he'll shrink to the
--**--**--
 joined solidly to the shore, and it takes a sharp eye to see where the
 seam is--but it is Illinois ground yet, and the people who live on
 it have to ferry themselves over and work the Illinois roads and pay
 Illinois taxes: singular state of things!
 
 Near the mouth of the river several islands were missing--washed away.
 Cairo was still there--easily visible across the long, flat point upon
 whose further verge it stands; but we had to steam a long way around
 to get to it. Night fell as we were going out of the 'Upper River' and
 meeting the floods of the Ohio. We dashed along without anxiety; for
 the hidden rock which used to lie right in the way has moved up stream
 a long distance out of the channel; or rather, about one county has gone
 into the river from the Missouri point, and the Cairo point has 'made
 down' and added to its long tongue of territory correspondingly. The
 Mississippi is a just and equitable river; it never tumbles one man's
 farm overboard without building a new farm just like it for that man's
 neighbor. This keeps down hard feelings.
 
 Going into Cairo, we came near killing a steamboat which paid no
 attention to our whistle and then tried to cross our bows. By doing some
 strong backing, we saved him; which was a great loss, for he would have
 made good literature.
 
 Cairo is a brisk town now; and is substantially built, and has a city
 look about it which is in noticeable contrast to its former estate, as
 per Mr. Dickens's portrait of it. However, it was already building with
 bricks when I had seen it last--which was when Colonel (now General)
 Grant was drilling his first command there. Uncle Mumford says the
--**--**--
 of it--and died. But his friends shot old Darnell through and
 through--filled him full of bullets, and ended him.'
 
 The country gentleman who told me these things had been reared in ease
 and comfort, was a man of good parts, and was college bred. His loose
 grammar was the fruit of careless habit, not ignorance. This habit
 among educated men in the West is not universal, but it is
 prevalent--prevalent in the towns, certainly, if not in the cities; and
 to a degree which one cannot help noticing, and marveling at. I heard a
 Westerner who would be accounted a highly educated man in any country,
 say 'never mind, it DON'T MAKE NO DIFFERENCE, anyway.' A life-long
 resident who was present heard it, but it made no impression upon her.
 She was able to recall the fact afterward, when reminded of it; but
 she confessed that the words had not grated upon her ear at the
 time--a confession which suggests that if educated people can hear such
 blasphemous grammar, from such a source, and be unconscious of the deed,
 the crime must be tolerably common--so common that the general ear has
 become dulled by familiarity with it, and is no longer alert, no longer
 sensitive to such affronts.
 
 No one in the world speaks blemishless grammar; no one has ever written
 it--NO one, either in the world or out of it (taking the Scriptures for
 evidence on the latter point); therefore it would not be fair to exact
 grammatical perfection from the peoples of the Valley; but they and
 all other peoples may justly be required to refrain from KNOWINGLY and
 PURPOSELY debauching their grammar.
 
 I found the river greatly changed at Island No. 10. The island which
 I remembered was some three miles long and a quarter of a mile wide,
--**--**--
 'The Mississippi! It was with indescribable emotions that I first felt
 myself afloat upon its waters. How often in my schoolboy dreams, and in
 my waking visions afterwards, had my imagination pictured to itself the
 lordly stream, rolling with tumultuous current through the boundless
 region to which it has given its name, and gathering into itself, in its
 course to the ocean, the tributary waters of almost every latitude in
 the temperate zone! Here it was then in its reality, and I, at length,
 steaming against its tide. I looked upon it with that reverence with
 which everyone must regard a great feature of external nature.'
 
 
 So much for the emotions. The tourists, one and all, remark upon the
 deep, brooding loneliness and desolation of the vast river. Captain
 Basil Hall, who saw it at flood-stage, says--
 
 
 'Sometimes we passed along distances of twenty or thirty miles without
 seeing a single habitation. An artist, in search of hints for a painting
 of the deluge, would here have found them in abundance.'
 
 
 The first shall be last, etc. just two hundred years ago, the old
 original first and gallantest of all the foreign tourists, pioneer, head
 of the procession, ended his weary and tedious discovery-voyage down the
 solemn stretches of the great river--La Salle, whose name will last as
 long as the river itself shall last. We quote from Mr. Parkman--
 
 
 'And now they neared their journey's end. On the sixth of April, the
 river divided itself into three broad channels. La Salle followed that
 of the west, and D'Autray that of the east; while Tonty took the middle
 passage. As he drifted down the turbid current, between the low and
 marshy shores, the brackish water changed to brine, and the breeze grew
 fresh with the salt breath of the sea. Then the broad bosom of the
--**--**--
 the national government has turned the Mississippi into a sort of
 two-thousand-mile torchlight procession. In the head of every crossing,
 and in the foot of every crossing, the government has set up a
 clear-burning lamp. You are never entirely in the dark, now; there is
 always a beacon in sight, either before you, or behind you, or abreast.
 One might almost say that lamps have been squandered there. Dozens of
 crossings are lighted which were not shoal when they were created,
 and have never been shoal since; crossings so plain, too, and also so
 straight, that a steamboat can take herself through them without any
 help, after she has been through once. Lamps in such places are of
 course not wasted; it is much more convenient and comfortable for a
 pilot to hold on them than on a spread of formless blackness that won't
 stay still; and money is saved to the boat, at the same time, for she
 can of course make more miles with her rudder amidships than she can
 with it squared across her stern and holding her back.
 
 But this thing has knocked the romance out of piloting, to a large
 extent. It, and some other things together, have knocked all the romance
 out of it. For instance, the peril from snags is not now what it once
 was. The government's snag-boats go patrolling up and down, in these
 matter-of-fact days, pulling the river's teeth; they have rooted out
 all the old clusters which made many localities so formidable; and they
 allow no new ones to collect. Formerly, if your boat got away from you,
 on a black night, and broke for the woods, it was an anxious time with
 you; so was it also, when you were groping your way through solidified
 darkness in a narrow chute; but all that is changed now--you flash out
--**--**--
 
 
 Chapter 29 A Few Specimen Bricks
 
 WE passed through the Plum Point region, turned Craighead's Point,
 and glided unchallenged by what was once the formidable Fort Pillow,
 memorable because of the massacre perpetrated there during the war.
 Massacres are sprinkled with some frequency through the histories of
 several Christian nations, but this is almost the only one that can be
 found in American history; perhaps it is the only one which rises to a
 size correspondent to that huge and somber title. We have the 'Boston
 Massacre,' where two or three people were killed; but we must bunch
 Anglo-Saxon history together to find the fellow to the Fort Pillow
 tragedy; and doubtless even then we must travel back to the days and the
 performances of Coeur de Lion, that fine 'hero,' before we accomplish
 it.
 
 More of the river's freaks. In times past, the channel used to strike
 above Island 37, by Brandywine Bar, and down towards Island 39.
 Afterward, changed its course and went from Brandywine down through
 Vogelman's chute in the Devil's Elbow, to Island 39--part of this
 course reversing the old order; the river running UP four or five miles,
 instead of down, and cutting off, throughout, some fifteen miles of
 distance. This in 1876. All that region is now called Centennial Island.
 
 There is a tradition that Island 37 was one of the principal abiding
 places of the once celebrated 'Murel's Gang.' This was a colossal
 combination of robbers, horse-thieves, negro-stealers, and
 counterfeiters, engaged in business along the river some fifty or sixty
 years ago. While our journey across the country towards St. Louis was in
 progress we had had no end of Jesse James and his stirring history; for
 he had just been assassinated by an agent of the Governor of Missouri,
 and was in consequence occupying a good deal of space in the newspapers.
--**--**--
 
 But there is life enough there now. The population exceeds forty
 thousand and is augmenting, and trade is in a flourishing condition.
 We drove about the city; visited the park and the sociable horde of
 squirrels there; saw the fine residences, rose-clad and in other ways
 enticing to the eye; and got a good breakfast at the hotel.
 
 A thriving place is the Good Samaritan City of the Mississippi: has
 a great wholesale jobbing trade; foundries, machine shops; and
 manufactories of wagons, carriages, and cotton-seed oil; and is shortly
 to have cotton mills and elevators.
 
 Her cotton receipts reached five hundred thousand bales last year--an
 increase of sixty thousand over the year before. Out from her healthy
 commercial heart issue five trunk lines of railway; and a sixth is being
 added.
 
 This is a very different Memphis from the one which the vanished and
 unremembered procession of foreign tourists used to put into their books
 long time ago. In the days of the now forgotten but once renowned and
 vigorously hated Mrs. Trollope, Memphis seems to have consisted mainly
 of one long street of log-houses, with some outlying cabins sprinkled
 around rearward toward the woods; and now and then a pig, and no end of
 mud. That was fifty-five years ago. She stopped at the hotel. Plainly it
 was not the one which gave us our breakfast. She says--
 
 'The table was laid for fifty persons, and was nearly full. They ate in
 perfect silence, and with such astonishing rapidity that their dinner
 was over literally before ours was begun; the only sounds heard were
 those produced by the knives and forks, with the unceasing chorus of
 coughing, ETC.'
 
 'Coughing, etc.' The 'etc.' stands for an unpleasant word there, a word
 which she does not always charitably cover up, but sometimes prints. You
--**--**--
 them in the flood-wasted land. Sometimes there was a single lonely
 landing-cabin; near it the colored family that had hailed us; little and
 big, old and young, roosting on the scant pile of household goods; these
 consisting of a rusty gun, some bed-ticks, chests, tinware, stools,
 a crippled looking-glass, a venerable arm-chair, and six or eight
 base-born and spiritless yellow curs, attached to the family by strings.
 They must have their dogs; can't go without their dogs. Yet the dogs are
 never willing; they always object; so, one after another, in ridiculous
 procession, they are dragged aboard; all four feet braced and sliding
 along the stage, head likely to be pulled off; but the tugger marching
 determinedly forward, bending to his work, with the rope over his
 shoulder for better purchase. Sometimes a child is forgotten and left on
 the bank; but never a dog.
 
 The usual river-gossip going on in the pilot-house. Island No. 63--an
 island with a lovely 'chute,' or passage, behind it in the former times.
 They said Jesse Jamieson, in the 'Skylark,' had a visiting pilot with
 him one trip--a poor old broken-down, superannuated fellow--left him at
 the wheel, at the foot of 63, to run off the watch. The ancient mariner
 went up through the chute, and down the river outside; and up the chute
 and down the river again; and yet again and again; and handed the
 boat over to the relieving pilot, at the end of three hours of honest
 endeavor, at the same old foot of the island where he had originally
 taken the wheel! A darkey on shore who had observed the boat go by,
 about thirteen times, said, 'clar to gracious, I wouldn't be s'prised if
 dey's a whole line o' dem Sk'ylarks!'
 
 Anecdote illustrative of influence of reputation in the changing of
--**--**--
 
 Further gossip;--after which, everybody went below to get afternoon
 coffee, and left me at the wheel, alone, Something presently reminded
 me of our last hour in St. Louis, part of which I spent on this boat's
 hurricane deck, aft. I was joined there by a stranger, who dropped into
 conversation with me--a brisk young fellow, who said he was born in a
 town in the interior of Wisconsin, and had never seen a steamboat until
 a week before. Also said that on the way down from La Crosse he had
 inspected and examined his boat so diligently and with such passionate
 interest that he had mastered the whole thing from stem to rudder-blade.
 Asked me where I was from. I answered, New England. 'Oh, a Yank!' said
 he; and went chatting straight along, without waiting for assent or
 denial. He immediately proposed to take me all over the boat and tell
 me the names of her different parts, and teach me their uses. Before I
 could enter protest or excuse, he was already rattling glibly away at
 his benevolent work; and when I perceived that he was misnaming the
 things, and inhospitably amusing himself at the expense of an innocent
 stranger from a far country, I held my peace, and let him have his way.
 He gave me a world of misinformation; and the further he went, the wider
 his imagination expanded, and the more he enjoyed his cruel work of
 deceit. Sometimes, after palming off a particularly fantastic and
 outrageous lie upon me, he was so 'full of laugh' that he had to
 step aside for a minute, upon one pretext or another, to keep me from
 suspecting. I staid faithfully by him until his comedy was finished.
 Then he remarked that he had undertaken to 'learn' me all about a
--**--**--
 gold yonder and a purple haze where it will yield the best effect, you
 grant that you have seen something that is worth remembering.
 
 We had the Kentucky Bend country in the early morning--scene of a
 strange and tragic accident in the old times, Captain Poe had a small
 stern-wheel boat, for years the home of himself and his wife. One night
 the boat struck a snag in the head of Kentucky Bend, and sank with
 astonishing suddenness; water already well above the cabin floor when
 the captain got aft. So he cut into his wife's state-room from above
 with an ax; she was asleep in the upper berth, the roof a flimsier one
 than was supposed; the first blow crashed down through the rotten boards
 and clove her skull.
 
 This bend is all filled up now--result of a cut-off; and the same agent
 has taken the great and once much-frequented Walnut Bend, and set
 it away back in a solitude far from the accustomed track of passing
 steamers.
 
 Helena we visited, and also a town I had not heard of before, it being
 of recent birth--Arkansas City. It was born of a railway; the Little
 Rock, Mississippi River and Texas Railroad touches the river there.
 We asked a passenger who belonged there what sort of a place it was.
 'Well,' said he, after considering, and with the air of one who wishes
 to take time and be accurate, 'It's a hell of a place.' A description
 which was photographic for exactness. There were several rows and
 clusters of shabby frame-houses, and a supply of mud sufficient to
 insure the town against a famine in that article for a hundred years;
 for the overflow had but lately subsided. There were stagnant ponds
 in the streets, here and there, and a dozen rude scows were scattered
--**--**--
 trotting along them could make a blind man think a cavalry charge
 was coming; everywhere the mud was black and deep, and in many
 places malarious pools of stagnant water were standing. A Mississippi
 inundation is the next most wasting and desolating infliction to a fire.
 
 We had an enjoyable time here, on this sunny Sunday: two full hours'
 liberty ashore while the boat discharged freight. In the back streets
 but few white people were visible, but there were plenty of colored
 folk--mainly women and girls; and almost without exception upholstered
 in bright new clothes of swell and elaborate style and cut--a glaring
 and hilarious contrast to the mournful mud and the pensive puddles.
 
 Helena is the second town in Arkansas, in point of population--which
 is placed at five thousand. The country about it is exceptionally
 productive. Helena has a good cotton trade; handles from forty to sixty
 thousand bales annually; she has a large lumber and grain commerce; has
 a foundry, oil mills, machine shops and wagon factories--in brief has
 $1,000,000 invested in manufacturing industries. She has two railways,
 and is the commercial center of a broad and prosperous region. Her gross
 receipts of money, annually, from all sources, are placed by the New
 Orleans 'Times-Democrat' at $4,000,000.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 31 A Thumb-print and What Came of It
 
 WE were approaching Napoleon, Arkansas. So I began to think about my
 errand there. Time, noonday; and bright and sunny. This was bad--not
 best, anyway; for mine was not (preferably) a noonday kind of errand.
 The more I thought, the more that fact pushed itself upon me--now in one
 form, now in another. Finally, it took the form of a distinct question:
 is it good common sense to do the errand in daytime, when, by a little
 sacrifice of comfort and inclination, you can have night for it, and
--**--**--
 in a hoarse whisper, 'I told her I would, if she made a noise, and as
 for the child--'
 
 The other man interrupted in a low, half-crying voice--
 
 'You said we'd only gag them and rob them, not hurt them; or I wouldn't
 have come.'
 
 'Shut up your whining; had to change the plan when they waked up; you
 done all you could to protect them, now let that satisfy you; come, help
 rummage.'
 
 Both men were masked, and wore coarse, ragged 'nigger' clothes; they had
 a bull's-eye lantern, and by its light I noticed that the gentler robber
 had no thumb on his right hand. They rummaged around my poor cabin for a
 moment; the head bandit then said, in his stage whisper--
 
 'It's a waste of time--he shall tell where it's hid. Undo his gag, and
 revive him up.'
 
 The other said--
 
 'All right--provided no clubbing.'
 
 'No clubbing it is, then--provided he keeps still.'
 
 They approached me; just then there was a sound outside; a sound of
 voices and trampling hoofs; the robbers held their breath and listened;
 the sounds came slowly nearer and nearer; then came a shout--
 
 'HELLO, the house! Show a light, we want water.'
 
 'The captain's voice, by G--!' said the stage-whispering ruffian,
 and both robbers fled by the way of the back door, shutting off their
 bull's-eye as they ran.
 
 The strangers shouted several times more, then rode by--there seemed to
 be a dozen of the horses--and I heard nothing more.
 
 I struggled, but could not free myself from my bonds. I tried to speak,
 but the gag was effective; I could not make a sound. I listened for my
 wife's voice and my child's--listened long and intently, but no sound
 came from the other end of the room where their bed was. This silence
--**--**--
 especial intimates. But I was his intimate; and I took care to make
 the intimacy grow. Sometimes I so hungered for my revenge that I could
 hardly restrain myself from going on my knees and begging him to point
 out the man who had murdered my wife and child; but I managed to bridle
 my tongue. I bided my time, and went on telling fortunes, as opportunity
 offered.
 
 My apparatus was simple: a little red paint and a bit of white paper. I
 painted the ball of the client's thumb, took a print of it on the paper,
 studied it that night, and revealed his fortune to him next day. What
 was my idea in this nonsense? It was this: When I was a youth, I knew an
 old Frenchman who had been a prison-keeper for thirty years, and he told
 me that there was one thing about a person which never changed, from
 the cradle to the grave--the lines in the ball of the thumb; and he said
 that these lines were never exactly alike in the thumbs of any two human
 beings. In these days, we photograph the new criminal, and hang his
 picture in the Rogues' Gallery for future reference; but that Frenchman,
 in his day, used to take a print of the ball of a new prisoner's thumb
 and put that away for future reference. He always said that pictures
 were no good--future disguises could make them useless; 'The thumb's
 the only sure thing,' said he; 'you can't disguise that.' And he used
 to prove his theory, too, on my friends and acquaintances; it always
 succeeded.
 
 I went on telling fortunes. Every night I shut myself in, all alone,
 and studied the day's thumb-prints with a magnifying-glass. Imagine the
 devouring eagerness with which I pored over those mazy red spirals,
--**--**--
 his support, ever since.
 
 Now, as to that watch--see how strangely things happen! I traced it
 around and about Germany for more than a year, at considerable cost in
 money and vexation; and at last I got it. Got it, and was unspeakably
 glad; opened it, and found nothing in it! Why, I might have known that
 that bit of paper was not going to stay there all this time. Of course
 I gave up that ten thousand dollars then; gave it up, and dropped it out
 of my mind: and most sorrowfully, for I had wanted it for Kruger's son.
 
 Last night, when I consented at last that I must die, I began to make
 ready. I proceeded to burn all useless papers; and sure enough, from a
 batch of Adler's, not previously examined with thoroughness, out dropped
 that long-desired scrap! I recognized it in a moment. Here it is--I will
 translate it:
 
 'Brick livery stable, stone foundation, middle of town, corner of
 Orleans and Market. Corner toward Court-house. Third stone, fourth row.
 Stick notice there, saying how many are to come.'
 
 
 There--take it, and preserve it. Kruger explained that that stone was
 removable; and that it was in the north wall of the foundation, fourth
 row from the top, and third stone from the west. The money is secreted
 behind it. He said the closing sentence was a blind, to mislead in
 case the paper should fall into wrong hands. It probably performed that
 office for Adler.
 
 Now I want to beg that when you make your intended journey down the
 river, you will hunt out that hidden money, and send it to Adam Kruger,
 care of the Mannheim address which I have mentioned. It will make a rich
 man of him, and I shall sleep the sounder in my grave for knowing that I
--**--**--
 dead-center of that town used to be; yonder is the brick chimney-all
 that's left of Napoleon. These dense woods on the right used to be a
 mile back of the town. Take a look behind you--up-stream--now you begin
 to recognize this country, don't you?'
 
 'Yes, I do recognize it now. It is the most wonderful thing I ever heard
 of; by a long shot the most wonderful--and unexpected.'
 
 Mr. Thompson and Mr. Rogers had arrived, meantime, with satchels and
 umbrellas, and had silently listened to the captain's news. Thompson put
 a half-dollar in my hand and said softly--
 
 'For my share of the chromo.'
 
 Rogers followed suit.
 
 Yes, it was an astonishing thing to see the Mississippi rolling between
 unpeopled shores and straight over the spot where I used to see a good
 big self-complacent town twenty years ago. Town that was county-seat
 of a great and important county; town with a big United States marine
 hospital; town of innumerable fights--an inquest every day; town where
 I had used to know the prettiest girl, and the most accomplished in the
 whole Mississippi Valley; town where we were handed the first printed
 news of the 'Pennsylvania's' mournful disaster a quarter of a century
 ago; a town no more--swallowed up, vanished, gone to feed the fishes;
 nothing left but a fragment of a shanty and a crumbling brick chimney!
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 33 Refreshments and Ethics
 
 IN regard to Island 74, which is situated not far from the former
 Napoleon, a freak of the river here has sorely perplexed the laws of
 men and made them a vanity and a jest. When the State of Arkansas was
 chartered, she controlled 'to the center of the river'--a most unstable
 line. The State of Mississippi claimed 'to the channel'--another shifty
 and unstable line. No. 74 belonged to Arkansas. By and by a cut-off
--**--**--
 slave, since the war; will have nothing but a chill business relation
 with him, no sentiment permitted to intrude, will not keep a 'store'
 himself, and supply the negro's wants and thus protect the negro's
 pocket and make him able and willing to stay on the place and an
 advantage to him to do it, but lets that privilege to some thrifty
 Israelite, who encourages the thoughtless negro and wife to buy all
 sorts of things which they could do without--buy on credit, at big
 prices, month after month, credit based on the negro's share of the
 growing crop; and at the end of the season, the negro's share belongs
 to the Israelite,' the negro is in debt besides, is discouraged,
 dissatisfied, restless, and both he and the planter are injured; for he
 will take steamboat and migrate, and the planter must get a stranger in
 his place who does not know him, does not care for him, will fatten the
 Israelite a season, and follow his predecessor per steamboat.
 
 It is hoped that the Calhoun Company will show, by its humane and
 protective treatment of its laborers, that its method is the most
 profitable for both planter and negro; and it is believed that a general
 adoption of that method will then follow.
 
 And where so many are saying their say, shall not the barkeeper testify?
 He is thoughtful, observant, never drinks; endeavors to earn his salary,
 and WOULD earn it if there were custom enough. He says the people
 along here in Mississippi and Louisiana will send up the river to buy
 vegetables rather than raise them, and they will come aboard at the
 landings and buy fruits of the barkeeper. Thinks they 'don't know
 anything but cotton;' believes they don't know how to raise vegetables
 and fruit--'at least the most of them.' Says 'a nigger will go to H for
--**--**--
 A Mr. H. furnished some minor details of fact concerning this region
 which I would have hesitated to believe if I had not known him to be a
 steamboat mate. He was a passenger of ours, a resident of Arkansas City,
 and bound to Vicksburg to join his boat, a little Sunflower packet.
 He was an austere man, and had the reputation of being singularly
 unworldly, for a river man. Among other things, he said that Arkansas
 had been injured and kept back by generations of exaggerations
 concerning the mosquitoes here. One may smile, said he, and turn the
 matter off as being a small thing; but when you come to look at the
 effects produced, in the way of discouragement of immigration, and
 diminished values of property, it was quite the opposite of a small
 thing, or thing in any wise to be coughed down or sneered at. These
 mosquitoes had been persistently represented as being formidable and
 lawless; whereas 'the truth is, they are feeble, insignificant in size,
 diffident to a fault, sensitive'--and so on, and so on; you would have
 supposed he was talking about his family. But if he was soft on the
 Arkansas mosquitoes, he was hard enough on the mosquitoes of Lake
 Providence to make up for it--'those Lake Providence colossi,' as he
 finely called them. He said that two of them could whip a dog, and that
 four of them could hold a man down; and except help come, they would
 kill him--'butcher him,' as he expressed it. Referred in a sort of
 casual way--and yet significant way--to 'the fact that the life policy
 in its simplest form is unknown in Lake Providence--they take out a
 mosquito policy besides.' He told many remarkable things about those
 lawless insects. Among others, said he had seen them try to vote.
--**--**--
 pretty soon, when a body could be heard, service would go on again.
 Organs and church-music mixed up with a bombardment is a powerful queer
 combination--along at first. Coming out of church, one morning, we had
 an accident--the only one that happened around me on a Sunday. I was
 just having a hearty handshake with a friend I hadn't seen for a while,
 and saying, 'Drop into our cave to-night, after bombardment; we've got
 hold of a pint of prime wh--.' Whiskey, I was going to say, you know,
 but a shell interrupted. A chunk of it cut the man's arm off, and left
 it dangling in my hand. And do you know the thing that is going to stick
 the longest in my memory, and outlast everything else, little and big,
 I reckon, is the mean thought I had then? It was 'the whiskey IS SAVED.'
 And yet, don't you know, it was kind of excusable; because it was as
 scarce as diamonds, and we had only just that little; never had another
 taste during the siege.
 
 'Sometimes the caves were desperately crowded, and always hot and close.
 Sometimes a cave had twenty or twenty-five people packed into it; no
 turning-room for anybody; air so foul, sometimes, you couldn't have made
 a candle burn in it. A child was born in one of those caves one night,
 Think of that; why, it was like having it born in a trunk.
 
 'Twice we had sixteen people in our cave; and a number of times we had a
 dozen. Pretty suffocating in there. We always had eight; eight belonged
 there. Hunger and misery and sickness and fright and sorrow, and I
 don't know what all, got so loaded into them that none of them were ever
 rightly their old selves after the siege. They all died but three of us
--**--**--
 with my prayers. At last we went booming through the Golden Gate, and my
 pulses leaped for joy. I hurried back to that door and glanced in. Alas,
 there was small room for hope--Backus's eyes were heavy and bloodshot,
 his sweaty face was crimson, his speech maudlin and thick, his body
 sawed drunkenly about with the weaving motion of the ship. He drained
 another glass to the dregs, whilst the cards were being dealt.
 
 He took his hand, glanced at it, and his dull eyes lit up for a moment.
 The gamblers observed it, and showed their gratification by hardly
 perceptible signs.
 
 'How many cards?'
 
 'None!' said Backus.
 
 One villain--named Hank Wiley--discarded one card, the others three
 each. The betting began. Heretofore the bets had been trifling--a dollar
 or two; but Backus started off with an eagle now, Wiley hesitated a
 moment, then 'saw it' and 'went ten dollars better.' The other two threw
 up their hands.
 
 Backus went twenty better. Wiley said--
 
 'I see that, and go you a hundred better!' then smiled and reached for
 the money.
 
 'Let it alone,' said Backus, with drunken gravity.
 
 'What! you mean to say you're going to cover it?'
 
 'Cover it? Well, I reckon I am--and lay another hundred on top of it,
 too.'
 
 He reached down inside his overcoat and produced the required sum.
 
 'Oh, that's your little game, is it? I see your raise, and raise it five
 hundred!' said Wiley.
 
 'Five hundred better.' said the foolish bull-driver, and pulled out the
 amount and showered it on the pile. The three conspirators hardly tried
 to conceal their exultation.
 
 All diplomacy and pretense were dropped now, and the sharp exclamations
 came thick and fast, and the yellow pyramid grew higher and higher. At
 last ten thousand dollars lay in view. Wiley cast a bag of coin on the
--**--**--
 capable of playing the Spanish Fandango by itself, if you give it
 a start. Frantic work of art on the wall--pious motto, done on the
 premises, sometimes in colored yarns, sometimes in faded grasses:
 progenitor of the 'God Bless Our Home' of modern commerce. Framed in
 black moldings on the wall, other works of arts, conceived and committed
 on the premises, by the young ladies; being grim black-and-white
 crayons; landscapes, mostly: lake, solitary sail-boat, petrified clouds,
 pre-geological trees on shore, anthracite precipice; name of criminal
 conspicuous in the corner. Lithograph, Napoleon Crossing the Alps.
 Lithograph, The Grave at St. Helena. Steel-plates, Trumbull's Battle of
 Bunker Hill, and the Sally from Gibraltar. Copper-plates, Moses Smiting
 the Rock, and Return of the Prodigal Son. In big gilt frame, slander
 of the family in oil: papa holding a book ('Constitution of the United
 States'); guitar leaning against mamma, blue ribbons fluttering from
 its neck; the young ladies, as children, in slippers and scalloped
 pantelettes, one embracing toy horse, the other beguiling kitten with
 ball of yarn, and both simpering up at mamma, who simpers back. These
 persons all fresh, raw, and red--apparently skinned. Opposite, in
 gilt frame, grandpa and grandma, at thirty and twenty-two, stiff,
 old-fashioned, high-collared, puff-sleeved, glaring pallidly out from
 a background of solid Egyptian night. Under a glass French clock dome,
 large bouquet of stiff flowers done in corpsy-white wax. Pyramidal
 what-not in the corner, the shelves occupied chiefly with bric-a-brac of
 the period, disposed with an eye to best effect: shell, with the Lord's
 Prayer carved on it; another shell--of the long-oval sort, narrow,
 straight orifice, three inches long, running from end to end--portrait
 of Washington carved on it; not well done; the shell had Washington's
 mouth, originally--artist should have built to that. These two are
 memorials of the long-ago bridal trip to New Orleans and the French
--**--**--
 Sunk into the floor were numberless tin boxes, a foot square and two
 feet long, and open at the top end. These were full of clear water;
 and around each box, salt and other proper stuff was packed; also, the
 ammonia gases were applied to the water in some way which will always
 remain a secret to me, because I was not able to understand the process.
 While the water in the boxes gradually froze, men gave it a stir or two
 with a stick occasionally--to liberate the air-bubbles, I think. Other
 men were continually lifting out boxes whose contents had become hard
 frozen. They gave the box a single dip into a vat of boiling water, to
 melt the block of ice free from its tin coffin, then they shot the block
 out upon a platform car, and it was ready for market. These big blocks
 were hard, solid, and crystal-clear. In certain of them, big bouquets
 of fresh and brilliant tropical flowers had been frozen-in; in others,
 beautiful silken-clad French dolls, and other pretty objects.
 These blocks were to be set on end in a platter, in the center of
 dinner-tables, to cool the tropical air; and also to be ornamental, for
 the flowers and things imprisoned in them could be seen as through plate
 glass. I was told that this factory could retail its ice, by wagon,
 throughout New Orleans, in the humblest dwelling-house quantities, at
 six or seven dollars a ton, and make a sufficient profit. This being the
 case, there is business for ice-factories in the North; for we get ice
 on no such terms there, if one take less than three hundred and fifty
 pounds at a delivery.
 
 The Rosalie Yarn Mill, of Natchez, has a capacity of 6,000 spindles and
 160 looms, and employs 100 hands. The Natchez Cotton Mills Company began
--**--**--
 it was a hopeless fight from the first. A well-directed blow sent his
 club whirling out of his grasp, and the next moment he was a dead man.
 
 About the same time, two 'highly connected' young Virginians, clerks in
 a hardware store at Charlottesville, while 'skylarking,' came to blows.
 Peter Dick threw pepper in Charles Roads's eyes; Roads demanded an
 apology; Dick refused to give it, and it was agreed that a duel was
 inevitable, but a difficulty arose; the parties had no pistols, and
 it was too late at night to procure them. One of them suggested that
 butcher-knives would answer the purpose, and the other accepted the
 suggestion; the result was that Roads fell to the floor with a gash in
 his abdomen that may or may not prove fatal. If Dick has been arrested,
 the news has not reached us. He 'expressed deep regret,' and we are told
 by a Staunton correspondent of the PHILADELPHIA PRESS that 'every
 effort has been made to hush the matter up.'--EXTRACTS FROM THE PUBLIC
 JOURNALS.]}
 
 
 What, warder, ho! the man that can blow so complacent a blast as that,
 probably blows it from a castle.
 
 From Baton Rouge to New Orleans, the great sugar plantations border both
 sides of the river all the way, and stretch their league-wide levels
 back to the dim forest-walls of bearded cypress in the rear.
 Shores lonely no longer. Plenty of dwellings all the way, on both
 banks--standing so close together, for long distances, that the broad
 river lying between the two rows, becomes a sort of spacious street.
 A most home-like and happy-looking region. And now and then you see a
 pillared and porticoed great manor-house, embowered in trees. Here is
 testimony of one or two of the procession of foreign tourists that filed
--**--**--
 it is true; but better a debt paid after nineteen hundred years, and
 outlawed by the statute of limitations, than not paid at all; and most
 of the knights of the halo do not pay at all. Where you find one that
 pays--like St. Anne--you find a hundred and fifty that take the benefit
 of the statute. And none of them pay any more than the principal of what
 they owe--they pay none of the interest either simple or compound. A
 Saint can never QUITE return the principal, however; for his dead body
 KILLS people, whereas his relics HEAL only--they never restore the dead
 to life. That part of the account is always left unsettled.
 
 'Dr. F. Julius Le Moyne, after fifty years of medical practice, wrote:
 "The inhumation of human bodies, dead from infectious diseases, results
 in constantly loading the atmosphere, and polluting the waters, with
 not only the germs that rise from simply putrefaction, but also with the
 SPECIFIC germs of the diseases from which death resulted."
 
 'The gases (from buried corpses) will rise to the surface through
 eight or ten feet of gravel, just as coal-gas will do, and there is
 practically no limit to their power of escape.
 
 'During the epidemic in New Orleans in 1853, Dr. E. H. Barton reported
 that in the Fourth District the mortality was four hundred and fifty-two
 per thousand--more than double that of any other. In this district were
 three large cemeteries, in which during the previous year more than
 three thousand bodies had been buried. In other districts the proximity
 of cemeteries seemed to aggravate the disease.
 
 'In 1828 Professor Bianchi demonstrated how the fearful reappearance of
 the plague at Modena was caused by excavations in ground where, THREE
 HUNDRED YEARS PREVIOUSLY, the victims of the pestilence had been buried.
--**--**--
 he is worth a cool six hundred--that's what HE'S worth. There ain't
 anything equal to it but trading rats for di'monds in time of famine.
 Well, don't you see, when there's an epidemic, people don't wait to
 embam. No, indeed they don't; and it hurts the business like hell-th,
 as we say--hurts it like hell-th, HEALTH, see?--Our little joke in the
 trade. Well, I must be going. Give me a call whenever you need any--I
 mean, when you're going by, sometime.'
 
 In his joyful high spirits, he did the exaggerating himself, if any has
 been done. I have not enlarged on him.
 
 With the above brief references to inhumation, let us leave the subject.
 As for me, I hope to be cremated. I made that remark to my pastor once,
 who said, with what he seemed to think was an impressive manner--
 
 'I wouldn't worry about that, if I had your chances.' Much he knew about
 it--the family all so opposed to it.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 44 City Sights
 
 THE old French part of New Orleans--anciently the Spanish part--bears no
 resemblance to the American end of the city: the American end which lies
 beyond the intervening brick business-center. The houses are massed in
 blocks; are austerely plain and dignified; uniform of pattern, with here
 and there a departure from it with pleasant effect; all are plastered
 on the outside, and nearly all have long, iron-railed verandas running
 along the several stories. Their chief beauty is the deep, warm,
 varicolored stain with which time and the weather have enriched the
 plaster. It harmonizes with all the surroundings, and has as natural
 a look of belonging there as has the flush upon sunset clouds. This
 charming decoration cannot be successfully imitated; neither is it to be
 found elsewhere in America.
 
 The iron railings are a specialty, also. The pattern is often
--**--**--
 through the infantry drill, with broom in place of musket. It is a
 very pretty sight, on private view. When they perform on the stage of
 a theater, in the blaze of colored fires, it must be a fine and
 fascinating spectacle. I saw them go through their complex manual with
 grace, spirit, and admirable precision. I saw them do everything which
 a human being can possibly do with a broom, except sweep. I did not see
 them sweep. But I know they could learn. What they have already learned
 proves that. And if they ever should learn, and should go on the
 war-path down Tchoupitoulas or some of those other streets around there,
 those thoroughfares would bear a greatly improved aspect in a very few
 minutes. But the girls themselves wouldn't; so nothing would be really
 gained, after all.
 
 The drill was in the Washington Artillery building. In this building
 we saw many interesting relics of the war. Also a fine oil-painting
 representing Stonewall Jackson's last interview with General Lee. Both
 men are on horseback. Jackson has just ridden up, and is accosting Lee.
 The picture is very valuable, on account of the portraits, which are
 authentic. But, like many another historical picture, it means nothing
 without its label. And one label will fit it as well as another--
 
 First Interview between Lee and Jackson.
 
 Last Interview between Lee and Jackson.
 
 Jackson Introducing Himself to Lee.
 
 Jackson Accepting Lee's Invitation to Dinner.
 
 Jackson Declining Lee's Invitation to Dinner--with Thanks.
 
 Jackson Apologizing for a Heavy Defeat.
 
 Jackson Reporting a Great Victory.
 
 Jackson Asking Lee for a Match.
 
 It tells ONE story, and a sufficient one; for it says quite plainly and
 satisfactorily, 'Here are Lee and Jackson together.' The artist would
 have made it tell that this is Lee and Jackson's last interview if he
--**--**--
 The shopman always responds; gives the child a bit of licorice-root,
 gives the servant a cheap cigar or a spool of thread, gives the
 governor--I don't know what he gives the governor; support, likely.
 
 When you are invited to drink, and this does occur now and then in New
 Orleans--and you say, 'What, again?--no, I've had enough;' the other
 party says, 'But just this one time more--this is for lagniappe.' When
 the beau perceives that he is stacking his compliments a trifle too
 high, and sees by the young lady's countenance that the edifice would
 have been better with the top compliment left off, he puts his 'I beg
 pardon--no harm intended,' into the briefer form of 'Oh, that's for
 lagniappe.' If the waiter in the restaurant stumbles and spills a gill
 of coffee down the back of your neck, he says 'For lagniappe, sah,' and
 gets you another cup without extra charge.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter 45 Southern Sports
 
 IN the North one hears the war mentioned, in social conversation, once a
 month; sometimes as often as once a week; but as a distinct subject
 for talk, it has long ago been relieved of duty. There are sufficient
 reasons for this. Given a dinner company of six gentlemen to-day, it
 can easily happen that four of them--and possibly five--were not in the
 field at all. So the chances are four to two, or five to one, that the
 war will at no time during the evening become the topic of conversation;
 and the chances are still greater that if it become the topic it will
 remain so but a little while. If you add six ladies to the company, you
 have added six people who saw so little of the dread realities of the
 war that they ran out of talk concerning them years ago, and now would
--**--**--
 All the riders were young gentlemen in fashionable society. If the
 reader has been wondering why it is that the ladies of New Orleans
 attend so humble an orgy as a mule-race, the thing is explained now. It
 is a fashion-freak; all connected with it are people of fashion.
 
 It is great fun, and cordially liked. The mule-race is one of the marked
 occasions of the year. It has brought some pretty fast mules to the
 front. One of these had to be ruled out, because he was so fast that he
 turned the thing into a one-mule contest, and robbed it of one of its
 best features--variety. But every now and then somebody disguises him
 with a new name and a new complexion, and rings him in again.
 
 The riders dress in full jockey costumes of bright-colored silks,
 satins, and velvets.
 
 The thirteen mules got away in a body, after a couple of false starts,
 and scampered off with prodigious spirit. As each mule and each rider
 had a distinct opinion of his own as to how the race ought to be run,
 and which side of the track was best in certain circumstances, and how
 often the track ought to be crossed, and when a collision ought to
 be accomplished, and when it ought to be avoided, these twenty-six
 conflicting opinions created a most fantastic and picturesque confusion,
 and the resulting spectacle was killingly comical.
 
 Mile heat; time 2:22. Eight of the thirteen mules distanced. I had a bet
 on a mule which would have won if the procession had been reversed. The
 second heat was good fun; and so was the 'consolation race for beaten
 mules,' which followed later; but the first heat was the best in that
 respect.
 
 I think that much the most enjoyable of all races is a steamboat race;
--**--**--
 an appreciative nation to celebrate the battle of New Orleans--Jackson's
 victory over the British, January 8, 1815. The war had ended, the two
 nations were at peace, but the news had not yet reached New Orleans. If
 we had had the cable telegraph in those days, this blood would not have
 been spilt, those lives would not have been wasted; and better still,
 Jackson would probably never have been president. We have gotten over
 the harms done us by the war of 1812, but not over some of those done us
 by Jackson's presidency.
 
 The Warmouth plantation covers a vast deal of ground, and the
 hospitality of the Warmouth mansion is graduated to the same large
 scale. We saw steam-plows at work, here, for the first time. The
 traction engine travels about on its own wheels, till it reaches the
 required spot; then it stands still and by means of a wire rope pulls
 the huge plow toward itself two or three hundred yards across the field,
 between the rows of cane. The thing cuts down into the black mold a foot
 and a half deep. The plow looks like a fore-and-aft brace of a Hudson
 river steamer, inverted. When the negro steersman sits on one end of it,
 that end tilts down near the ground, while the other sticks up high in
 air. This great see-saw goes rolling and pitching like a ship at sea,
 and it is not every circus rider that could stay on it.
 
 The plantation contains two thousand six hundred acres; six hundred and
 fifty are in cane; and there is a fruitful orange grove of five thousand
 trees. The cane is cultivated after a modern and intricate scientific
 fashion, too elaborate and complex for me to attempt to describe; but it
 lost $40,000 last year. I forget the other details. However, this year's
--**--**--
 Then the male members of the party moved to the forecastle, to smoke and
 gossip. There were several old steamboatmen along, and I learned from
 them a great deal of what had been happening to my former river friends
 during my long absence. I learned that a pilot whom I used to steer
 for is become a spiritualist, and for more than fifteen years has been
 receiving a letter every week from a deceased relative, through a
 New York spiritualist medium named Manchester--postage graduated by
 distance: from the local post-office in Paradise to New York, five
 dollars; from New York to St. Louis, three cents. I remember Mr.
 Manchester very well. I called on him once, ten years ago, with a couple
 of friends, one of whom wished to inquire after a deceased uncle. This
 uncle had lost his life in a peculiarly violent and unusual way, half
 a dozen years before: a cyclone blew him some three miles and knocked
 a tree down with him which was four feet through at the butt and
 sixty-five feet high. He did not survive this triumph. At the seance
 just referred to, my friend questioned his late uncle, through Mr.
 Manchester, and the late uncle wrote down his replies, using Mr.
 Manchester's hand and pencil for that purpose. The following is a fair
 example of the questions asked, and also of the sloppy twaddle in the
 way of answers, furnished by Manchester under the pretense that it came
 from the specter. If this man is not the paltriest fraud that lives, I
 owe him an apology--
 
 QUESTION. Where are you?
 
 ANSWER. In the spirit world.
 
 Q. Are you happy?
 
 A. Very happy. Perfectly happy.
 
 Q. How do you amuse yourself?
 
 A. Conversation with friends, and other spirits.
 
 Q. What else?
 
 A. Nothing else. Nothing else is necessary.
--**--**--
 The house which Tom's father lived in was up a foul little pocket called
 Offal Court, out of Pudding Lane.  It was small, decayed, and rickety,
 but it was packed full of wretchedly poor families. Canty's tribe
 occupied a room on the third floor.  The mother and father had a sort of
 bedstead in the corner; but Tom, his grandmother, and his two sisters,
 Bet and Nan, were not restricted--they had all the floor to themselves,
 and might sleep where they chose.  There were the remains of a blanket or
 two, and some bundles of ancient and dirty straw, but these could not
 rightly be called beds, for they were not organised; they were kicked
 into a general pile, mornings, and selections made from the mass at
 night, for service.
 
 Bet and Nan were fifteen years old--twins.  They were good-hearted girls,
 unclean, clothed in rags, and profoundly ignorant.  Their mother was like
 them.  But the father and the grandmother were a couple of fiends.  They
 got drunk whenever they could; then they fought each other or anybody
 else who came in the way; they cursed and swore always, drunk or sober;
 John Canty was a thief, and his mother a beggar.  They made beggars of
 the children, but failed to make thieves of them.  Among, but not of, the
 dreadful rabble that inhabited the house, was a good old priest whom the
 King had turned out of house and home with a pension of a few farthings,
 and he used to get the children aside and teach them right ways secretly.
 Father Andrew also taught Tom a little Latin, and how to read and write;
 and would have done the same with the girls, but they were afraid of the
 jeers of their friends, who could not have endured such a queer
--**--**--
 superior being.  He seemed to know so much! and he could do and say such
 marvellous things! and withal, he was so deep and wise!  Tom's remarks,
 and Tom's performances, were reported by the boys to their elders; and
 these, also, presently began to discuss Tom Canty, and to regard him as a
 most gifted and extraordinary creature.  Full-grown people brought their
 perplexities to Tom for solution, and were often astonished at the wit
 and wisdom of his decisions.  In fact he was become a hero to all who
 knew him except his own family--these, only, saw nothing in him.
 
 Privately, after a while, Tom organised a royal court!  He was the
 prince; his special comrades were guards, chamberlains, equerries, lords
 and ladies in waiting, and the royal family.  Daily the mock prince was
 received with elaborate ceremonials borrowed by Tom from his romantic
 readings; daily the great affairs of the mimic kingdom were discussed in
 the royal council, and daily his mimic highness issued decrees to his
 imaginary armies, navies, and viceroyalties.
 
 After which, he would go forth in his rags and beg a few farthings, eat
 his poor crust, take his customary cuffs and abuse, and then stretch
 himself upon his handful of foul straw, and resume his empty grandeurs in
 his dreams.
 
 And still his desire to look just once upon a real prince, in the flesh,
 grew upon him, day by day, and week by week, until at last it absorbed
 all other desires, and became the one passion of his life.
 
 One January day, on his usual begging tour, he tramped despondently up
 and down the region round about Mincing Lane and Little East Cheap, hour
 after hour, bare-footed and cold, looking in at cook-shop windows and
 longing for the dreadful pork-pies and other deadly inventions displayed
--**--**--
 had ceased to be a country-road then, and regarded itself as a street,
 but by a strained construction; for, though there was a tolerably compact
 row of houses on one side of it, there were only some scattered great
 buildings on the other, these being palaces of rich nobles, with ample
 and beautiful grounds stretching to the river--grounds that are now
 closely packed with grim acres of brick and stone.
 
 Tom discovered Charing Village presently, and rested himself at the
 beautiful cross built there by a bereaved king of earlier days; then
 idled down a quiet, lovely road, past the great cardinal's stately
 palace, toward a far more mighty and majestic palace beyond--Westminster.
 Tom stared in glad wonder at the vast pile of masonry, the wide-spreading
 wings, the frowning bastions and turrets, the huge stone gateway, with
 its gilded bars and its magnificent array of colossal granite lions, and
 other the signs and symbols of English royalty.  Was the desire of his
 soul to be satisfied at last?  Here, indeed, was a king's palace.  Might
 he not hope to see a prince now--a prince of flesh and blood, if Heaven
 were willing?
 
 At each side of the gilded gate stood a living statue--that is to say, an
 erect and stately and motionless man-at-arms, clad from head to heel in
 shining steel armour.  At a respectful distance were many country folk,
 and people from the city, waiting for any chance glimpse of royalty that
 might offer.  Splendid carriages, with splendid people in them and
 splendid servants outside, were arriving and departing by several other
 noble gateways that pierced the royal enclosure.
 
 Poor little Tom, in his rags, approached, and was moving slowly and
 timidly past the sentinels, with a beating heart and a rising hope, when
 all at once he caught sight through the golden bars of a spectacle that
--**--**--
 laugh.  But thy good Nan and thy Bet shall have raiment and lackeys enow,
 and that soon, too:  my cofferer shall look to it.  No, thank me not;
 'tis nothing.  Thou speakest well; thou hast an easy grace in it.  Art
 learned?"
 
 "I know not if I am or not, sir.  The good priest that is called Father
 Andrew taught me, of his kindness, from his books."
 
 "Know'st thou the Latin?"
 
 "But scantly, sir, I doubt."
 
 "Learn it, lad:  'tis hard only at first.  The Greek is harder; but
 neither these nor any tongues else, I think, are hard to the Lady
 Elizabeth and my cousin.  Thou should'st hear those damsels at it!  But
 tell me of thy Offal Court.  Hast thou a pleasant life there?"
 
 "In truth, yes, so please you, sir, save when one is hungry. There be
 Punch-and-Judy shows, and monkeys--oh such antic creatures! and so
 bravely dressed!--and there be plays wherein they that play do shout and
 fight till all are slain, and 'tis so fine to see, and costeth but a
 farthing--albeit 'tis main hard to get the farthing, please your
 worship."
 
 "Tell me more."
 
 "We lads of Offal Court do strive against each other with the cudgel,
 like to the fashion of the 'prentices, sometimes."
 
 The prince's eyes flashed.  Said he--
 
 "Marry, that would not I mislike.  Tell me more."
 
 "We strive in races, sir, to see who of us shall be fleetest."
 
 "That would I like also.  Speak on."
 
 "In summer, sir, we wade and swim in the canals and in the river, and
 each doth duck his neighbour, and splatter him with water, and dive and
 shout and tumble and--"
 
 "'Twould be worth my father's kingdom but to enjoy it once! Prithee go
 on."
 
 "We dance and sing about the Maypole in Cheapside; we play in the sand,
--**--**--
 
 
 Chapter IV. The Prince's troubles begin.
 
 After hours of persistent pursuit and persecution, the little prince was
 at last deserted by the rabble and left to himself.  As long as he had
 been able to rage against the mob, and threaten it royally, and royally
 utter commands that were good stuff to laugh at, he was very
 entertaining; but when weariness finally forced him to be silent, he was
 no longer of use to his tormentors, and they sought amusement elsewhere.
 He looked about him, now, but could not recognise the locality.  He was
 within the city of London--that was all he knew.  He moved on, aimlessly,
 and in a little while the houses thinned, and the passers-by were
 infrequent.  He bathed his bleeding feet in the brook which flowed then
 where Farringdon Street now is; rested a few moments, then passed on, and
 presently came upon a great space with only a few scattered houses in it,
 and a prodigious church.  He recognised this church.  Scaffoldings were
 about, everywhere, and swarms of workmen; for it was undergoing elaborate
 repairs.  The prince took heart at once--he felt that his troubles were
 at an end, now.  He said to himself, "It is the ancient Grey Friars'
 Church, which the king my father hath taken from the monks and given for
 a home for ever for poor and forsaken children, and new-named it Christ's
 Church.  Right gladly will they serve the son of him who hath done so
 generously by them--and the more that that son is himself as poor and as
 forlorn as any that be sheltered here this day, or ever shall be."
 
 He was soon in the midst of a crowd of boys who were running, jumping,
 playing at ball and leap-frog, and otherwise disporting themselves, and
 right noisily, too.  They were all dressed alike, and in the fashion
--**--**--
 "Hale him forth!  To the horse-pond, to the horse-pond!  Where be the
 dogs?  Ho, there, Lion! ho, Fangs!"
 
 Then followed such a thing as England had never seen before--the sacred
 person of the heir to the throne rudely buffeted by plebeian hands, and
 set upon and torn by dogs.
 
 As night drew to a close that day, the prince found himself far down in
 the close-built portion of the city.  His body was bruised, his hands
 were bleeding, and his rags were all besmirched with mud.  He wandered on
 and on, and grew more and more bewildered, and so tired and faint he
 could hardly drag one foot after the other.  He had ceased to ask
 questions of anyone, since they brought him only insult instead of
 information.  He kept muttering to himself, "Offal Court--that is the
 name; if I can but find it before my strength is wholly spent and I drop,
 then am I saved--for his people will take me to the palace and prove that
 I am none of theirs, but the true prince, and I shall have mine own
 again."  And now and then his mind reverted to his treatment by those
 rude Christ's Hospital boys, and he said, "When I am king, they shall not
 have bread and shelter only, but also teachings out of books; for a full
 belly is little worth where the mind is starved, and the heart.  I will
 keep this diligently in my remembrance, that this day's lesson be not
 lost upon me, and my people suffer thereby; for learning softeneth the
 heart and breedeth gentleness and charity." {1}
 
 The lights began to twinkle, it came on to rain, the wind rose, and a raw
 and gusty night set in.  The houseless prince, the homeless heir to the
 throne of England, still moved on, drifting deeper into the maze of
--**--**--
 Tom's breath was nearly failing him; but he made shift to stammer out--
 
 "Ah, be merciful, thou!  In sooth I am no lord, but only poor Tom Canty
 of Offal Court in the city.  Prithee let me see the prince, and he will
 of his grace restore to me my rags, and let me hence unhurt.  Oh, be thou
 merciful, and save me!"
 
 By this time the boy was on his knees, and supplicating with his eyes and
 uplifted hands as well as with his tongue.  The young girl seemed
 horror-stricken.  She cried out--
 
 "O my lord, on thy knees?--and to ME!"
 
 Then she fled away in fright; and Tom, smitten with despair, sank down,
 murmuring--
 
 "There is no help, there is no hope.  Now will they come and take me."
 
 Whilst he lay there benumbed with terror, dreadful tidings were speeding
 through the palace.  The whisper--for it was whispered always--flew from
 menial to menial, from lord to lady, down all the long corridors, from
 story to story, from saloon to saloon, "The prince hath gone mad, the
 prince hath gone mad!"  Soon every saloon, every marble hall, had its
 groups of glittering lords and ladies, and other groups of dazzling
 lesser folk, talking earnestly together in whispers, and every face had
 in it dismay. Presently a splendid official came marching by these
 groups, making solemn proclamation--
 
 "IN THE NAME OF THE KING!
 
 Let none list to this false and foolish matter, upon pain of death, nor
 discuss the same, nor carry it abroad.  In the name of the King!"
 
 The whisperings ceased as suddenly as if the whisperers had been stricken
 dumb.
 
 Soon there was a general buzz along the corridors, of "The prince! See,
 the prince comes!"
 
 Poor Tom came slowly walking past the low-bowing groups, trying to bow in
--**--**--
 diffidently--
 
 "I have no knowledge of this tongue, so please your majesty."
 
 The King fell back upon his couch.  The attendants flew to his
 assistance; but he put them aside, and said--
 
 "Trouble me not--it is nothing but a scurvy faintness.  Raise me! There,
 'tis sufficient.  Come hither, child; there, rest thy poor troubled head
 upon thy father's heart, and be at peace.  Thou'lt soon be well:  'tis
 but a passing fantasy.  Fear thou not; thou'lt soon be well."  Then he
 turned toward the company:  his gentle manner changed, and baleful
 lightnings began to play from his eyes.  He said--
 
 "List ye all!  This my son is mad; but it is not permanent.  Over-study
 hath done this, and somewhat too much of confinement.  Away with his
 books and teachers! see ye to it.  Pleasure him with sports, beguile him
 in wholesome ways, so that his health come again."  He raised himself
 higher still, and went on with energy, "He is mad; but he is my son, and
 England's heir; and, mad or sane, still shall he reign!  And hear ye
 further, and proclaim it: whoso speaketh of this his distemper worketh
 against the peace and order of these realms, and shall to the gallows!
 . . . Give me to drink--I burn:  this sorrow sappeth my strength. . . .
 There, take away the cup. . . . Support me.  There, that is well.  Mad,
 is he?  Were he a thousand times mad, yet is he Prince of Wales, and I the
 King will confirm it.  This very morrow shall he be installed in his
 princely dignity in due and ancient form.  Take instant order for it, my
 lord Hertford."
 
 One of the nobles knelt at the royal couch, and said--
 
 "The King's majesty knoweth that the Hereditary Great Marshal of England
--**--**--
 
 "The King hath said it.  None may palter with the King's command, or fit
 it to his ease, where it doth chafe, with deft evasions. The King shall
 be obeyed."
 
 Lord Hertford said--
 
 "Touching the King's majesty's ordainment concerning books and such like
 serious matters, it may peradventure please your highness to ease your
 time with lightsome entertainment, lest you go wearied to the banquet and
 suffer harm thereby."
 
 Tom's face showed inquiring surprise; and a blush followed when he saw
 Lord St. John's eyes bent sorrowfully upon him.  His lordship said--
 
 "Thy memory still wrongeth thee, and thou hast shown surprise--but suffer
 it not to trouble thee, for 'tis a matter that will not bide, but depart
 with thy mending malady.  My Lord of Hertford speaketh of the city's
 banquet which the King's majesty did promise, some two months flown, your
 highness should attend.  Thou recallest it now?"
 
 "It grieves me to confess it had indeed escaped me," said Tom, in a
 hesitating voice; and blushed again.
 
 At this moment the Lady Elizabeth and the Lady Jane Grey were announced.
 The two lords exchanged significant glances, and Hertford stepped quickly
 toward the door.  As the young girls passed him, he said in a low voice--
 
 "I pray ye, ladies, seem not to observe his humours, nor show surprise
 when his memory doth lapse--it will grieve you to note how it doth stick
 at every trifle."
 
 Meantime Lord St. John was saying in Tom's ear--
 
 "Please you, sir, keep diligently in mind his majesty's desire. Remember
 all thou canst--SEEM to remember all else.  Let them not perceive that
 thou art much changed from thy wont, for thou knowest how tenderly thy
 old play-fellows bear thee in their hearts and how 'twould grieve them.
 Art willing, sir, that I remain?--and thine uncle?"
--**--**--
 when the ladies' visit was drawing to a close and the Lord Guilford
 Dudley was announced, they not only felt that their charge had been
 sufficiently taxed for the present, but also that they themselves were
 not in the best condition to take their ship back and make their anxious
 voyage all over again.  So they respectfully advised Tom to excuse
 himself, which he was very glad to do, although a slight shade of
 disappointment might have been observed upon my Lady Jane's face when she
 heard the splendid stripling denied admittance.
 
 There was a pause now, a sort of waiting silence which Tom could not
 understand.  He glanced at Lord Hertford, who gave him a sign--but he
 failed to understand that also.  The ready Elizabeth came to the rescue
 with her usual easy grace.  She made reverence and said--
 
 "Have we leave of the prince's grace my brother to go?"
 
 Tom said--
 
 "Indeed your ladyships can have whatsoever of me they will, for the
 asking; yet would I rather give them any other thing that in my poor
 power lieth, than leave to take the light and blessing of their presence
 hence.  Give ye good den, and God be with ye!" Then he smiled inwardly at
 the thought, "'Tis not for nought I have dwelt but among princes in my
 reading, and taught my tongue some slight trick of their broidered and
 gracious speech withal!"
 
 When the illustrious maidens were gone, Tom turned wearily to his keepers
 and said--
 
 "May it please your lordships to grant me leave to go into some corner
 and rest me?"
 
 Lord Hertford said--
 
 "So please your highness, it is for you to command, it is for us to obey.
 That thou should'st rest is indeed a needful thing, since thou must
 journey to the city presently."
--**--**--
 
 "Peace, my lord, thou utterest treason!  Hast forgot the King's command?
 Remember I am party to thy crime if I but listen."
 
 St. John paled, and hastened to say--
 
 "I was in fault, I do confess it.  Betray me not, grant me this grace out
 of thy courtesy, and I will neither think nor speak of this thing more.
 Deal not hardly with me, sir, else am I ruined."
 
 "I am content, my lord.  So thou offend not again, here or in the ears of
 others, it shall be as though thou hadst not spoken.  But thou need'st
 not have misgivings.  He is my sister's son; are not his voice, his face,
 his form, familiar to me from his cradle? Madness can do all the odd
 conflicting things thou seest in him, and more.  Dost not recall how that
 the old Baron Marley, being mad, forgot the favour of his own countenance
 that he had known for sixty years, and held it was another's; nay, even
 claimed he was the son of Mary Magdalene, and that his head was made of
 Spanish glass; and, sooth to say, he suffered none to touch it, lest by
 mischance some heedless hand might shiver it?  Give thy misgivings
 easement, good my lord.  This is the very prince--I know him well--and
 soon will be thy king; it may advantage thee to bear this in mind, and
 more dwell upon it than the other."
 
 After some further talk, in which the Lord St. John covered up his
 mistake as well as he could by repeated protests that his faith was
 thoroughly grounded now, and could not be assailed by doubts again, the
 Lord Hertford relieved his fellow-keeper, and sat down to keep watch and
 ward alone.  He was soon deep in meditation, and evidently the longer he
--**--**--
 Ceremonies was not present:  there was no one who felt safe to venture
 upon this uncharted sea, or risk the attempt to solve this solemn
 problem.  Alas! there was no Hereditary Scratcher.  Meantime the tears
 had overflowed their banks, and begun to trickle down Tom's cheeks.  His
 twitching nose was pleading more urgently than ever for relief.  At last
 nature broke down the barriers of etiquette:  Tom lifted up an inward
 prayer for pardon if he was doing wrong, and brought relief to the
 burdened hearts of his court by scratching his nose himself.
 
 His meal being ended, a lord came and held before him a broad, shallow,
 golden dish with fragrant rosewater in it, to cleanse his mouth and
 fingers with; and my lord the Hereditary Diaperer stood by with a napkin
 for his use.  Tom gazed at the dish a puzzled moment or two, then raised
 it to his lips, and gravely took a draught.  Then he returned it to the
 waiting lord, and said--
 
 "Nay, it likes me not, my lord:  it hath a pretty flavour, but it wanteth
 strength."
 
 This new eccentricity of the prince's ruined mind made all the hearts
 about him ache; but the sad sight moved none to merriment.
 
 Tom's next unconscious blunder was to get up and leave the table just
 when the chaplain had taken his stand behind his chair, and with uplifted
 hands, and closed, uplifted eyes, was in the act of beginning the
 blessing.  Still nobody seemed to perceive that the prince had done a
 thing unusual.
 
 By his own request our small friend was now conducted to his private
 cabinet, and left there alone to his own devices.  Hanging upon hooks in
 the oaken wainscoting were the several pieces of a suit of shining steel
 armour, covered all over with beautiful designs exquisitely inlaid in
--**--**--
 worth withal, that any should attempt to search the long array of
 chambers and saloons that belong unto his royal high--"
 
 A groan from the King interrupted the lord at this point.  After a little
 while his majesty said, with a deep sadness in his tone--
 
 "Trouble him no more, poor child.  The hand of God lieth heavy upon him,
 and my heart goeth out in loving compassion for him, and sorrow that I
 may not bear his burden on mine old trouble-weighted shoulders, and so
 bring him peace."
 
 He closed his eyes, fell to mumbling, and presently was silent. After a
 time he opened his eyes again, and gazed vacantly around until his glance
 rested upon the kneeling Lord Chancellor. Instantly his face flushed with
 wrath--
 
 "What, thou here yet!  By the glory of God, an' thou gettest not about
 that traitor's business, thy mitre shall have holiday the morrow for lack
 of a head to grace withal!"
 
 The trembling Chancellor answered--
 
 "Good your Majesty, I cry you mercy!  I but waited for the Seal."
 
 "Man, hast lost thy wits?  The small Seal which aforetime I was wont to
 take with me abroad lieth in my treasury.  And, since the Great Seal hath
 flown away, shall not it suffice?  Hast lost thy wits?  Begone!  And hark
 ye--come no more till thou do bring his head."
 
 The poor Chancellor was not long in removing himself from this dangerous
 vicinity; nor did the commission waste time in giving the royal assent to
 the work of the slavish Parliament, and appointing the morrow for the
 beheading of the premier peer of England, the luckless Duke of Norfolk.
 {1}
 
 
 
 Chapter IX. The river pageant.
 
 At nine in the evening the whole vast river-front of the palace was
 blazing with light.  The river itself, as far as the eye could reach
--**--**--
 
 "Tarry!  There's fine mummeries here.  Mar them not till thou'st enjoyed
 them:  then let thy hand be heavy as thou wilt.  Stand forth, lad.  Now
 say thy foolery again, an thou'st not forgot it. Name thy name.  Who art
 thou?"
 
 The insulted blood mounted to the little prince's cheek once more, and he
 lifted a steady and indignant gaze to the man's face and said--
 
 "'Tis but ill-breeding in such as thou to command me to speak.  I tell
 thee now, as I told thee before, I am Edward, Prince of Wales, and none
 other."
 
 The stunning surprise of this reply nailed the hag's feet to the floor
 where she stood, and almost took her breath.  She stared at the Prince in
 stupid amazement, which so amused her ruffianly son, that he burst into a
 roar of laughter.  But the effect upon Tom Canty's mother and sisters was
 different.  Their dread of bodily injury gave way at once to distress of
 a different sort.  They ran forward with woe and dismay in their faces,
 exclaiming--
 
 "Oh, poor Tom, poor lad!"
 
 The mother fell on her knees before the Prince, put her hands upon his
 shoulders, and gazed yearningly into his face through her rising tears.
 Then she said--
 
 "Oh, my poor boy!  Thy foolish reading hath wrought its woeful work at
 last, and ta'en thy wit away.  Ah! why did'st thou cleave to it when I so
 warned thee 'gainst it?  Thou'st broke thy mother's heart."
 
 The Prince looked into her face, and said gently--
 
 "Thy son is well, and hath not lost his wits, good dame.  Comfort thee:
 let me to the palace where he is, and straightway will the King my father
 restore him to thee."
 
 "The King thy father!  Oh, my child! unsay these words that be freighted
--**--**--
 she contrived to hide her emotions, and to soothe the boy to sleep again;
 then she crept apart and communed miserably with herself upon the
 disastrous result of her experiment.  She tried to believe that her Tom's
 madness had banished this habitual gesture of his; but she could not do
 it.  "No," she said, "his HANDS are not mad; they could not unlearn so
 old a habit in so brief a time.  Oh, this is a heavy day for me!"
 
 Still, hope was as stubborn now as doubt had been before; she could not
 bring herself to accept the verdict of the test; she must try the thing
 again--the failure must have been only an accident; so she startled the
 boy out of his sleep a second and a third time, at intervals--with the
 same result which had marked the first test; then she dragged herself to
 bed, and fell sorrowfully asleep, saying, "But I cannot give him up--oh
 no, I cannot, I cannot--he MUST be my boy!"
 
 The poor mother's interruptions having ceased, and the Prince's pains
 having gradually lost their power to disturb him, utter weariness at last
 sealed his eyes in a profound and restful sleep. Hour after hour slipped
 away, and still he slept like the dead. Thus four or five hours passed.
 Then his stupor began to lighten. Presently, while half asleep and half
 awake, he murmured--
 
 "Sir William!"
 
 After a moment--
 
 "Ho, Sir William Herbert!  Hie thee hither, and list to the strangest
 dream that ever . . . Sir William! dost hear?  Man, I did think me
 changed to a pauper, and . . . Ho there!  Guards! Sir William!  What! is
 there no groom of the chamber in waiting? Alack! it shall go hard with--"
 
 "What aileth thee?" asked a whisper near him.  "Who art thou calling?"
--**--**--
 Arrived at the Dowgate, the fleet was towed up the limpid Walbrook (whose
 channel has now been for two centuries buried out of sight under acres of
 buildings) to Bucklersbury, past houses and under bridges populous with
 merry-makers and brilliantly lighted, and at last came to a halt in a
 basin where now is Barge Yard, in the centre of the ancient city of
 London.  Tom disembarked, and he and his gallant procession crossed
 Cheapside and made a short march through the Old Jewry and Basinghall
 Street to the Guildhall.
 
 Tom and his little ladies were received with due ceremony by the Lord
 Mayor and the Fathers of the City, in their gold chains and scarlet robes
 of state, and conducted to a rich canopy of state at the head of the
 great hall, preceded by heralds making proclamation, and by the Mace and
 the City Sword.  The lords and ladies who were to attend upon Tom and his
 two small friends took their places behind their chairs.
 
 At a lower table the Court grandees and other guests of noble degree were
 seated, with the magnates of the city; the commoners took places at a
 multitude of tables on the main floor of the hall.  From their lofty
 vantage-ground the giants Gog and Magog, the ancient guardians of the
 city, contemplated the spectacle below them with eyes grown familiar to
 it in forgotten generations.  There was a bugle-blast and a proclamation,
 and a fat butler appeared in a high perch in the leftward wall, followed
 by his servitors bearing with impressive solemnity a royal baron of beef,
 smoking hot and ready for the knife.
 
 After grace, Tom (being instructed) rose--and the whole house with him
 --and drank from a portly golden loving-cup with the Princess Elizabeth;
 from her it passed to the Lady Jane, and then traversed the general
--**--**--
 lad, and not friendless neither!  Here stand I by thy side to prove it;
 and mind I tell thee thou might'st have a worser friend than Miles Hendon
 and yet not tire thy legs with seeking. Rest thy small jaw, my child; I
 talk the language of these base kennel-rats like to a very native."
 
 The speaker was a sort of Don Caesar de Bazan in dress, aspect, and
 bearing.  He was tall, trim-built, muscular.  His doublet and trunks were
 of rich material, but faded and threadbare, and their gold-lace
 adornments were sadly tarnished; his ruff was rumpled and damaged; the
 plume in his slouched hat was broken and had a bedraggled and
 disreputable look; at his side he wore a long rapier in a rusty iron
 sheath; his swaggering carriage marked him at once as a ruffler of the
 camp.  The speech of this fantastic figure was received with an explosion
 of jeers and laughter.  Some cried, "'Tis another prince in disguise!"
 "'Ware thy tongue, friend:  belike he is dangerous!"  "Marry, he looketh
 it--mark his eye!"  "Pluck the lad from him--to the horse-pond wi' the
 cub!"
 
 Instantly a hand was laid upon the Prince, under the impulse of this
 happy thought; as instantly the stranger's long sword was out and the
 meddler went to the earth under a sounding thump with the flat of it.
 The next moment a score of voices shouted, "Kill the dog!  Kill him!
 Kill him!" and the mob closed in on the warrior, who backed himself
 against a wall and began to lay about him with his long weapon like a
 madman.  His victims sprawled this way and that, but the mob-tide poured
 over their prostrate forms and dashed itself against the champion with
 undiminished fury.  His moments seemed numbered, his destruction certain,
--**--**--
 well enough as suburbs, but not otherwise particularly important.  It was
 a close corporation, so to speak; it was a narrow town, of a single
 street a fifth of a mile long, its population was but a village
 population and everybody in it knew all his fellow-townsmen intimately,
 and had known their fathers and mothers before them--and all their little
 family affairs into the bargain.  It had its aristocracy, of course--its
 fine old families of butchers, and bakers, and what-not, who had occupied
 the same old premises for five or six hundred years, and knew the great
 history of the Bridge from beginning to end, and all its strange legends;
 and who always talked bridgy talk, and thought bridgy thoughts, and lied
 in a long, level, direct, substantial bridgy way.  It was just the sort
 of population to be narrow and ignorant and self-conceited. Children were
 born on the Bridge, were reared there, grew to old age, and finally died
 without ever having set a foot upon any part of the world but London
 Bridge alone.  Such people would naturally imagine that the mighty and
 interminable procession which moved through its street night and day,
 with its confused roar of shouts and cries, its neighings and bellowing
 and bleatings and its muffled thunder-tramp, was the one great thing in
 this world, and themselves somehow the proprietors of it.  And so they
 were, in effect--at least they could exhibit it from their windows, and
 did--for a consideration--whenever a returning king or hero gave it a
 fleeting splendour, for there was no place like it for affording a long,
 straight, uninterrupted view of marching columns.
 
 Men born and reared upon the Bridge found life unendurably dull and inane
 elsewhere.  History tells of one of these who left the Bridge at the age
--**--**--
 
 "We will see, as to that!" exclaimed John Canty, striding past Hendon to
 get at the boy; "by force shall he--"
 
 "If thou do but touch him, thou animated offal, I will spit thee like a
 goose!" said Hendon, barring the way and laying his hand upon his sword
 hilt.  Canty drew back.  "Now mark ye," continued Hendon, "I took this
 lad under my protection when a mob of such as thou would have mishandled
 him, mayhap killed him; dost imagine I will desert him now to a worser
 fate?--for whether thou art his father or no--and sooth to say, I think
 it is a lie--a decent swift death were better for such a lad than life in
 such brute hands as thine.  So go thy ways, and set quick about it, for I
 like not much bandying of words, being not over-patient in my nature."
 
 John Canty moved off, muttering threats and curses, and was swallowed
 from sight in the crowd.  Hendon ascended three flights of stairs to his
 room, with his charge, after ordering a meal to be sent thither.  It was
 a poor apartment, with a shabby bed and some odds and ends of old
 furniture in it, and was vaguely lighted by a couple of sickly candles.
 The little King dragged himself to the bed and lay down upon it, almost
 exhausted with hunger and fatigue.  He had been on his feet a good part
 of a day and a night (for it was now two or three o'clock in the
 morning), and had eaten nothing meantime.  He murmured drowsily--
 
 "Prithee call me when the table is spread," and sank into a deep sleep
 immediately.
 
 A smile twinkled in Hendon's eye, and he said to himself--
 
 "By the mass, the little beggar takes to one's quarters and usurps one's
--**--**--
 he--
 
 "Bless us, what is it?"
 
 "Prithee pour the water, and make not so many words!"
 
 Hendon, suppressing a horse-laugh, and saying to himself, "By all the
 saints, but this is admirable!" stepped briskly forward and did the small
 insolent's bidding; then stood by, in a sort of stupefaction, until the
 command, "Come--the towel!" woke him sharply up.  He took up a towel,
 from under the boy's nose, and handed it to him without comment.  He now
 proceeded to comfort his own face with a wash, and while he was at it his
 adopted child seated himself at the table and prepared to fall to.
 Hendon despatched his ablutions with alacrity, then drew back the other
 chair and was about to place himself at table, when the boy said,
 indignantly--
 
 "Forbear!  Wouldst sit in the presence of the King?"
 
 This blow staggered Hendon to his foundations.  He muttered to himself,
 "Lo, the poor thing's madness is up with the time!  It hath changed with
 the great change that is come to the realm, and now in fancy is he KING!
 Good lack, I must humour the conceit, too--there is no other way--faith,
 he would order me to the Tower, else!"
 
 And pleased with this jest, he removed the chair from the table, took his
 stand behind the King, and proceeded to wait upon him in the courtliest
 way he was capable of.
 
 While the King ate, the rigour of his royal dignity relaxed a little, and
 with his growing contentment came a desire to talk. He said--"I think
 thou callest thyself Miles Hendon, if I heard thee aright?"
 
 "Yes, Sire," Miles replied; then observed to himself, "If I MUST humour
 the poor lad's madness, I must 'Sire' him, I must 'Majesty' him, I must
 not go by halves, I must stick at nothing that belongeth to the part I
--**--**--
 taken captive, and during the seven years that have waxed and waned since
 then, a foreign dungeon hath harboured me.  Through wit and courage I won
 to the free air at last, and fled hither straight; and am but just
 arrived, right poor in purse and raiment, and poorer still in knowledge
 of what these dull seven years have wrought at Hendon Hall, its people
 and belongings.  So please you, sir, my meagre tale is told."
 
 "Thou hast been shamefully abused!" said the little King, with a flashing
 eye.  "But I will right thee--by the cross will I!  The King hath said
 it."
 
 Then, fired by the story of Miles's wrongs, he loosed his tongue and
 poured the history of his own recent misfortunes into the ears of his
 astonished listener.  When he had finished, Miles said to himself--
 
 "Lo, what an imagination he hath!  Verily, this is no common mind; else,
 crazed or sane, it could not weave so straight and gaudy a tale as this
 out of the airy nothings wherewith it hath wrought this curious romaunt.
 Poor ruined little head, it shall not lack friend or shelter whilst I
 bide with the living.  He shall never leave my side; he shall be my pet,
 my little comrade.  And he shall be cured!--ay, made whole and sound
 --then will he make himself a name--and proud shall I be to say, 'Yes, he
 is mine--I took him, a homeless little ragamuffin, but I saw what was in
 him, and I said his name would be heard some day--behold him, observe
 him--was I right?'"
 
 The King spoke--in a thoughtful, measured voice--
 
 "Thou didst save me injury and shame, perchance my life, and so my crown.
 Such service demandeth rich reward.  Name thy desire, and so it be within
 the compass of my royal power, it is thine."
--**--**--
 default.  Now in the Tower lay the Lord de Courcy, the mightiest arm in
 England, stripped of his honours and possessions, and wasting with long
 captivity.  Appeal was made to him; he gave assent, and came forth
 arrayed for battle; but no sooner did the Frenchman glimpse his huge
 frame and hear his famous name but he fled away, and the French king's
 cause was lost.  King John restored De Courcy's titles and possessions,
 and said, 'Name thy wish and thou shalt have it, though it cost me half
 my kingdom;' whereat De Courcy, kneeling, as I do now, made answer,
 'This, then, I ask, my liege; that I and my successors may have and hold
 the privilege of remaining covered in the presence of the kings of
 England, henceforth while the throne shall last.' The boon was granted,
 as your Majesty knoweth; and there hath been no time, these four hundred
 years, that that line has failed of an heir; and so, even unto this day,
 the head of that ancient house still weareth his hat or helm before the
 King's Majesty, without let or hindrance, and this none other may do. {3}
 Invoking this precedent in aid of my prayer, I beseech the King to grant
 to me but this one grace and privilege--to my more than sufficient
 reward--and none other, to wit:  that I and my heirs, for ever, may SIT
 in the presence of the Majesty of England!"
 
 "Rise, Sir Miles Hendon, Knight," said the King, gravely--giving the
 accolade with Hendon's sword--"rise, and seat thyself.  Thy petition is
 granted.  Whilst England remains, and the crown continues, the privilege
 shall not lapse."
 
 His Majesty walked apart, musing, and Hendon dropped into a chair at
 table, observing to himself, "'Twas a brave thought, and hath wrought me
--**--**--
 thread through the eye, which is the opposite of a woman's way.  Time and
 time again the thread missed the mark, going sometimes on one side of the
 needle, sometimes on the other, sometimes doubling up against the shaft;
 but he was patient, having been through these experiences before, when he
 was soldiering.  He succeeded at last, and took up the garment that had
 lain waiting, meantime, across his lap, and began his work.
 
 "The inn is paid--the breakfast that is to come, included--and there is
 wherewithal left to buy a couple of donkeys and meet our little costs for
 the two or three days betwixt this and the plenty that awaits us at
 Hendon Hall--
 
 "'She loved her hus--'
 
 "Body o' me!  I have driven the needle under my nail! . . . It matters
 little--'tis not a novelty--yet 'tis not a convenience, neither. . . .
 We shall be merry there, little one, never doubt it! Thy troubles will
 vanish there, and likewise thy sad distemper--
 
 "'She loved her husband dearilee, But another man--'
 
 "These be noble large stitches!"--holding the garment up and viewing it
 admiringly--"they have a grandeur and a majesty that do cause these small
 stingy ones of the tailor-man to look mightily paltry and plebeian--
 
 "'She loved her husband dearilee, But another man he loved she,--'
 
 "Marry, 'tis done--a goodly piece of work, too, and wrought with
 expedition.  Now will I wake him, apparel him, pour for him, feed him,
 and then will we hie us to the mart by the Tabard Inn in Southwark and
 --be pleased to rise, my liege!--he answereth not--what ho, my liege!--of a
 truth must I profane his sacred person with a touch, sith his slumber is
 deaf to speech.  What!"
 
 He threw back the covers--the boy was gone!
--**--**--
 "When he came, none came with him; but now I remember me that as the two
 stepped into the throng of the Bridge, a ruffian-looking man plunged out
 from some near place; and just as he was joining them--"
 
 "What THEN?--out with it!" thundered the impatient Hendon, interrupting.
 
 "Just then the crowd lapped them up and closed them in, and I saw no
 more, being called by my master, who was in a rage because a joint that
 the scrivener had ordered was forgot, though I take all the saints to
 witness that to blame ME for that miscarriage were like holding the
 unborn babe to judgment for sins com--"
 
 "Out of my sight, idiot!  Thy prating drives me mad!  Hold! Whither art
 flying?  Canst not bide still an instant?  Went they toward Southwark?"
 
 "Even so, your worship--for, as I said before, as to that detestable
 joint, the babe unborn is no whit more blameless than--"
 
 "Art here YET!  And prating still!  Vanish, lest I throttle thee!" The
 servitor vanished.  Hendon followed after him, passed him, and plunged
 down the stairs two steps at a stride, muttering, "'Tis that scurvy
 villain that claimed he was his son.  I have lost thee, my poor little
 mad master--it is a bitter thought--and I had come to love thee so!  No!
 by book and bell, NOT lost!  Not lost, for I will ransack the land till I
 find thee again.  Poor child, yonder is his breakfast--and mine, but I
 have no hunger now; so, let the rats have it--speed, speed! that is the
 word!"  As he wormed his swift way through the noisy multitudes upon the
 Bridge he several times said to himself--clinging to the thought as if it
 were a particularly pleasing one--"He grumbled, but he WENT--he went,
 yes, because he thought Miles Hendon asked it, sweet lad--he would ne'er
--**--**--
 the Constable of the Tower, who passed it to the Chief Steward of the
 Household, who passed it to the Hereditary Grand Diaperer, who passed it
 to the Lord High Admiral of England, who passed it to the Archbishop of
 Canterbury, who passed it to the First Lord of the Bedchamber, who took
 what was left of it and put it on Tom.  Poor little wondering chap, it
 reminded him of passing buckets at a fire.
 
 Each garment in its turn had to go through this slow and solemn process;
 consequently Tom grew very weary of the ceremony; so weary that he felt
 an almost gushing gratefulness when he at last saw his long silken hose
 begin the journey down the line and knew that the end of the matter was
 drawing near.  But he exulted too soon.  The First Lord of the Bedchamber
 received the hose and was about to encase Tom's legs in them, when a
 sudden flush invaded his face and he hurriedly hustled the things back
 into the hands of the Archbishop of Canterbury with an astounded look and
 a whispered, "See, my lord!" pointing to a something connected with the
 hose.  The Archbishop paled, then flushed, and passed the hose to the
 Lord High Admiral, whispering, "See, my lord!"  The Admiral passed the
 hose to the Hereditary Grand Diaperer, and had hardly breath enough in
 his body to ejaculate, "See, my lord!"  The hose drifted backward along
 the line, to the Chief Steward of the Household, the Constable of the
 Tower, Norroy King-at-Arms, the Master of the Wardrobe, the Chancellor
 Royal of the Duchy of Lancaster, the Third Groom of the Stole, the Head
 Ranger of Windsor Forest, the Second Gentleman of the Bedchamber, the
 First Lord of the Buckhounds,--accompanied always with that amazed and
--**--**--
 
 Tom was not listening--an earlier clause of the document was puzzling
 him.  At this point he turned and whispered to Lord Hertford--
 
 "What day did he say the burial hath been appointed for?"
 
 "The sixteenth of the coming month, my liege."
 
 "'Tis a strange folly.  Will he keep?"
 
 Poor chap, he was still new to the customs of royalty; he was used to
 seeing the forlorn dead of Offal Court hustled out of the way with a very
 different sort of expedition.  However, the Lord Hertford set his mind at
 rest with a word or two.
 
 A secretary of state presented an order of the Council appointing the
 morrow at eleven for the reception of the foreign ambassadors, and
 desired the King's assent.
 
 Tom turned an inquiring look toward Hertford, who whispered--
 
 "Your Majesty will signify consent.  They come to testify their royal
 masters' sense of the heavy calamity which hath visited your Grace and
 the realm of England."
 
 Tom did as he was bidden.  Another secretary began to read a preamble
 concerning the expenses of the late King's household, which had amounted
 to 28,000 pounds during the preceding six months--a sum so vast that it
 made Tom Canty gasp; he gasped again when the fact appeared that 20,000
 pounds of this money was still owing and unpaid; {4} and once more when
 it appeared that the King's coffers were about empty, and his twelve
 hundred servants much embarrassed for lack of the wages due them.  Tom
 spoke out, with lively apprehension--
 
 "We be going to the dogs, 'tis plain.  'Tis meet and necessary that we
 take a smaller house and set the servants at large, sith they be of no
 value but to make delay, and trouble one with offices that harass the
 spirit and shame the soul, they misbecoming any but a doll, that hath nor
--**--**--
 must not seem to observe that aught is wrong with him."
 
 "'Tis strange how my memory doth wanton with me these days," said Tom.
 "But mind it not--I mend apace--a little clue doth often serve to bring
 me back again the things and names which had escaped me.  (And not they,
 only, forsooth, but e'en such as I ne'er heard before--as this lad shall
 see.)  Give thy business speech."
 
 "'Tis matter of small weight, my liege, yet will I touch upon it, an' it
 please your Grace.  Two days gone by, when your Majesty faulted thrice in
 your Greek--in the morning lessons,--dost remember it?"
 
 "Y-e-s--methinks I do.  (It is not much of a lie--an' I had meddled with
 the Greek at all, I had not faulted simply thrice, but forty times.)
 Yes, I do recall it, now--go on."
 
 "The master, being wroth with what he termed such slovenly and doltish
 work, did promise that he would soundly whip me for it--and--"
 
 "Whip THEE!" said Tom, astonished out of his presence of mind. "Why
 should he whip THEE for faults of mine?"
 
 "Ah, your Grace forgetteth again.  He always scourgeth me when thou dost
 fail in thy lessons."
 
 "True, true--I had forgot.  Thou teachest me in private--then if I fail,
 he argueth that thy office was lamely done, and--"
 
 "Oh, my liege, what words are these?  I, the humblest of thy servants,
 presume to teach THEE?"
 
 "Then where is thy blame?  What riddle is this?  Am I in truth gone mad,
 or is it thou?  Explain--speak out."
 
 "But, good your Majesty, there's nought that needeth simplifying.--None
 may visit the sacred person of the Prince of Wales with blows; wherefore,
 when he faulteth, 'tis I that take them; and meet it is and right, for
 that it is mine office and my livelihood." {1}
--**--**--
 "Thanks, O most noble master, this princely lavishness doth far surpass
 my most distempered dreams of fortune.  Now shall I be happy all my days,
 and all the house of Marlow after me."
 
 Tom had wit enough to perceive that here was a lad who could be useful to
 him.  He encouraged Humphrey to talk, and he was nothing loath.  He was
 delighted to believe that he was helping in Tom's 'cure'; for always, as
 soon as he had finished calling back to Tom's diseased mind the various
 particulars of his experiences and adventures in the royal school-room
 and elsewhere about the palace, he noticed that Tom was then able to
 'recall' the circumstances quite clearly.  At the end of an hour Tom
 found himself well freighted with very valuable information concerning
 personages and matters pertaining to the Court; so he resolved to draw
 instruction from this source daily; and to this end he would give order
 to admit Humphrey to the royal closet whenever he might come, provided
 the Majesty of England was not engaged with other people.  Humphrey had
 hardly been dismissed when my Lord Hertford arrived with more trouble for
 Tom.
 
 He said that the Lords of the Council, fearing that some overwrought
 report of the King's damaged health might have leaked out and got abroad,
 they deemed it wise and best that his Majesty should begin to dine in
 public after a day or two--his wholesome complexion and vigorous step,
 assisted by a carefully guarded repose of manner and ease and grace of
 demeanour, would more surely quiet the general pulse--in case any evil
 rumours HAD gone about--than any other scheme that could be devised.
 
 Then the Earl proceeded, very delicately, to instruct Tom as to the
 observances proper to the stately occasion, under the rather thin
--**--**--
 were all insignificant compared with the ordeal of dining all by himself
 with a multitude of curious eyes fastened upon him and a multitude of
 mouths whispering comments upon his performance,--and upon his mistakes,
 if he should be so unlucky as to make any.
 
 Still, nothing could stop that fourth day, and so it came.  It found poor
 Tom low-spirited and absent-minded, and this mood continued; he could not
 shake it off.  The ordinary duties of the morning dragged upon his hands,
 and wearied him.  Once more he felt the sense of captivity heavy upon
 him.
 
 Late in the forenoon he was in a large audience-chamber, conversing with
 the Earl of Hertford and dully awaiting the striking of the hour
 appointed for a visit of ceremony from a considerable number of great
 officials and courtiers.
 
 After a little while, Tom, who had wandered to a window and become
 interested in the life and movement of the great highway beyond the
 palace gates--and not idly interested, but longing with all his heart to
 take part in person in its stir and freedom--saw the van of a hooting and
 shouting mob of disorderly men, women, and children of the lowest and
 poorest degree approaching from up the road.
 
 "I would I knew what 'tis about!" he exclaimed, with all a boy's
 curiosity in such happenings.
 
 "Thou art the King!" solemnly responded the Earl, with a reverence.
 "Have I your Grace's leave to act?"
 
 "O blithely, yes!  O gladly, yes!" exclaimed Tom excitedly, adding to
 himself with a lively sense of satisfaction, "In truth, being a king is
 not all dreariness--it hath its compensations and conveniences."
 
 The Earl called a page, and sent him to the captain of the guard with the
 order--
 
 "Let the mob be halted, and inquiry made concerning the occasion of its
--**--**--
 
 The under-sheriff was about to remove his prisoner; Tom gave him a sign
 to wait; then he said--
 
 "Good sir, I would look into this matter further.  The man has said his
 deed was but lamely proved.  Tell me what thou knowest."
 
 "If the King's grace please, it did appear upon the trial that this man
 entered into a house in the hamlet of Islington where one lay sick--three
 witnesses say it was at ten of the clock in the morning, and two say it
 was some minutes later--the sick man being alone at the time, and
 sleeping--and presently the man came forth again and went his way.  The
 sick man died within the hour, being torn with spasms and retchings."
 
 "Did any see the poison given?  Was poison found?"
 
 "Marry, no, my liege."
 
 "Then how doth one know there was poison given at all?"
 
 "Please your Majesty, the doctors testified that none die with such
 symptoms but by poison."
 
 Weighty evidence, this, in that simple age.  Tom recognised its
 formidable nature, and said--
 
 "The doctor knoweth his trade--belike they were right.  The matter hath
 an ill-look for this poor man."
 
 "Yet was not this all, your Majesty; there is more and worse. Many
 testified that a witch, since gone from the village, none know whither,
 did foretell, and speak it privately in their ears, that the sick man
 WOULD DIE BY POISON--and more, that a stranger would give it--a stranger
 with brown hair and clothed in a worn and common garb; and surely this
 prisoner doth answer woundily to the bill.  Please your Majesty to give
 the circumstance that solemn weight which is its due, seeing it was
 FORETOLD."
 
 This was an argument of tremendous force in that superstitious day.  Tom
 felt that the thing was settled; if evidence was worth anything, this
--**--**--
 "Certes this is a serious matter."  Tom turned this dark piece of
 scoundrelism over in his mind a while, then asked--
 
 "Suffered the woman also by the storm?"
 
 Several old heads among the assemblage nodded their recognition of the
 wisdom of this question.  The sheriff, however, saw nothing consequential
 in the inquiry; he answered, with simple directness--
 
 "Indeed did she, your Majesty, and most righteously, as all aver. Her
 habitation was swept away, and herself and child left shelterless."
 
 "Methinks the power to do herself so ill a turn was dearly bought. She
 had been cheated, had she paid but a farthing for it; that she paid her
 soul, and her child's, argueth that she is mad; if she is mad she knoweth
 not what she doth, therefore sinneth not."
 
 The elderly heads nodded recognition of Tom's wisdom once more, and one
 individual murmured, "An' the King be mad himself, according to report,
 then is it a madness of a sort that would improve the sanity of some I
 wot of, if by the gentle providence of God they could but catch it."
 
 "What age hath the child?" asked Tom.
 
 "Nine years, please your Majesty."
 
 "By the law of England may a child enter into covenant and sell itself,
 my lord?" asked Tom, turning to a learned judge.
 
 "The law doth not permit a child to make or meddle in any weighty matter,
 good my liege, holding that its callow wit unfitteth it to cope with the
 riper wit and evil schemings of them that are its elders.  The DEVIL may
 buy a child, if he so choose, and the child agree thereto, but not an
 Englishman--in this latter case the contract would be null and void."
 
 "It seemeth a rude unchristian thing, and ill contrived, that English law
--**--**--
 charmed and occupied with the blithe sights and sounds about him--and
 besides, nobody can be very ungraceful in nicely-fitting beautiful
 clothes after he has grown a little used to them--especially if he is for
 the moment unconscious of them. Tom remembered his instructions, and
 acknowledged his greeting with a slight inclination of his plumed head,
 and a courteous "I thank ye, my good people."
 
 He seated himself at table, without removing his cap; and did it without
 the least embarrassment; for to eat with one's cap on was the one
 solitary royal custom upon which the kings and the Cantys met upon common
 ground, neither party having any advantage over the other in the matter
 of old familiarity with it.  The pageant broke up and grouped itself
 picturesquely, and remained bareheaded.
 
 Now to the sound of gay music the Yeomen of the Guard entered,--"the
 tallest and mightiest men in England, they being carefully selected in
 this regard,"--but we will let the chronicler tell about it:--
 
 "The Yeomen of the Guard entered, bareheaded, clothed in scarlet, with
 golden roses upon their backs; and these went and came, bringing in each
 turn a course of dishes, served in plate.  These dishes were received by
 a gentleman in the same order they were brought, and placed upon the
 table, while the taster gave to each guard a mouthful to eat of the
 particular dish he had brought, for fear of any poison."
 
 Tom made a good dinner, notwithstanding he was conscious that hundreds of
 eyes followed each morsel to his mouth and watched him eat it with an
 interest which could not have been more intense if it had been a deadly
 explosive and was expected to blow him up and scatter him all about the
 place.  He was careful not to hurry, and equally careful not to do
--**--**--
 John Canty replied, in a stern and measured voice--
 
 "It is plain thou art mad, and I am loath to punish thee;  but if thou
 provoke me, I must.  Thy prating doth no harm here, where there are no
 ears that need to mind thy follies; yet it is well to practise thy tongue
 to wary speech, that it may do no hurt when our quarters change.  I have
 done a murder, and may not tarry at home--neither shalt thou, seeing I
 need thy service.  My name is changed, for wise reasons; it is Hobbs
 --John Hobbs; thine is Jack--charge thy memory accordingly.  Now, then,
 speak.  Where is thy mother?  Where are thy sisters?  They came not to
 the place appointed--knowest thou whither they went?"
 
 The King answered sullenly--
 
 "Trouble me not with these riddles.  My mother is dead; my sisters are in
 the palace."
 
 The youth near by burst into a derisive laugh, and the King would have
 assaulted him, but Canty--or Hobbs, as he now called himself--prevented
 him, and said--
 
 "Peace, Hugo, vex him not; his mind is astray, and thy ways fret him.
 Sit thee down, Jack, and quiet thyself; thou shalt have a morsel to eat,
 anon."
 
 Hobbs and Hugo fell to talking together, in low voices, and the King
 removed himself as far as he could from their disagreeable company.  He
 withdrew into the twilight of the farther end of the barn, where he found
 the earthen floor bedded a foot deep with straw.  He lay down here, drew
 straw over himself in lieu of blankets, and was soon absorbed in
 thinking.  He had many griefs, but the minor ones were swept almost into
 forgetfulness by the supreme one, the loss of his father.  To the rest of
 the world the name of Henry VIII. brought a shiver, and suggested an ogre
--**--**--
 man, considerable satisfaction was expressed; when he added that the man
 was a priest, he was roundly applauded, and had to take a drink with
 everybody.  Old acquaintances welcomed him joyously, and new ones were
 proud to shake him by the hand.  He was asked why he had 'tarried away so
 many months.'  He answered--
 
 "London is better than the country, and safer, these late years, the laws
 be so bitter and so diligently enforced.  An' I had not had that
 accident, I had stayed there.  I had resolved to stay, and never more
 venture country-wards--but the accident has ended that."
 
 He inquired how many persons the gang numbered now.  The 'ruffler,' or
 chief, answered--
 
 "Five and twenty sturdy budges, bulks, files, clapperdogeons and
 maunders, counting the dells and doxies and other morts. {7}  Most are
 here, the rest are wandering eastward, along the winter lay. We follow at
 dawn."
 
 "I do not see the Wen among the honest folk about me.  Where may he be?"
 
 "Poor lad, his diet is brimstone, now, and over hot for a delicate taste.
 He was killed in a brawl, somewhere about midsummer."
 
 "I sorrow to hear that; the Wen was a capable man, and brave."
 
 "That was he, truly.  Black Bess, his dell, is of us yet, but absent on
 the eastward tramp; a fine lass, of nice ways and orderly conduct, none
 ever seeing her drunk above four days in the seven."
 
 "She was ever strict--I remember it well--a goodly wench and worthy all
 commendation.  Her mother was more free and less particular; a
 troublesome and ugly-tempered beldame, but furnished with a wit above the
 common."
 
 "We lost her through it.  Her gift of palmistry and other sorts of
 fortune-telling begot for her at last a witch's name and fame. The law
--**--**--
 "Drop it, boy, 'tis not wise, nor well.  Humour thy fancy, if thou must,
 but choose some other title."
 
 A tinker shrieked out a suggestion--
 
 "Foo-foo the First, King of the Mooncalves!"
 
 The title 'took,' at once, every throat responded, and a roaring shout
 went up, of--
 
 "Long live Foo-foo the First, King of the Mooncalves!" followed by
 hootings, cat-calls, and peals of laughter.
 
 "Hale him forth, and crown him!"
 
 "Robe him!"
 
 "Sceptre him!"
 
 "Throne him!"
 
 These and twenty other cries broke out at once! and almost before the
 poor little victim could draw a breath he was crowned with a tin basin,
 robed in a tattered blanket, throned upon a barrel, and sceptred with the
 tinker's soldering-iron.  Then all flung themselves upon their knees
 about him and sent up a chorus of ironical wailings, and mocking
 supplications, whilst they swabbed their eyes with their soiled and
 ragged sleeves and aprons--
 
 "Be gracious to us, O sweet King!"
 
 "Trample not upon thy beseeching worms, O noble Majesty!"
 
 "Pity thy slaves, and comfort them with a royal kick!"
 
 "Cheer us and warm us with thy gracious rays, O flaming sun of
 sovereignty!"
 
 "Sanctify the ground with the touch of thy foot, that we may eat the dirt
 and be ennobled!"
 
 "Deign to spit upon us, O Sire, that our children's children may tell of
 thy princely condescension, and be proud and happy for ever!"
 
 But the humorous tinker made the 'hit' of the evening and carried off the
 honours.  Kneeling, he pretended to kiss the King's foot, and was
 indignantly spurned; whereupon he went about begging for a rag to paste
 over the place upon his face which had been touched by the foot, saying
 it must be preserved from contact with the vulgar air, and that he should
 make his fortune by going on the highway and exposing it to view at the
--**--**--
 "Thou'lt not beg!" exclaimed Hugo, eyeing the King with surprise.
 "Prithee, since when hast thou reformed?"
 
 "What dost thou mean?"
 
 "Mean?  Hast thou not begged the streets of London all thy life?"
 
 "I?  Thou idiot!"
 
 "Spare thy compliments--thy stock will last the longer.  Thy father says
 thou hast begged all thy days.  Mayhap he lied. Peradventure you will
 even make so bold as to SAY he lied," scoffed Hugo.
 
 "Him YOU call my father?  Yes, he lied."
 
 "Come, play not thy merry game of madman so far, mate; use it for thy
 amusement, not thy hurt.  An' I tell him this, he will scorch thee finely
 for it."
 
 "Save thyself the trouble.  I will tell him."
 
 "I like thy spirit, I do in truth; but I do not admire thy judgment.
 Bone-rackings and bastings be plenty enow in this life, without going out
 of one's way to invite them.  But a truce to these matters; _I_ believe
 your father.  I doubt not he can lie; I doubt not he DOTH lie, upon
 occasion, for the best of us do that; but there is no occasion here.  A
 wise man does not waste so good a commodity as lying for nought.  But
 come; sith it is thy humour to give over begging, wherewithal shall we
 busy ourselves?  With robbing kitchens?"
 
 The King said, impatiently--
 
 "Have done with this folly--you weary me!"
 
 Hugo replied, with temper--
 
 "Now harkee, mate; you will not beg, you will not rob; so be it. But I
 will tell you what you WILL do.  You will play decoy whilst _I_ beg.
 Refuse, an' you think you may venture!"
 
 The King was about to reply contemptuously, when Hugo said, interrupting--
 
 "Peace!  Here comes one with a kindly face.  Now will I fall down in a
 fit.  When the stranger runs to me, set you up a wail, and fall upon your
--**--**--
 threshold he heard voices behind him.  He darted behind a cask, within
 the barn, and stooped down.  Two farm-labourers came in, bringing the
 lantern with them, and fell to work, talking meanwhile.  Whilst they
 moved about with the light, the King made good use of his eyes and took
 the bearings of what seemed to be a good-sized stall at the further end
 of the place, purposing to grope his way to it when he should be left to
 himself.  He also noted the position of a pile of horse blankets, midway
 of the route, with the intent to levy upon them for the service of the
 crown of England for one night.
 
 By-and-by the men finished and went away, fastening the door behind them
 and taking the lantern with them.  The shivering King made for the
 blankets, with as good speed as the darkness would allow; gathered them
 up, and then groped his way safely to the stall.  Of two of the blankets
 he made a bed, then covered himself with the remaining two.  He was a
 glad monarch, now, though the blankets were old and thin, and not quite
 warm enough; and besides gave out a pungent horsey odour that was almost
 suffocatingly powerful.
 
 Although the King was hungry and chilly, he was also so tired and
 so drowsy that these latter influences soon began to get the
 advantage of the former, and he presently dozed off into a state of
 semi-consciousness.  Then, just as he was on the point of losing himself
 wholly, he distinctly felt something touch him!  He was broad awake in a
 moment, and gasping for breath.  The cold horror of that mysterious touch
 in the dark almost made his heart stand still.  He lay motionless, and
 listened, scarcely breathing. But nothing stirred, and there was no
--**--**--
 Prissy, an' it were not true, it WOULD be a lie.  It surely would be.
 Now think on't.  For all things that be not true, be lies--thou canst
 make nought else out of it."
 
 It was a good tight argument, without a leak in it anywhere; and it left
 Prissy's half-doubts not a leg to stand on.  She considered a moment,
 then put the King upon his honour with the simple remark--
 
 "If thou art truly the King, then I believe thee."
 
 "I am truly the King."
 
 This settled the matter.  His Majesty's royalty was accepted without
 further question or discussion, and the two little girls began at once to
 inquire into how he came to be where he was, and how he came to be so
 unroyally clad, and whither he was bound, and all about his affairs.  It
 was a mighty relief to him to pour out his troubles where they would not
 be scoffed at or doubted; so he told his tale with feeling, forgetting
 even his hunger for the time; and it was received with the deepest and
 tenderest sympathy by the gentle little maids.  But when he got down to
 his latest experiences and they learned how long he had been without
 food, they cut him short and hurried him away to the farmhouse to find a
 breakfast for him.
 
 The King was cheerful and happy now, and said to himself, "When I am come
 to mine own again, I will always honour little children, remembering how
 that these trusted me and believed in me in my time of trouble; whilst
 they that were older, and thought themselves wiser, mocked at me and held
 me for a liar."
 
 The children's mother received the King kindly, and was full of pity; for
 his forlorn condition and apparently crazed intellect touched her womanly
--**--**--
 the cakes; doubtless he would have washed the dishes too--therefore will
 I essay it."
 
 He made a sufficiently poor job of it; and to his surprise too, for the
 cleaning of wooden spoons and trenchers had seemed an easy thing to do.
 It was a tedious and troublesome piece of work, but he finished it at
 last.  He was becoming impatient to get away on his journey now; however,
 he was not to lose this thrifty dame's society so easily.  She furnished
 him some little odds and ends of employment, which he got through with
 after a fair fashion and with some credit.  Then she set him and the
 little girls to paring some winter apples; but he was so awkward at this
 service that she retired him from it and gave him a butcher knife to
 grind. Afterwards she kept him carding wool until he began to think he
 had laid the good King Alfred about far enough in the shade for the
 present in the matter of showy menial heroisms that would read
 picturesquely in story-books and histories, and so he was half-minded to
 resign.  And when, just after the noonday dinner, the goodwife gave him a
 basket of kittens to drown, he did resign.  At least he was just going to
 resign--for he felt that he must draw the line somewhere, and it seemed
 to him that to draw it at kitten-drowning was about the right thing--when
 there was an interruption.  The interruption was John Canty--with a
 peddler's pack on his back--and Hugo.
 
 The King discovered these rascals approaching the front gate before they
 had had a chance to see him; so he said nothing about drawing the line,
 but took up his basket of kittens and stepped quietly out the back way,
 without a word.  He left the creatures in an out-house, and hurried on,
--**--**--
 see well enough to choose his steps judiciously; consequently he kept
 tripping over roots and tangling himself in vines and briers.
 
 And how glad he was when at last he caught the glimmer of a light! He
 approached it warily, stopping often to look about him and listen.  It
 came from an unglazed window-opening in a shabby little hut.  He heard a
 voice, now, and felt a disposition to run and hide; but he changed his
 mind at once, for this voice was praying, evidently.  He glided to the
 one window of the hut, raised himself on tiptoe, and stole a glance
 within.  The room was small; its floor was the natural earth, beaten hard
 by use; in a corner was a bed of rushes and a ragged blanket or two; near
 it was a pail, a cup, a basin, and two or three pots and pans; there was
 a short bench and a three-legged stool; on the hearth the remains of a
 faggot fire were smouldering; before a shrine, which was lighted by a
 single candle, knelt an aged man, and on an old wooden box at his side
 lay an open book and a human skull.  The man was of large, bony frame;
 his hair and whiskers were very long and snowy white; he was clothed in a
 robe of sheepskins which reached from his neck to his heels.
 
 "A holy hermit!" said the King to himself; "now am I indeed fortunate."
 
 The hermit rose from his knees; the King knocked.  A deep voice
 responded--
 
 "Enter!--but leave sin behind, for the ground whereon thou shalt stand is
 holy!"
 
 The King entered, and paused.  The hermit turned a pair of gleaming,
 unrestful eyes upon him, and said--
 
 "Who art thou?"
 
 "I am the King," came the answer, with placid simplicity.
--**--**--
 Presently he paused; then tapped his forehead several times with his
 fingers, as if trying to recall some thought which had escaped from his
 mind.  Apparently he was unsuccessful.  Now he started quickly up, and
 entered his guest's room, and said--
 
 "Thou art King?"
 
 "Yes," was the response, drowsily uttered.
 
 "What King?"
 
 "Of England."
 
 "Of England?  Then Henry is gone!"
 
 "Alack, it is so.  I am his son."
 
 A black frown settled down upon the hermit's face, and he clenched his
 bony hands with a vindictive energy.  He stood a few moments, breathing
 fast and swallowing repeatedly, then said in a husky voice--
 
 "Dost know it was he that turned us out into the world houseless and
 homeless?"
 
 There was no response.  The old man bent down and scanned the boy's
 reposeful face and listened to his placid breathing.  "He sleeps--sleeps
 soundly;" and the frown vanished away and gave place to an expression of
 evil satisfaction.  A smile flitted across the dreaming boy's features.
 The hermit muttered, "So--his heart is happy;" and he turned away.  He
 went stealthily about the place, seeking here and there for something;
 now and then halting to listen, now and then jerking his head around and
 casting a quick glance toward the bed; and always muttering, always
 mumbling to himself.  At last he found what he seemed to want--a rusty
 old butcher knife and a whetstone.  Then he crept to his place by the
 fire, sat himself down, and began to whet the knife softly on the stone,
 still muttering, mumbling, ejaculating.  The winds sighed around the
 lonely place, the mysterious voices of the night floated by out of the
 distances.  The shining eyes of venturesome mice and rats peered out at
 the old man from cracks and coverts, but he went on with his work, rapt,
--**--**--
 ready to be applied; but at last, when the archangel was almost ready to
 despair, the boy crossed his hands himself, and the next moment they were
 bound. Now a bandage was passed under the sleeper's chin and brought up
 over his head and tied fast--and so softly, so gradually, and so deftly
 were the knots drawn together and compacted, that the boy slept
 peacefully through it all without stirring.
 
 
 
 Chapter XXI. Hendon to the rescue.
 
 The old man glided away, stooping, stealthy, cat-like, and brought the
 low bench.  He seated himself upon it, half his body in the dim and
 flickering light, and the other half in shadow; and so, with his craving
 eyes bent upon the slumbering boy, he kept his patient vigil there,
 heedless of the drift of time, and softly whetted his knife, and mumbled
 and chuckled; and in aspect and attitude he resembled nothing so much as
 a grizzly, monstrous spider, gloating over some hapless insect that lay
 bound and helpless in his web.
 
 After a long while, the old man, who was still gazing,--yet not seeing,
 his mind having settled into a dreamy abstraction,--observed, on a
 sudden, that the boy's eyes were open! wide open and staring!--staring up
 in frozen horror at the knife.  The smile of a gratified devil crept over
 the old man's face, and he said, without changing his attitude or his
 occupation--
 
 "Son of Henry the Eighth, hast thou prayed?"
 
 The boy struggled helplessly in his bonds, and at the same time forced a
 smothered sound through his closed jaws, which the hermit chose to
 interpret as an affirmative answer to his question.
 
 "Then pray again.  Pray the prayer for the dying!"
 
 A shudder shook the boy's frame, and his face blenched.  Then he
 struggled again to free himself--turning and twisting himself this way
--**--**--
 sum of a month's usury on a brass farthing let to a tinker out of work."
 
 "No--ride thy mule, and lead thine ass; I am surer on mine own feet, and
 will walk."
 
 "Then prithee mind the little beast for me while I take my life in my
 hands and make what success I may toward mounting the big one."
 
 Then followed a confusion of kicks, cuffs, tramplings and plungings,
 accompanied by a thunderous intermingling of volleyed curses, and finally
 a bitter apostrophe to the mule, which must have broken its spirit, for
 hostilities seemed to cease from that moment.
 
 With unutterable misery the fettered little King heard the voices and
 footsteps fade away and die out.  All hope forsook him, now, for the
 moment, and a dull despair settled down upon his heart. "My only friend
 is deceived and got rid of," he said; "the hermit will return and--"  He
 finished with a gasp; and at once fell to struggling so frantically with
 his bonds again, that he shook off the smothering sheepskin.
 
 And now he heard the door open!  The sound chilled him to the marrow
 --already he seemed to feel the knife at his throat.  Horror made him close
 his eyes; horror made him open them again--and before him stood John
 Canty and Hugo!
 
 He would have said "Thank God!" if his jaws had been free.
 
 A moment or two later his limbs were at liberty, and his captors, each
 gripping him by an arm, were hurrying him with all speed through the
 forest.
 
 
 
 Chapter XXII. A victim of treachery.
 
 Once more 'King Foo-foo the First' was roving with the tramps and
 outlaws, a butt for their coarse jests and dull-witted railleries, and
 sometimes the victim of small spitefulness at the hands of Canty and Hugo
--**--**--
 with his prey; and the two drifted slowly up and down one street after
 another, the one watching sharply for a sure chance to achieve his evil
 purpose, and the other watching as sharply for a chance to dart away and
 get free of his infamous captivity for ever.
 
 Both threw away some tolerably fair-looking opportunities; for both, in
 their secret hearts, were resolved to make absolutely sure work this
 time, and neither meant to allow his fevered desires to seduce him into
 any venture that had much uncertainty about it.
 
 Hugo's chance came first.  For at last a woman approached who carried a
 fat package of some sort in a basket.  Hugo's eyes sparkled with sinful
 pleasure as he said to himself, "Breath o' my life, an' I can but put
 THAT upon him, 'tis good-den and God keep thee, King of the Game-Cocks!"
 He waited and watched--outwardly patient, but inwardly consuming with
 excitement--till the woman had passed by, and the time was ripe; then
 said, in a low voice--
 
 "Tarry here till I come again," and darted stealthily after the prey.
 
 The King's heart was filled with joy--he could make his escape, now, if
 Hugo's quest only carried him far enough away.
 
 But he was to have no such luck.  Hugo crept behind the woman, snatched
 the package, and came running back, wrapping it in an old piece of
 blanket which he carried on his arm.  The hue and cry was raised in a
 moment, by the woman, who knew her loss by the lightening of her burden,
 although she had not seen the pilfering done.  Hugo thrust the bundle
 into the King's hands without halting, saying--
 
 "Now speed ye after me with the rest, and cry 'Stop thief!' but mind ye
 lead them astray!"
 
 The next moment Hugo turned a corner and darted down a crooked alley--and
--**--**--
 
 "Reflect, Sire--your laws are the wholesome breath of your own royalty;
 shall their source resist them, yet require the branches to respect them?
 Apparently one of these laws has been broken; when the King is on his
 throne again, can it ever grieve him to remember that when he was
 seemingly a private person he loyally sank the king in the citizen and
 submitted to its authority?"
 
 "Thou art right; say no more; thou shalt see that whatsoever the King of
 England requires a subject to suffer, under the law, he will himself
 suffer while he holdeth the station of a subject."
 
 When the woman was called upon to testify before the justice of the
 peace, she swore that the small prisoner at the bar was the person who
 had committed the theft; there was none able to show the contrary, so the
 King stood convicted.  The bundle was now unrolled, and when the contents
 proved to be a plump little dressed pig, the judge looked troubled,
 whilst Hendon turned pale, and his body was thrilled with an electric
 shiver of dismay; but the King remained unmoved, protected by his
 ignorance.  The judge meditated, during an ominous pause, then turned to
 the woman, with the question--
 
 "What dost thou hold this property to be worth?"
 
 The woman courtesied and replied--
 
 "Three shillings and eightpence, your worship--I could not abate a penny
 and set forth the value honestly."
 
 The justice glanced around uncomfortably upon the crowd, then nodded to
 the constable, and said--
 
 "Clear the court and close the doors."
 
 It was done.  None remained but the two officials, the accused, the
 accuser, and Miles Hendon.  This latter was rigid and colourless, and on
 his forehead big drops of cold sweat gathered, broke and blended
 together, and trickled down his face.  The judge turned to the woman
--**--**--
 "My duty forbids it, sir; prithee hinder me not, the night comes on."
 
 "Stay, nevertheless, for the matter concerns thee nearly.  Turn thy back
 a moment and seem not to see:  LET THIS POOR LAD ESCAPE."
 
 "This to me, sir!  I arrest thee in--"
 
 "Nay, be not too hasty.  See thou be careful and commit no foolish
 error,"--then he shut his voice down to a whisper, and said in the man's
 ear--"the pig thou hast purchased for eightpence may cost thee thy neck,
 man!"
 
 The poor constable, taken by surprise, was speechless, at first, then
 found his tongue and fell to blustering and threatening; but Hendon was
 tranquil, and waited with patience till his breath was spent; then said--
 
 "I have a liking to thee, friend, and would not willingly see thee come
 to harm.  Observe, I heard it all--every word.  I will prove it to thee."
 Then he repeated the conversation which the officer and the woman had had
 together in the hall, word for word, and ended with--
 
 "There--have I set it forth correctly?  Should not I be able to set it
 forth correctly before the judge, if occasion required?"
 
 The man was dumb with fear and distress, for a moment; then he rallied,
 and said with forced lightness--
 
 "'Tis making a mighty matter, indeed, out of a jest; I but plagued the
 woman for mine amusement."
 
 "Kept you the woman's pig for amusement?"
 
 The man answered sharply--
 
 "Nought else, good sir--I tell thee 'twas but a jest."
 
 "I do begin to believe thee," said Hendon, with a perplexing mixture of
 mockery and half-conviction in his tone; "but tarry thou here a moment
 whilst I run and ask his worship--for nathless, he being a man
 experienced in law, in jests, in--"
 
 He was moving away, still talking; the constable hesitated, fidgeted,
--**--**--
 each other's narratives.  Hendon detailed all his wide wanderings in
 search of the King, and described how the archangel had led him a fool's
 journey all over the forest, and taken him back to the hut, finally, when
 he found he could not get rid of him.  Then--he said--the old man went
 into the bedchamber and came staggering back looking broken-hearted, and
 saying he had expected to find that the boy had returned and laid down in
 there to rest, but it was not so.  Hendon had waited at the hut all day;
 hope of the King's return died out, then, and he departed upon the quest
 again.
 
 "And old Sanctum Sanctorum WAS truly sorry your highness came not back,"
 said Hendon; "I saw it in his face."
 
 "Marry I will never doubt THAT!" said the King--and then told his own
 story; after which, Hendon was sorry he had not destroyed the archangel.
 
 During the last day of the trip, Hendon's spirits were soaring. His
 tongue ran constantly.  He talked about his old father, and his brother
 Arthur, and told of many things which illustrated their high and generous
 characters; he went into loving frenzies over his Edith, and was so
 glad-hearted that he was even able to say some gentle and brotherly
 things about Hugh.  He dwelt a deal on the coming meeting at Hendon Hall;
 what a surprise it would be to everybody, and what an outburst of
 thanksgiving and delight there would be.
 
 It was a fair region, dotted with cottages and orchards, and the road led
 through broad pasture lands whose receding expanses, marked with gentle
 elevations and depressions, suggested the swelling and subsiding
 undulations of the sea.  In the afternoon the returning prodigal made
 constant deflections from his course to see if by ascending some hillock
--**--**--
 points of view; whilst the returned prodigal, all aglow with gladness,
 smiled, laughed, and kept nodding his head and saying--
 
 "Go on, brother, go on, and fear not; thou'lt find nor limb nor feature
 that cannot bide the test.  Scour and scan me to thy content, my good old
 Hugh--I am indeed thy old Miles, thy same old Miles, thy lost brother,
 is't not so?  Ah, 'tis a great day--I SAID 'twas a great day!  Give me
 thy hand, give me thy cheek--lord, I am like to die of very joy!"
 
 He was about to throw himself upon his brother; but Hugh put up his hand
 in dissent, then dropped his chin mournfully upon his breast, saying with
 emotion--
 
 "Ah, God of his mercy give me strength to bear this grievous
 disappointment!"
 
 Miles, amazed, could not speak for a moment; then he found his tongue,
 and cried out--
 
 "WHAT disappointment?  Am I not thy brother?"
 
 Hugh shook his head sadly, and said--
 
 "I pray heaven it may prove so, and that other eyes may find the
 resemblances that are hid from mine.  Alack, I fear me the letter spoke
 but too truly."
 
 "What letter?"
 
 "One that came from over sea, some six or seven years ago.  It said my
 brother died in battle."
 
 "It was a lie!  Call thy father--he will know me."
 
 "One may not call the dead."
 
 "Dead?" Miles's voice was subdued, and his lips trembled.  "My father
 dead!--oh, this is heavy news.  Half my new joy is withered now.  Prithee
 let me see my brother Arthur--he will know me; he will know me and
 console me."
 
 "He, also, is dead."
 
 "God be merciful to me, a stricken man!  Gone,--both gone--the worthy
 taken and the worthless spared, in me!  Ah! I crave your mercy!--do not
 say the Lady Edith--"
--**--**--
 
 Hugh, red-faced, and almost suffocated, reeled to the nearest chair, and
 commanded the servants to seize and bind the murderous stranger.  They
 hesitated, and one of them said--
 
 "He is armed, Sir Hugh, and we are weaponless."
 
 "Armed!  What of it, and ye so many?  Upon him, I say!"
 
 But Miles warned them to be careful what they did, and added--
 
 "Ye know me of old--I have not changed; come on, an' it like you."
 
 This reminder did not hearten the servants much; they still held back.
 
 "Then go, ye paltry cowards, and arm yourselves and guard the doors,
 whilst I send one to fetch the watch!" said Hugh.  He turned at the
 threshold, and said to Miles, "You'll find it to your advantage to offend
 not with useless endeavours at escape."
 
 "Escape?  Spare thyself discomfort, an' that is all that troubles thee.
 For Miles Hendon is master of Hendon Hall and all its belongings.  He
 will remain--doubt it not."
 
 
 
 Chapter XXVI. Disowned.
 
 The King sat musing a few moments, then looked up and said--
 
 "'Tis strange--most strange.  I cannot account for it."
 
 "No, it is not strange, my liege.  I know him, and this conduct is but
 natural.  He was a rascal from his birth."
 
 "Oh, I spake not of HIM, Sir Miles."
 
 "Not of him?  Then of what?  What is it that is strange?"
 
 "That the King is not missed."
 
 "How?  Which?  I doubt I do not understand."
 
 "Indeed?  Doth it not strike you as being passing strange that the land
 is not filled with couriers and proclamations describing my person and
 making search for me?  Is it no matter for commotion and distress that
 the Head of the State is gone; that I am vanished away and lost?"
 
 "Most true, my King, I had forgot."  Then Hendon sighed, and muttered to
--**--**--
 The answer was low, but distinct--
 
 "I swear."
 
 "Oh, this passes belief!"
 
 "Fly!  Why will you waste the precious time?  Fly, and save yourself."
 
 At that moment the officers burst into the room, and a violent struggle
 began; but Hendon was soon overpowered and dragged away. The King was
 taken also, and both were bound and led to prison.
 
 
 
 Chapter XXVII. In prison.
 
 The cells were all crowded; so the two friends were chained in a large
 room where persons charged with trifling offences were commonly kept.
 They had company, for there were some twenty manacled and fettered
 prisoners here, of both sexes and of varying ages,--an obscene and noisy
 gang.  The King chafed bitterly over the stupendous indignity thus put
 upon his royalty, but Hendon was moody and taciturn.  He was pretty
 thoroughly bewildered; he had come home, a jubilant prodigal, expecting
 to find everybody wild with joy over his return; and instead had got the
 cold shoulder and a jail.  The promise and the fulfilment differed so
 widely that the effect was stunning; he could not decide whether it was
 most tragic or most grotesque.  He felt much as a man might who had
 danced blithely out to enjoy a rainbow, and got struck by lightning.
 
 But gradually his confused and tormenting thoughts settled down into some
 sort of order, and then his mind centred itself upon Edith.  He turned
 her conduct over, and examined it in all lights, but he could not make
 anything satisfactory out of it.  Did she know him--or didn't she know
 him?  It was a perplexing puzzle, and occupied him a long time; but he
 ended, finally, with the conviction that she did know him, and had
 repudiated him for interested reasons.  He wanted to load her name with
 curses now; but this name had so long been sacred to him that he found he
--**--**--
 obliged to confine himself to brief visits, in order to avoid suspicion;
 but he managed to impart a fair degree of information each time
 --information delivered in a low voice, for Hendon's benefit, and
 interlarded with insulting epithets delivered in a louder voice for the
 benefit of other hearers.
 
 So, little by little, the story of the family came out.  Arthur had been
 dead six years.  This loss, with the absence of news from Hendon,
 impaired the father's health; he believed he was going to die, and he
 wished to see Hugh and Edith settled in life before he passed away; but
 Edith begged hard for delay, hoping for Miles's return; then the letter
 came which brought the news of Miles's death; the shock prostrated Sir
 Richard; he believed his end was very near, and he and Hugh insisted upon
 the marriage; Edith begged for and obtained a month's respite, then
 another, and finally a third; the marriage then took place by the
 death-bed of Sir Richard.  It had not proved a happy one.  It was
 whispered about the country that shortly after the nuptials the bride
 found among her husband's papers several rough and incomplete drafts of
 the fatal letter, and had accused him of precipitating the marriage--and
 Sir Richard's death, too--by a wicked forgery. Tales of cruelty to the
 Lady Edith and the servants were to be heard on all hands; and since the
 father's death Sir Hugh had thrown off all soft disguises and become a
 pitiless master toward all who in any way depended upon him and his
 domains for bread.
 
 There was a bit of Andrew's gossip which the King listened to with a
 lively interest--
 
 "There is rumour that the King is mad.  But in charity forbear to say _I_
 mentioned it, for 'tis death to speak of it, they say."
--**--**--
 pursued it--
 
 "Will they scourge thee?  No, no, they would not be so cruel!  Say they
 would not.  Come, they WILL not, will they?"
 
 The women betrayed confusion and distress, but there was no avoiding an
 answer, so one of them said, in a voice choked with emotion--
 
 "Oh, thou'lt break our hearts, thou gentle spirit!--God will help us to
 bear our--"
 
 "It is a confession!" the King broke in.  "Then they WILL scourge thee,
 the stony-hearted wretches!  But oh, thou must not weep, I cannot bear
 it.  Keep up thy courage--I shall come to my own in time to save thee
 from this bitter thing, and I will do it!"
 
 When the King awoke in the morning, the women were gone.
 
 "They are saved!" he said, joyfully; then added, despondently, "but woe
 is me!--for they were my comforters."
 
 Each of them had left a shred of ribbon pinned to his clothing, in token
 of remembrance.  He said he would keep these things always; and that soon
 he would seek out these dear good friends of his and take them under his
 protection.
 
 Just then the jailer came in with some subordinates, and commanded that
 the prisoners be conducted to the jail-yard.  The King was overjoyed--it
 would be a blessed thing to see the blue sky and breathe the fresh air
 once more.  He fretted and chafed at the slowness of the officers, but
 his turn came at last, and he was released from his staple and ordered to
 follow the other prisoners with Hendon.
 
 The court or quadrangle was stone-paved, and open to the sky.  The
 prisoners entered it through a massive archway of masonry, and were
 placed in file, standing, with their backs against the wall. A rope was
 stretched in front of them, and they were also guarded by their officers.
--**--**--
 freedom; but suddenly this tumult was drowned under a volley of
 heart-piercing shrieks of mortal agony--the King glanced from the frantic
 girls to the stake, then turned away and leaned his ashen face against
 the wall, and looked no more.  He said, "That which I have seen, in that
 one little moment, will never go out from my memory, but will abide
 there; and I shall see it all the days, and dream of it all the nights,
 till I die.  Would God I had been blind!"
 
 Hendon was watching the King.  He said to himself, with satisfaction,
 "His disorder mendeth; he hath changed, and groweth gentler.  If he had
 followed his wont, he would have stormed at these varlets, and said he
 was King, and commanded that the women be turned loose unscathed.  Soon
 his delusion will pass away and be forgotten, and his poor mind will be
 whole again.  God speed the day!"
 
 That same day several prisoners were brought in to remain over night, who
 were being conveyed, under guard, to various places in the kingdom, to
 undergo punishment for crimes committed.  The King conversed with these
 --he had made it a point, from the beginning, to instruct himself for the
 kingly office by questioning prisoners whenever the opportunity offered
 --and the tale of their woes wrung his heart.  One of them was a poor
 half-witted woman who had stolen a yard or two of cloth from a weaver
 --she was to be hanged for it.  Another was a man who had been accused of
 stealing a horse; he said the proof had failed, and he had imagined that
 he was safe from the halter; but no--he was hardly free before he was
 arraigned for killing a deer in the King's park; this was proved against
--**--**--
 crush itself against Hendon's cheek, and heard the crowd roar its
 enjoyment of the episode.  He sprang across the open circle and
 confronted the officer in charge, crying--
 
 "For shame!  This is my servant--set him free!  I am the--"
 
 "Oh, peace!" exclaimed Hendon, in a panic, "thou'lt destroy thyself.
 Mind him not, officer, he is mad."
 
 "Give thyself no trouble as to the matter of minding him, good man, I
 have small mind to mind him; but as to teaching him somewhat, to that I
 am well inclined."  He turned to a subordinate and said, "Give the little
 fool a taste or two of the lash, to mend his manners."
 
 "Half a dozen will better serve his turn," suggested Sir Hugh, who had
 ridden up, a moment before, to take a passing glance at the proceedings.
 
 The King was seized.  He did not even struggle, so paralysed was he with
 the mere thought of the monstrous outrage that was proposed to be
 inflicted upon his sacred person.  History was already defiled with the
 record of the scourging of an English king with whips--it was an
 intolerable reflection that he must furnish a duplicate of that shameful
 page.  He was in the toils, there was no help for him; he must either
 take this punishment or beg for its remission.  Hard conditions; he would
 take the stripes--a king might do that, but a king could not beg.
 
 But meantime, Miles Hendon was resolving the difficulty.  "Let the child
 go," said he; "ye heartless dogs, do ye not see how young and frail he
 is?  Let him go--I will take his lashes."
 
 "Marry, a good thought--and thanks for it," said Sir Hugh, his face
 lighting with a sardonic satisfaction.  "Let the little beggar go, and
 give this fellow a dozen in his place--an honest dozen, well laid on."
--**--**--
 Never mind--let that matter take care of itself; it was a bridge that
 would not need to be crossed till he should come to it.  He was an old
 campaigner, and used to inventing shifts and expedients:  no doubt he
 would be able to find a way.  Yes, he would strike for the capital.
 Maybe his father's old friend Sir Humphrey Marlow would help him--'good
 old Sir Humphrey, Head Lieutenant of the late King's kitchen, or stables,
 or something'--Miles could not remember just what or which.  Now that he
 had something to turn his energies to, a distinctly defined object to
 accomplish, the fog of humiliation and depression which had settled down
 upon his spirits lifted and blew away, and he raised his head and looked
 about him.  He was surprised to see how far he had come; the village was
 away behind him.  The King was jogging along in his wake, with his head
 bowed; for he, too, was deep in plans and thinkings.  A sorrowful
 misgiving clouded Hendon's new-born cheerfulness:  would the boy be
 willing to go again to a city where, during all his brief life, he had
 never known anything but ill-usage and pinching want?  But the question
 must be asked; it could not be avoided; so Hendon reined up, and called
 out--
 
 "I had forgotten to inquire whither we are bound.  Thy commands, my
 liege!"
 
 "To London!"
 
 Hendon moved on again, mightily contented with the answer--but astounded
 at it too.
 
 The whole journey was made without an adventure of importance. But it
 ended with one.  About ten o'clock on the night of the 19th of February
 they stepped upon London Bridge, in the midst of a writhing, struggling
 jam of howling and hurrahing people, whose beer-jolly faces stood out
 strongly in the glare from manifold torches--and at that instant the
--**--**--
 experience.
 
 When we saw him last, royalty was just beginning to have a bright side
 for him.  This bright side went on brightening more and more every day:
 in a very little while it was become almost all sunshine and
 delightfulness.  He lost his fears; his misgivings faded out and died;
 his embarrassments departed, and gave place to an easy and confident
 bearing.  He worked the whipping-boy mine to ever-increasing profit.
 
 He ordered my Lady Elizabeth and my Lady Jane Grey into his presence when
 he wanted to play or talk, and dismissed them when he was done with them,
 with the air of one familiarly accustomed to such performances.  It no
 longer confused him to have these lofty personages kiss his hand at
 parting.
 
 He came to enjoy being conducted to bed in state at night, and dressed
 with intricate and solemn ceremony in the morning.  It came to be a proud
 pleasure to march to dinner attended by a glittering procession of
 officers of state and gentlemen-at-arms; insomuch, indeed, that he
 doubled his guard of gentlemen-at-arms, and made them a hundred.  He
 liked to hear the bugles sounding down the long corridors, and the
 distant voices responding, "Way for the King!"
 
 He even learned to enjoy sitting in throned state in council, and seeming
 to be something more than the Lord Protector's mouthpiece. He liked to
 receive great ambassadors and their gorgeous trains, and listen to the
 affectionate messages they brought from illustrious monarchs who called
 him brother.  O happy Tom Canty, late of Offal Court!
 
 He enjoyed his splendid clothes, and ordered more:  he found his four
 hundred servants too few for his proper grandeur, and trebled them.  The
 adulation of salaaming courtiers came to be sweet music to his ears.  He
 remained kind and gentle, and a sturdy and determined champion of all
--**--**--
 moments the old Tower disappeared in the vast fog of its own smoke, all
 but the very top of the tall pile called the White Tower; this, with its
 banners, stood out above the dense bank of vapour as a mountain-peak
 projects above a cloud-rack.
 
 Tom Canty, splendidly arrayed, mounted a prancing war-steed, whose rich
 trappings almost reached to the ground; his 'uncle,' the Lord Protector
 Somerset, similarly mounted, took place in his rear; the King's Guard
 formed in single ranks on either side, clad in burnished armour; after
 the Protector followed a seemingly interminable procession of resplendent
 nobles attended by their vassals; after these came the lord mayor and the
 aldermanic body, in crimson velvet robes, and with their gold chains
 across their breasts; and after these the officers and members of all the
 guilds of London, in rich raiment, and bearing the showy banners of the
 several corporations.  Also in the procession, as a special guard of
 honour through the city, was the Ancient and Honourable Artillery
 Company--an organisation already three hundred years old at that time,
 and the only military body in England possessing the privilege (which it
 still possesses in our day) of holding itself independent of the commands
 of Parliament.  It was a brilliant spectacle, and was hailed with
 acclamations all along the line, as it took its stately way through the
 packed multitudes of citizens. The chronicler says, 'The King, as he
 entered the city, was received by the people with prayers, welcomings,
 cries, and tender words, and all signs which argue an earnest love of
 subjects toward their sovereign; and the King, by holding up his glad
 countenance to such as stood afar off, and most tender language to those
 that stood nigh his Grace, showed himself no less thankful to receive the
--**--**--
 consternation struck through him; he recognised his mother! and up flew
 his hand, palm outward, before his eyes--that old involuntary gesture,
 born of a forgotten episode, and perpetuated by habit.  In an instant
 more she had torn her way out of the press, and past the guards, and was
 at his side.  She embraced his leg, she covered it with kisses, she
 cried, "O my child, my darling!" lifting toward him a face that was
 transfigured with joy and love.  The same instant an officer of the
 King's Guard snatched her away with a curse, and sent her reeling back
 whence she came with a vigorous impulse from his strong arm.  The words
 "I do not know you, woman!" were falling from Tom Canty's lips when this
 piteous thing occurred; but it smote him to the heart to see her treated
 so; and as she turned for a last glimpse of him, whilst the crowd was
 swallowing her from his sight, she seemed so wounded, so broken-hearted,
 that a shame fell upon him which consumed his pride to ashes, and
 withered his stolen royalty.  His grandeurs were stricken valueless:
 they seemed to fall away from him like rotten rags.
 
 The procession moved on, and still on, through ever augmenting splendours
 and ever augmenting tempests of welcome; but to Tom Canty they were as if
 they had not been.  He neither saw nor heard.  Royalty had lost its grace
 and sweetness; its pomps were become a reproach.  Remorse was eating his
 heart out.  He said, "Would God I were free of my captivity!"
 
 He had unconsciously dropped back into the phraseology of the first days
 of his compulsory greatness.
 
 The shining pageant still went winding like a radiant and interminable
 serpent down the crooked lanes of the quaint old city, and through the
--**--**--
 "Well, I lay if I get hold of you I'll--"
 
 She did not finish, for by this time she was bending down and punching
 under the bed with the broom, and so she needed breath to punctuate the
 punches with. She resurrected nothing but the cat.
 
 "I never did see the beat of that boy!"
 
 She went to the open door and stood in it and looked out among the
 tomato vines and "jimpson" weeds that constituted the garden. No Tom.
 So she lifted up her voice at an angle calculated for distance and
 shouted:
 
 "Y-o-u-u TOM!"
 
 There was a slight noise behind her and she turned just in time to
 seize a small boy by the slack of his roundabout and arrest his flight.
 
 "There! I might 'a' thought of that closet. What you been doing in
 there?"
 
 "Nothing."
 
 "Nothing! Look at your hands. And look at your mouth. What IS that
 truck?"
 
 "I don't know, aunt."
 
 "Well, I know. It's jam--that's what it is. Forty times I've said if
 you didn't let that jam alone I'd skin you. Hand me that switch."
 
 The switch hovered in the air--the peril was desperate--
 
 "My! Look behind you, aunt!"
 
 The old lady whirled round, and snatched her skirts out of danger. The
 lad fled on the instant, scrambled up the high board-fence, and
 disappeared over it.
 
 His aunt Polly stood surprised a moment, and then broke into a gentle
 laugh.
 
 "Hang the boy, can't I never learn anything? Ain't he played me tricks
 enough like that for me to be looking out for him by this time? But old
 fools is the biggest fools there is. Can't learn an old dog new tricks,
 as the saying is. But my goodness, he never plays them alike, two days,
 and how is a body to know what's coming? He 'pears to know just how
--**--**--
 checked his whistle. A stranger was before him--a boy a shade larger
 than himself. A new-comer of any age or either sex was an impressive
 curiosity in the poor little shabby village of St. Petersburg. This boy
 was well dressed, too--well dressed on a week-day. This was simply
 astounding. His cap was a dainty thing, his close-buttoned blue cloth
 roundabout was new and natty, and so were his pantaloons. He had shoes
 on--and it was only Friday. He even wore a necktie, a bright bit of
 ribbon. He had a citified air about him that ate into Tom's vitals. The
 more Tom stared at the splendid marvel, the higher he turned up his
 nose at his finery and the shabbier and shabbier his own outfit seemed
 to him to grow. Neither boy spoke. If one moved, the other moved--but
 only sidewise, in a circle; they kept face to face and eye to eye all
 the time. Finally Tom said:
 
 "I can lick you!"
 
 "I'd like to see you try it."
 
 "Well, I can do it."
 
 "No you can't, either."
 
 "Yes I can."
 
 "No you can't."
 
 "I can."
 
 "You can't."
 
 "Can!"
 
 "Can't!"
 
 An uncomfortable pause. Then Tom said:
 
 "What's your name?"
 
 "'Tisn't any of your business, maybe."
 
 "Well I 'low I'll MAKE it my business."
 
 "Well why don't you?"
 
 "If you say much, I will."
 
 "Much--much--MUCH. There now."
 
 "Oh, you think you're mighty smart, DON'T you? I could lick you with
 one hand tied behind me, if I wanted to."
 
 "Well why don't you DO it? You SAY you can do it."
 
 "Well I WILL, if you fool with me."
 
 "Oh yes--I've seen whole families in the same fix."
 
 "Smarty! You think you're SOME, now, DON'T you? Oh, what a hat!"
 
 "You can lump that hat if you don't like it. I dare you to knock it
--**--**--
 were rolling and tumbling in the dirt, gripped together like cats; and
 for the space of a minute they tugged and tore at each other's hair and
 clothes, punched and scratched each other's nose, and covered
 themselves with dust and glory. Presently the confusion took form, and
 through the fog of battle Tom appeared, seated astride the new boy, and
 pounding him with his fists. "Holler 'nuff!" said he.
 
 The boy only struggled to free himself. He was crying--mainly from rage.
 
 "Holler 'nuff!"--and the pounding went on.
 
 At last the stranger got out a smothered "'Nuff!" and Tom let him up
 and said:
 
 "Now that'll learn you. Better look out who you're fooling with next
 time."
 
 The new boy went off brushing the dust from his clothes, sobbing,
 snuffling, and occasionally looking back and shaking his head and
 threatening what he would do to Tom the "next time he caught him out."
 To which Tom responded with jeers, and started off in high feather, and
 as soon as his back was turned the new boy snatched up a stone, threw
 it and hit him between the shoulders and then turned tail and ran like
 an antelope. Tom chased the traitor home, and thus found out where he
 lived. He then held a position at the gate for some time, daring the
 enemy to come outside, but the enemy only made faces at him through the
 window and declined. At last the enemy's mother appeared, and called
 Tom a bad, vicious, vulgar child, and ordered him away. So he went
 away; but he said he "'lowed" to "lay" for that boy.
 
 He got home pretty late that night, and when he climbed cautiously in
 at the window, he uncovered an ambuscade, in the person of his aunt;
 and when she saw the state his clothes were in her resolution to turn
--**--**--
 "Stop the stabboard! Ting-a-ling-ling! Stop the labboard! Come ahead
 on the stabboard! Stop her! Let your outside turn over slow!
 Ting-a-ling-ling! Chow-ow-ow! Get out that head-line! LIVELY now!
 Come--out with your spring-line--what're you about there! Take a turn
 round that stump with the bight of it! Stand by that stage, now--let her
 go! Done with the engines, sir! Ting-a-ling-ling! SH'T! S'H'T! SH'T!"
 (trying the gauge-cocks).
 
 Tom went on whitewashing--paid no attention to the steamboat. Ben
 stared a moment and then said: "Hi-YI! YOU'RE up a stump, ain't you!"
 
 No answer. Tom surveyed his last touch with the eye of an artist, then
 he gave his brush another gentle sweep and surveyed the result, as
 before. Ben ranged up alongside of him. Tom's mouth watered for the
 apple, but he stuck to his work. Ben said:
 
 "Hello, old chap, you got to work, hey?"
 
 Tom wheeled suddenly and said:
 
 "Why, it's you, Ben! I warn't noticing."
 
 "Say--I'm going in a-swimming, I am. Don't you wish you could? But of
 course you'd druther WORK--wouldn't you? Course you would!"
 
 Tom contemplated the boy a bit, and said:
 
 "What do you call work?"
 
 "Why, ain't THAT work?"
 
 Tom resumed his whitewashing, and answered carelessly:
 
 "Well, maybe it is, and maybe it ain't. All I know, is, it suits Tom
 Sawyer."
 
 "Oh come, now, you don't mean to let on that you LIKE it?"
 
 The brush continued to move.
 
 "Like it? Well, I don't see why I oughtn't to like it. Does a boy get
 a chance to whitewash a fence every day?"
 
 That put the thing in a new light. Ben stopped nibbling his apple. Tom
 swept his brush daintily back and forth--stepped back to note the
 effect--added a touch here and there--criticised the effect again--Ben
 watching every move and getting more and more interested, more and more
--**--**--
 confessed hardly a week ago; he had been the happiest and the proudest
 boy in the world only seven short days, and here in one instant of time
 she had gone out of his heart like a casual stranger whose visit is
 done.
 
 He worshipped this new angel with furtive eye, till he saw that she
 had discovered him; then he pretended he did not know she was present,
 and began to "show off" in all sorts of absurd boyish ways, in order to
 win her admiration. He kept up this grotesque foolishness for some
 time; but by-and-by, while he was in the midst of some dangerous
 gymnastic performances, he glanced aside and saw that the little girl
 was wending her way toward the house. Tom came up to the fence and
 leaned on it, grieving, and hoping she would tarry yet awhile longer.
 She halted a moment on the steps and then moved toward the door. Tom
 heaved a great sigh as she put her foot on the threshold. But his face
 lit up, right away, for she tossed a pansy over the fence a moment
 before she disappeared.
 
 The boy ran around and stopped within a foot or two of the flower, and
 then shaded his eyes with his hand and began to look down street as if
 he had discovered something of interest going on in that direction.
 Presently he picked up a straw and began trying to balance it on his
 nose, with his head tilted far back; and as he moved from side to side,
 in his efforts, he edged nearer and nearer toward the pansy; finally
 his bare foot rested upon it, his pliant toes closed upon it, and he
 hopped away with the treasure and disappeared round the corner. But
 only for a minute--only while he could button the flower inside his
--**--**--
 his back, with his hands clasped upon his breast and holding his poor
 wilted flower. And thus he would die--out in the cold world, with no
 shelter over his homeless head, no friendly hand to wipe the
 death-damps from his brow, no loving face to bend pityingly over him
 when the great agony came. And thus SHE would see him when she looked
 out upon the glad morning, and oh! would she drop one little tear upon
 his poor, lifeless form, would she heave one little sigh to see a bright
 young life so rudely blighted, so untimely cut down?
 
 The window went up, a maid-servant's discordant voice profaned the
 holy calm, and a deluge of water drenched the prone martyr's remains!
 
 The strangling hero sprang up with a relieving snort. There was a whiz
 as of a missile in the air, mingled with the murmur of a curse, a sound
 as of shivering glass followed, and a small, vague form went over the
 fence and shot away in the gloom.
 
 Not long after, as Tom, all undressed for bed, was surveying his
 drenched garments by the light of a tallow dip, Sid woke up; but if he
 had any dim idea of making any "references to allusions," he thought
 better of it and held his peace, for there was danger in Tom's eye.
 
 Tom turned in without the added vexation of prayers, and Sid made
 mental note of the omission.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 THE sun rose upon a tranquil world, and beamed down upon the peaceful
 village like a benediction. Breakfast over, Aunt Polly had family
 worship: it began with a prayer built from the ground up of solid
 courses of Scriptural quotations, welded together with a thin mortar of
 originality; and from the summit of this she delivered a grim chapter
--**--**--
 "Now ain't you ashamed, Tom. You mustn't be so bad. Water won't hurt
 you."
 
 Tom was a trifle disconcerted. The basin was refilled, and this time
 he stood over it a little while, gathering resolution; took in a big
 breath and began. When he entered the kitchen presently, with both eyes
 shut and groping for the towel with his hands, an honorable testimony
 of suds and water was dripping from his face. But when he emerged from
 the towel, he was not yet satisfactory, for the clean territory stopped
 short at his chin and his jaws, like a mask; below and beyond this line
 there was a dark expanse of unirrigated soil that spread downward in
 front and backward around his neck. Mary took him in hand, and when she
 was done with him he was a man and a brother, without distinction of
 color, and his saturated hair was neatly brushed, and its short curls
 wrought into a dainty and symmetrical general effect. [He privately
 smoothed out the curls, with labor and difficulty, and plastered his
 hair close down to his head; for he held curls to be effeminate, and
 his own filled his life with bitterness.] Then Mary got out a suit of
 his clothing that had been used only on Sundays during two years--they
 were simply called his "other clothes"--and so by that we know the
 size of his wardrobe. The girl "put him to rights" after he had dressed
 himself; she buttoned his neat roundabout up to his chin, turned his
 vast shirt collar down over his shoulders, brushed him off and crowned
 him with his speckled straw hat. He now looked exceedingly improved and
 uncomfortable. He was fully as uncomfortable as he looked; for there
 was a restraint about whole clothes and cleanliness that galled him. He
--**--**--
 one little girl who is looking out of the window--I am afraid she
 thinks I am out there somewhere--perhaps up in one of the trees making
 a speech to the little birds. [Applausive titter.] I want to tell you
 how good it makes me feel to see so many bright, clean little faces
 assembled in a place like this, learning to do right and be good." And
 so forth and so on. It is not necessary to set down the rest of the
 oration. It was of a pattern which does not vary, and so it is familiar
 to us all.
 
 The latter third of the speech was marred by the resumption of fights
 and other recreations among certain of the bad boys, and by fidgetings
 and whisperings that extended far and wide, washing even to the bases
 of isolated and incorruptible rocks like Sid and Mary. But now every
 sound ceased suddenly, with the subsidence of Mr. Walters' voice, and
 the conclusion of the speech was received with a burst of silent
 gratitude.
 
 A good part of the whispering had been occasioned by an event which
 was more or less rare--the entrance of visitors: lawyer Thatcher,
 accompanied by a very feeble and aged man; a fine, portly, middle-aged
 gentleman with iron-gray hair; and a dignified lady who was doubtless
 the latter's wife. The lady was leading a child. Tom had been restless
 and full of chafings and repinings; conscience-smitten, too--he could
 not meet Amy Lawrence's eye, he could not brook her loving gaze. But
 when he saw this small new-comer his soul was all ablaze with bliss in
 a moment. The next moment he was "showing off" with all his might
 --cuffing boys, pulling hair, making faces--in a word, using every art
 that seemed likely to fascinate a girl and win her applause. His
--**--**--
 Let us draw the curtain of charity over the rest of the scene.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V
 
 ABOUT half-past ten the cracked bell of the small church began to
 ring, and presently the people began to gather for the morning sermon.
 The Sunday-school children distributed themselves about the house and
 occupied pews with their parents, so as to be under supervision. Aunt
 Polly came, and Tom and Sid and Mary sat with her--Tom being placed
 next the aisle, in order that he might be as far away from the open
 window and the seductive outside summer scenes as possible. The crowd
 filed up the aisles: the aged and needy postmaster, who had seen better
 days; the mayor and his wife--for they had a mayor there, among other
 unnecessaries; the justice of the peace; the widow Douglass, fair,
 smart, and forty, a generous, good-hearted soul and well-to-do, her
 hill mansion the only palace in the town, and the most hospitable and
 much the most lavish in the matter of festivities that St. Petersburg
 could boast; the bent and venerable Major and Mrs. Ward; lawyer
 Riverson, the new notable from a distance; next the belle of the
 village, followed by a troop of lawn-clad and ribbon-decked young
 heart-breakers; then all the young clerks in town in a body--for they
 had stood in the vestibule sucking their cane-heads, a circling wall of
 oiled and simpering admirers, till the last girl had run their gantlet;
 and last of all came the Model Boy, Willie Mufferson, taking as heedful
 care of his mother as if she were cut glass. He always brought his
 mother to church, and was the pride of all the matrons. The boys all
 hated him, he was so good. And besides, he had been "thrown up to them"
 so much. His white handkerchief was hanging out of his pocket behind, as
--**--**--
 picture of the assembling together of the world's hosts at the
 millennium when the lion and the lamb should lie down together and a
 little child should lead them. But the pathos, the lesson, the moral of
 the great spectacle were lost upon the boy; he only thought of the
 conspicuousness of the principal character before the on-looking
 nations; his face lit with the thought, and he said to himself that he
 wished he could be that child, if it was a tame lion.
 
 Now he lapsed into suffering again, as the dry argument was resumed.
 Presently he bethought him of a treasure he had and got it out. It was
 a large black beetle with formidable jaws--a "pinchbug," he called it.
 It was in a percussion-cap box. The first thing the beetle did was to
 take him by the finger. A natural fillip followed, the beetle went
 floundering into the aisle and lit on its back, and the hurt finger
 went into the boy's mouth. The beetle lay there working its helpless
 legs, unable to turn over. Tom eyed it, and longed for it; but it was
 safe out of his reach. Other people uninterested in the sermon found
 relief in the beetle, and they eyed it too. Presently a vagrant poodle
 dog came idling along, sad at heart, lazy with the summer softness and
 the quiet, weary of captivity, sighing for change. He spied the beetle;
 the drooping tail lifted and wagged. He surveyed the prize; walked
 around it; smelt at it from a safe distance; walked around it again;
 grew bolder, and took a closer smell; then lifted his lip and made a
 gingerly snatch at it, just missing it; made another, and another;
 began to enjoy the diversion; subsided to his stomach with the beetle
--**--**--
 
 Tom groaned louder, and fancied that he began to feel pain in the toe.
 
 No result from Sid.
 
 Tom was panting with his exertions by this time. He took a rest and
 then swelled himself up and fetched a succession of admirable groans.
 
 Sid snored on.
 
 Tom was aggravated. He said, "Sid, Sid!" and shook him. This course
 worked well, and Tom began to groan again. Sid yawned, stretched, then
 brought himself up on his elbow with a snort, and began to stare at
 Tom. Tom went on groaning. Sid said:
 
 "Tom! Say, Tom!" [No response.] "Here, Tom! TOM! What is the matter,
 Tom?" And he shook him and looked in his face anxiously.
 
 Tom moaned out:
 
 "Oh, don't, Sid. Don't joggle me."
 
 "Why, what's the matter, Tom? I must call auntie."
 
 "No--never mind. It'll be over by and by, maybe. Don't call anybody."
 
 "But I must! DON'T groan so, Tom, it's awful. How long you been this
 way?"
 
 "Hours. Ouch! Oh, don't stir so, Sid, you'll kill me."
 
 "Tom, why didn't you wake me sooner? Oh, Tom, DON'T! It makes my
 flesh crawl to hear you. Tom, what is the matter?"
 
 "I forgive you everything, Sid. [Groan.] Everything you've ever done
 to me. When I'm gone--"
 
 "Oh, Tom, you ain't dying, are you? Don't, Tom--oh, don't. Maybe--"
 
 "I forgive everybody, Sid. [Groan.] Tell 'em so, Sid. And Sid, you
 give my window-sash and my cat with one eye to that new girl that's
 come to town, and tell her--"
 
 But Sid had snatched his clothes and gone. Tom was suffering in
 reality, now, so handsomely was his imagination working, and so his
 groans had gathered quite a genuine tone.
 
 Sid flew down-stairs and said:
 
 "Oh, Aunt Polly, come! Tom's dying!"
 
 "Dying!"
 
 "Yes'm. Don't wait--come quick!"
 
 "Rubbage! I don't believe it!"
--**--**--
 "Lemme see him, Huck. My, he's pretty stiff. Where'd you get him?"
 
 "Bought him off'n a boy."
 
 "What did you give?"
 
 "I give a blue ticket and a bladder that I got at the slaughter-house."
 
 "Where'd you get the blue ticket?"
 
 "Bought it off'n Ben Rogers two weeks ago for a hoop-stick."
 
 "Say--what is dead cats good for, Huck?"
 
 "Good for? Cure warts with."
 
 "No! Is that so? I know something that's better."
 
 "I bet you don't. What is it?"
 
 "Why, spunk-water."
 
 "Spunk-water! I wouldn't give a dern for spunk-water."
 
 "You wouldn't, wouldn't you? D'you ever try it?"
 
 "No, I hain't. But Bob Tanner did."
 
 "Who told you so!"
 
 "Why, he told Jeff Thatcher, and Jeff told Johnny Baker, and Johnny
 told Jim Hollis, and Jim told Ben Rogers, and Ben told a nigger, and
 the nigger told me. There now!"
 
 "Well, what of it? They'll all lie. Leastways all but the nigger. I
 don't know HIM. But I never see a nigger that WOULDN'T lie. Shucks! Now
 you tell me how Bob Tanner done it, Huck."
 
 "Why, he took and dipped his hand in a rotten stump where the
 rain-water was."
 
 "In the daytime?"
 
 "Certainly."
 
 "With his face to the stump?"
 
 "Yes. Least I reckon so."
 
 "Did he say anything?"
 
 "I don't reckon he did. I don't know."
 
 "Aha! Talk about trying to cure warts with spunk-water such a blame
 fool way as that! Why, that ain't a-going to do any good. You got to go
 all by yourself, to the middle of the woods, where you know there's a
 spunk-water stump, and just as it's midnight you back up against the
 stump and jam your hand in and say:
 
   'Barley-corn, barley-corn, injun-meal shorts,
    Spunk-water, spunk-water, swaller these warts,'
 
 and then walk away quick, eleven steps, with your eyes shut, and then
--**--**--
 
 Tom got out a bit of paper and carefully unrolled it. Huckleberry
 viewed it wistfully. The temptation was very strong. At last he said:
 
 "Is it genuwyne?"
 
 Tom lifted his lip and showed the vacancy.
 
 "Well, all right," said Huckleberry, "it's a trade."
 
 Tom enclosed the tick in the percussion-cap box that had lately been
 the pinchbug's prison, and the boys separated, each feeling wealthier
 than before.
 
 When Tom reached the little isolated frame schoolhouse, he strode in
 briskly, with the manner of one who had come with all honest speed.
 He hung his hat on a peg and flung himself into his seat with
 business-like alacrity. The master, throned on high in his great
 splint-bottom arm-chair, was dozing, lulled by the drowsy hum of study.
 The interruption roused him.
 
 "Thomas Sawyer!"
 
 Tom knew that when his name was pronounced in full, it meant trouble.
 
 "Sir!"
 
 "Come up here. Now, sir, why are you late again, as usual?"
 
 Tom was about to take refuge in a lie, when he saw two long tails of
 yellow hair hanging down a back that he recognized by the electric
 sympathy of love; and by that form was THE ONLY VACANT PLACE on the
 girls' side of the schoolhouse. He instantly said:
 
 "I STOPPED TO TALK WITH HUCKLEBERRY FINN!"
 
 The master's pulse stood still, and he stared helplessly. The buzz of
 study ceased. The pupils wondered if this foolhardy boy had lost his
 mind. The master said:
 
 "You--you did what?"
 
 "Stopped to talk with Huckleberry Finn."
 
 There was no mistaking the words.
 
 "Thomas Sawyer, this is the most astounding confession I have ever
 listened to. No mere ferule will answer for this offence. Take off your
 jacket."
 
 The master's arm performed until it was tired and the stock of
 switches notably diminished. Then the order followed:
--**--**--
 
 "Good--that's a whack. What's your name?"
 
 "Becky Thatcher. What's yours? Oh, I know. It's Thomas Sawyer."
 
 "That's the name they lick me by. I'm Tom when I'm good. You call me
 Tom, will you?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 Now Tom began to scrawl something on the slate, hiding the words from
 the girl. But she was not backward this time. She begged to see. Tom
 said:
 
 "Oh, it ain't anything."
 
 "Yes it is."
 
 "No it ain't. You don't want to see."
 
 "Yes I do, indeed I do. Please let me."
 
 "You'll tell."
 
 "No I won't--deed and deed and double deed won't."
 
 "You won't tell anybody at all? Ever, as long as you live?"
 
 "No, I won't ever tell ANYbody. Now let me."
 
 "Oh, YOU don't want to see!"
 
 "Now that you treat me so, I WILL see." And she put her small hand
 upon his and a little scuffle ensued, Tom pretending to resist in
 earnest but letting his hand slip by degrees till these words were
 revealed: "I LOVE YOU."
 
 "Oh, you bad thing!" And she hit his hand a smart rap, but reddened
 and looked pleased, nevertheless.
 
 Just at this juncture the boy felt a slow, fateful grip closing on his
 ear, and a steady lifting impulse. In that wise he was borne across the
 house and deposited in his own seat, under a peppering fire of giggles
 from the whole school. Then the master stood over him during a few
 awful moments, and finally moved away to his throne without saying a
 word. But although Tom's ear tingled, his heart was jubilant.
 
 As the school quieted down Tom made an honest effort to study, but the
 turmoil within him was too great. In turn he took his place in the
 reading class and made a botch of it; then in the geography class and
--**--**--
 "Look here, Joe Harper, whose is that tick?"
 
 "I don't care whose tick he is--he's on my side of the line, and you
 sha'n't touch him."
 
 "Well, I'll just bet I will, though. He's my tick and I'll do what I
 blame please with him, or die!"
 
 A tremendous whack came down on Tom's shoulders, and its duplicate on
 Joe's; and for the space of two minutes the dust continued to fly from
 the two jackets and the whole school to enjoy it. The boys had been too
 absorbed to notice the hush that had stolen upon the school awhile
 before when the master came tiptoeing down the room and stood over
 them. He had contemplated a good part of the performance before he
 contributed his bit of variety to it.
 
 When school broke up at noon, Tom flew to Becky Thatcher, and
 whispered in her ear:
 
 "Put on your bonnet and let on you're going home; and when you get to
 the corner, give the rest of 'em the slip, and turn down through the
 lane and come back. I'll go the other way and come it over 'em the same
 way."
 
 So the one went off with one group of scholars, and the other with
 another. In a little while the two met at the bottom of the lane, and
 when they reached the school they had it all to themselves. Then they
 sat together, with a slate before them, and Tom gave Becky the pencil
 and held her hand in his, guiding it, and so created another surprising
 house. When the interest in art began to wane, the two fell to talking.
 Tom was swimming in bliss. He said:
 
 "Do you love rats?"
 
 "No! I hate them!"
 
 "Well, I do, too--LIVE ones. But I mean dead ones, to swing round your
--**--**--
 she would repent and come to find him. But she did not. Then he began
 to feel badly and fear that he was in the wrong. It was a hard struggle
 with him to make new advances, now, but he nerved himself to it and
 entered. She was still standing back there in the corner, sobbing, with
 her face to the wall. Tom's heart smote him. He went to her and stood a
 moment, not knowing exactly how to proceed. Then he said hesitatingly:
 
 "Becky, I--I don't care for anybody but you."
 
 No reply--but sobs.
 
 "Becky"--pleadingly. "Becky, won't you say something?"
 
 More sobs.
 
 Tom got out his chiefest jewel, a brass knob from the top of an
 andiron, and passed it around her so that she could see it, and said:
 
 "Please, Becky, won't you take it?"
 
 She struck it to the floor. Then Tom marched out of the house and over
 the hills and far away, to return to school no more that day. Presently
 Becky began to suspect. She ran to the door; he was not in sight; she
 flew around to the play-yard; he was not there. Then she called:
 
 "Tom! Come back, Tom!"
 
 She listened intently, but there was no answer. She had no companions
 but silence and loneliness. So she sat down to cry again and upbraid
 herself; and by this time the scholars began to gather again, and she
 had to hide her griefs and still her broken heart and take up the cross
 of a long, dreary, aching afternoon, with none among the strangers
 about her to exchange sorrows with.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII
 
 TOM dodged hither and thither through lanes until he was well out of
 the track of returning scholars, and then fell into a moody jog. He
 crossed a small "branch" two or three times, because of a prevailing
--**--**--
 
 Yes, it was settled; his career was determined. He would run away from
 home and enter upon it. He would start the very next morning. Therefore
 he must now begin to get ready. He would collect his resources
 together. He went to a rotten log near at hand and began to dig under
 one end of it with his Barlow knife. He soon struck wood that sounded
 hollow. He put his hand there and uttered this incantation impressively:
 
 "What hasn't come here, come! What's here, stay here!"
 
 Then he scraped away the dirt, and exposed a pine shingle. He took it
 up and disclosed a shapely little treasure-house whose bottom and sides
 were of shingles. In it lay a marble. Tom's astonishment was boundless!
 He scratched his head with a perplexed air, and said:
 
 "Well, that beats anything!"
 
 Then he tossed the marble away pettishly, and stood cogitating. The
 truth was, that a superstition of his had failed, here, which he and
 all his comrades had always looked upon as infallible. If you buried a
 marble with certain necessary incantations, and left it alone a
 fortnight, and then opened the place with the incantation he had just
 used, you would find that all the marbles you had ever lost had
 gathered themselves together there, meantime, no matter how widely they
 had been separated. But now, this thing had actually and unquestionably
 failed. Tom's whole structure of faith was shaken to its foundations.
 He had many a time heard of this thing succeeding but never of its
 failing before. It did not occur to him that he had tried it several
 times before, himself, but could never find the hiding-places
 afterward. He puzzled over the matter some time, and finally decided
 that some witch had interfered and broken the charm. He thought he
--**--**--
 crack mysteriously. The stairs creaked faintly. Evidently spirits were
 abroad. A measured, muffled snore issued from Aunt Polly's chamber. And
 now the tiresome chirping of a cricket that no human ingenuity could
 locate, began. Next the ghastly ticking of a deathwatch in the wall at
 the bed's head made Tom shudder--it meant that somebody's days were
 numbered. Then the howl of a far-off dog rose on the night air, and was
 answered by a fainter howl from a remoter distance. Tom was in an
 agony. At last he was satisfied that time had ceased and eternity
 begun; he began to doze, in spite of himself; the clock chimed eleven,
 but he did not hear it. And then there came, mingling with his
 half-formed dreams, a most melancholy caterwauling. The raising of a
 neighboring window disturbed him. A cry of "Scat! you devil!" and the
 crash of an empty bottle against the back of his aunt's woodshed
 brought him wide awake, and a single minute later he was dressed and
 out of the window and creeping along the roof of the "ell" on all
 fours. He "meow'd" with caution once or twice, as he went; then jumped
 to the roof of the woodshed and thence to the ground. Huckleberry Finn
 was there, with his dead cat. The boys moved off and disappeared in the
 gloom. At the end of half an hour they were wading through the tall
 grass of the graveyard.
 
 It was a graveyard of the old-fashioned Western kind. It was on a
 hill, about a mile and a half from the village. It had a crazy board
 fence around it, which leaned inward in places, and outward the rest of
 the time, but stood upright nowhere. Grass and weeds grew rank over the
 whole cemetery. All the old graves were sunken in, there was not a
--**--**--
 
 "Sh! There 'tis again! Didn't you hear it?"
 
 "I--"
 
 "There! Now you hear it."
 
 "Lord, Tom, they're coming! They're coming, sure. What'll we do?"
 
 "I dono. Think they'll see us?"
 
 "Oh, Tom, they can see in the dark, same as cats. I wisht I hadn't
 come."
 
 "Oh, don't be afeard. I don't believe they'll bother us. We ain't
 doing any harm. If we keep perfectly still, maybe they won't notice us
 at all."
 
 "I'll try to, Tom, but, Lord, I'm all of a shiver."
 
 "Listen!"
 
 The boys bent their heads together and scarcely breathed. A muffled
 sound of voices floated up from the far end of the graveyard.
 
 "Look! See there!" whispered Tom. "What is it?"
 
 "It's devil-fire. Oh, Tom, this is awful."
 
 Some vague figures approached through the gloom, swinging an
 old-fashioned tin lantern that freckled the ground with innumerable
 little spangles of light. Presently Huckleberry whispered with a
 shudder:
 
 "It's the devils sure enough. Three of 'em! Lordy, Tom, we're goners!
 Can you pray?"
 
 "I'll try, but don't you be afeard. They ain't going to hurt us. 'Now
 I lay me down to sleep, I--'"
 
 "Sh!"
 
 "What is it, Huck?"
 
 "They're HUMANS! One of 'em is, anyway. One of 'em's old Muff Potter's
 voice."
 
 "No--'tain't so, is it?"
 
 "I bet I know it. Don't you stir nor budge. He ain't sharp enough to
 notice us. Drunk, the same as usual, likely--blamed old rip!"
 
 "All right, I'll keep still. Now they're stuck. Can't find it. Here
 they come again. Now they're hot. Cold again. Hot again. Red hot!
 They're p'inted right, this time. Say, Huck, I know another o' them
 voices; it's Injun Joe."
 
 "That's so--that murderin' half-breed! I'd druther they was devils a
 dern sight. What kin they be up to?"
 
 The whisper died wholly out, now, for the three men had reached the
--**--**--
 
 Huckleberry's hard pantings were his only reply, and the boys fixed
 their eyes on the goal of their hopes and bent to their work to win it.
 They gained steadily on it, and at last, breast to breast, they burst
 through the open door and fell grateful and exhausted in the sheltering
 shadows beyond. By and by their pulses slowed down, and Tom whispered:
 
 "Huckleberry, what do you reckon'll come of this?"
 
 "If Doctor Robinson dies, I reckon hanging'll come of it."
 
 "Do you though?"
 
 "Why, I KNOW it, Tom."
 
 Tom thought a while, then he said:
 
 "Who'll tell? We?"
 
 "What are you talking about? S'pose something happened and Injun Joe
 DIDN'T hang? Why, he'd kill us some time or other, just as dead sure as
 we're a laying here."
 
 "That's just what I was thinking to myself, Huck."
 
 "If anybody tells, let Muff Potter do it, if he's fool enough. He's
 generally drunk enough."
 
 Tom said nothing--went on thinking. Presently he whispered:
 
 "Huck, Muff Potter don't know it. How can he tell?"
 
 "What's the reason he don't know it?"
 
 "Because he'd just got that whack when Injun Joe done it. D'you reckon
 he could see anything? D'you reckon he knowed anything?"
 
 "By hokey, that's so, Tom!"
 
 "And besides, look-a-here--maybe that whack done for HIM!"
 
 "No, 'taint likely, Tom. He had liquor in him; I could see that; and
 besides, he always has. Well, when pap's full, you might take and belt
 him over the head with a church and you couldn't phase him. He says so,
 his own self. So it's the same with Muff Potter, of course. But if a
 man was dead sober, I reckon maybe that whack might fetch him; I dono."
 
 After another reflective silence, Tom said:
 
 "Hucky, you sure you can keep mum?"
--**--**--
 too, when the man moved, but their fears passed away now. They tiptoed
 out, through the broken weather-boarding, and stopped at a little
 distance to exchange a parting word. That long, lugubrious howl rose on
 the night air again! They turned and saw the strange dog standing
 within a few feet of where Potter was lying, and FACING Potter, with
 his nose pointing heavenward.
 
 "Oh, geeminy, it's HIM!" exclaimed both boys, in a breath.
 
 "Say, Tom--they say a stray dog come howling around Johnny Miller's
 house, 'bout midnight, as much as two weeks ago; and a whippoorwill
 come in and lit on the banisters and sung, the very same evening; and
 there ain't anybody dead there yet."
 
 "Well, I know that. And suppose there ain't. Didn't Gracie Miller fall
 in the kitchen fire and burn herself terrible the very next Saturday?"
 
 "Yes, but she ain't DEAD. And what's more, she's getting better, too."
 
 "All right, you wait and see. She's a goner, just as dead sure as Muff
 Potter's a goner. That's what the niggers say, and they know all about
 these kind of things, Huck."
 
 Then they separated, cogitating. When Tom crept in at his bedroom
 window the night was almost spent. He undressed with excessive caution,
 and fell asleep congratulating himself that nobody knew of his
 escapade. He was not aware that the gently-snoring Sid was awake, and
 had been so for an hour.
 
 When Tom awoke, Sid was dressed and gone. There was a late look in the
 light, a late sense in the atmosphere. He was startled. Why had he not
 been called--persecuted till he was up, as usual? The thought filled
 him with bodings. Within five minutes he was dressed and down-stairs,
 feeling sore and drowsy. The family were still at table, but they had
--**--**--
 lightnings were still withheld, were confirmed in their belief that Joe
 had sold himself to the devil. He was now become, to them, the most
 balefully interesting object they had ever looked upon, and they could
 not take their fascinated eyes from his face.
 
 They inwardly resolved to watch him nights, when opportunity should
 offer, in the hope of getting a glimpse of his dread master.
 
 Injun Joe helped to raise the body of the murdered man and put it in a
 wagon for removal; and it was whispered through the shuddering crowd
 that the wound bled a little! The boys thought that this happy
 circumstance would turn suspicion in the right direction; but they were
 disappointed, for more than one villager remarked:
 
 "It was within three feet of Muff Potter when it done it."
 
 Tom's fearful secret and gnawing conscience disturbed his sleep for as
 much as a week after this; and at breakfast one morning Sid said:
 
 "Tom, you pitch around and talk in your sleep so much that you keep me
 awake half the time."
 
 Tom blanched and dropped his eyes.
 
 "It's a bad sign," said Aunt Polly, gravely. "What you got on your
 mind, Tom?"
 
 "Nothing. Nothing 't I know of." But the boy's hand shook so that he
 spilled his coffee.
 
 "And you do talk such stuff," Sid said. "Last night you said, 'It's
 blood, it's blood, that's what it is!' You said that over and over. And
 you said, 'Don't torment me so--I'll tell!' Tell WHAT? What is it
 you'll tell?"
 
 Everything was swimming before Tom. There is no telling what might
 have happened, now, but luckily the concern passed out of Aunt Polly's
 face and she came to Tom's relief without knowing it. She said:
 
 "Sho! It's that dreadful murder. I dream about it most every night
--**--**--
 
 Tom felt that it was time to wake up; this sort of life might be
 romantic enough, in his blighted condition, but it was getting to have
 too little sentiment and too much distracting variety about it. So he
 thought over various plans for relief, and finally hit pon that of
 professing to be fond of Pain-killer. He asked for it so often that he
 became a nuisance, and his aunt ended by telling him to help himself
 and quit bothering her. If it had been Sid, she would have had no
 misgivings to alloy her delight; but since it was Tom, she watched the
 bottle clandestinely. She found that the medicine did really diminish,
 but it did not occur to her that the boy was mending the health of a
 crack in the sitting-room floor with it.
 
 One day Tom was in the act of dosing the crack when his aunt's yellow
 cat came along, purring, eying the teaspoon avariciously, and begging
 for a taste. Tom said:
 
 "Don't ask for it unless you want it, Peter."
 
 But Peter signified that he did want it.
 
 "You better make sure."
 
 Peter was sure.
 
 "Now you've asked for it, and I'll give it to you, because there ain't
 anything mean about me; but if you find you don't like it, you mustn't
 blame anybody but your own self."
 
 Peter was agreeable. So Tom pried his mouth open and poured down the
 Pain-killer. Peter sprang a couple of yards in the air, and then
 delivered a war-whoop and set off round and round the room, banging
 against furniture, upsetting flower-pots, and making general havoc.
 Next he rose on his hind feet and pranced around, in a frenzy of
 enjoyment, with his head over his shoulder and his voice proclaiming
 his unappeasable happiness. Then he went tearing around the house again
--**--**--
 too. She began to soften; she felt sorry. Her eyes watered a little,
 and she put her hand on Tom's head and said gently:
 
 "I was meaning for the best, Tom. And, Tom, it DID do you good."
 
 Tom looked up in her face with just a perceptible twinkle peeping
 through his gravity.
 
 "I know you was meaning for the best, aunty, and so was I with Peter.
 It done HIM good, too. I never see him get around so since--"
 
 "Oh, go 'long with you, Tom, before you aggravate me again. And you
 try and see if you can't be a good boy, for once, and you needn't take
 any more medicine."
 
 Tom reached school ahead of time. It was noticed that this strange
 thing had been occurring every day latterly. And now, as usual of late,
 he hung about the gate of the schoolyard instead of playing with his
 comrades. He was sick, he said, and he looked it. He tried to seem to
 be looking everywhere but whither he really was looking--down the road.
 Presently Jeff Thatcher hove in sight, and Tom's face lighted; he gazed
 a moment, and then turned sorrowfully away. When Jeff arrived, Tom
 accosted him; and "led up" warily to opportunities for remark about
 Becky, but the giddy lad never could see the bait. Tom watched and
 watched, hoping whenever a frisking frock came in sight, and hating the
 owner of it as soon as he saw she was not the right one. At last frocks
 ceased to appear, and he dropped hopelessly into the dumps; he entered
 the empty schoolhouse and sat down to suffer. Then one more frock
 passed in at the gate, and Tom's heart gave a great bound. The next
 instant he was out, and "going on" like an Indian; yelling, laughing,
--**--**--
 "Send the r'yals up! Lay out aloft, there, half a dozen of ye
 --foretopmaststuns'l! Lively, now!"
 
 "Aye-aye, sir!"
 
 "Shake out that maintogalans'l! Sheets and braces! NOW my hearties!"
 
 "Aye-aye, sir!"
 
 "Hellum-a-lee--hard a port! Stand by to meet her when she comes! Port,
 port! NOW, men! With a will! Stead-y-y-y!"
 
 "Steady it is, sir!"
 
 The raft drew beyond the middle of the river; the boys pointed her
 head right, and then lay on their oars. The river was not high, so
 there was not more than a two or three mile current. Hardly a word was
 said during the next three-quarters of an hour. Now the raft was
 passing before the distant town. Two or three glimmering lights showed
 where it lay, peacefully sleeping, beyond the vague vast sweep of
 star-gemmed water, unconscious of the tremendous event that was happening.
 The Black Avenger stood still with folded arms, "looking his last" upon
 the scene of his former joys and his later sufferings, and wishing
 "she" could see him now, abroad on the wild sea, facing peril and death
 with dauntless heart, going to his doom with a grim smile on his lips.
 It was but a small strain on his imagination to remove Jackson's Island
 beyond eyeshot of the village, and so he "looked his last" with a
 broken and satisfied heart. The other pirates were looking their last,
 too; and they all looked so long that they came near letting the
 current drift them out of the range of the island. But they discovered
 the danger in time, and made shift to avert it. About two o'clock in
 the morning the raft grounded on the bar two hundred yards above the
 head of the island, and they waded back and forth until they had landed
 their freight. Part of the little raft's belongings consisted of an old
--**--**--
 began a journey over him, his whole heart was glad--for that meant that
 he was going to have a new suit of clothes--without the shadow of a
 doubt a gaudy piratical uniform. Now a procession of ants appeared,
 from nowhere in particular, and went about their labors; one struggled
 manfully by with a dead spider five times as big as itself in its arms,
 and lugged it straight up a tree-trunk. A brown spotted lady-bug
 climbed the dizzy height of a grass blade, and Tom bent down close to
 it and said, "Lady-bug, lady-bug, fly away home, your house is on fire,
 your children's alone," and she took wing and went off to see about it
 --which did not surprise the boy, for he knew of old that this insect was
 credulous about conflagrations, and he had practised upon its
 simplicity more than once. A tumblebug came next, heaving sturdily at
 its ball, and Tom touched the creature, to see it shut its legs against
 its body and pretend to be dead. The birds were fairly rioting by this
 time. A catbird, the Northern mocker, lit in a tree over Tom's head,
 and trilled out her imitations of her neighbors in a rapture of
 enjoyment; then a shrill jay swept down, a flash of blue flame, and
 stopped on a twig almost within the boy's reach, cocked his head to one
 side and eyed the strangers with a consuming curiosity; a gray squirrel
 and a big fellow of the "fox" kind came skurrying along, sitting up at
 intervals to inspect and chatter at the boys, for the wild things had
 probably never seen a human being before and scarcely knew whether to
 be afraid or not. All Nature was wide awake and stirring, now; long
 lances of sunlight pierced down through the dense foliage far and near,
--**--**--
 clock which he takes no distinct note of. But now this mysterious sound
 became more pronounced, and forced a recognition. The boys started,
 glanced at each other, and then each assumed a listening attitude.
 There was a long silence, profound and unbroken; then a deep, sullen
 boom came floating down out of the distance.
 
 "What is it!" exclaimed Joe, under his breath.
 
 "I wonder," said Tom in a whisper.
 
 "'Tain't thunder," said Huckleberry, in an awed tone, "becuz thunder--"
 
 "Hark!" said Tom. "Listen--don't talk."
 
 They waited a time that seemed an age, and then the same muffled boom
 troubled the solemn hush.
 
 "Let's go and see."
 
 They sprang to their feet and hurried to the shore toward the town.
 They parted the bushes on the bank and peered out over the water. The
 little steam ferryboat was about a mile below the village, drifting
 with the current. Her broad deck seemed crowded with people. There were
 a great many skiffs rowing about or floating with the stream in the
 neighborhood of the ferryboat, but the boys could not determine what
 the men in them were doing. Presently a great jet of white smoke burst
 from the ferryboat's side, and as it expanded and rose in a lazy cloud,
 that same dull throb of sound was borne to the listeners again.
 
 "I know now!" exclaimed Tom; "somebody's drownded!"
 
 "That's it!" said Huck; "they done that last summer, when Bill Turner
 got drownded; they shoot a cannon over the water, and that makes him
 come up to the top. Yes, and they take loaves of bread and put
 quicksilver in 'em and set 'em afloat, and wherever there's anybody
 that's drownded, they'll float right there and stop."
 
 "Yes, I've heard about that," said Joe. "I wonder what makes the bread
 do that."
--**--**--
 rest for the moment.
 
 As the night deepened, Huck began to nod, and presently to snore. Joe
 followed next. Tom lay upon his elbow motionless, for some time,
 watching the two intently. At last he got up cautiously, on his knees,
 and went searching among the grass and the flickering reflections flung
 by the camp-fire. He picked up and inspected several large
 semi-cylinders of the thin white bark of a sycamore, and finally chose
 two which seemed to suit him. Then he knelt by the fire and painfully
 wrote something upon each of these with his "red keel"; one he rolled up
 and put in his jacket pocket, and the other he put in Joe's hat and
 removed it to a little distance from the owner. And he also put into the
 hat certain schoolboy treasures of almost inestimable value--among them
 a lump of chalk, an India-rubber ball, three fishhooks, and one of that
 kind of marbles known as a "sure 'nough crystal." Then he tiptoed his
 way cautiously among the trees till he felt that he was out of hearing,
 and straightway broke into a keen run in the direction of the sandbar.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 A FEW minutes later Tom was in the shoal water of the bar, wading
 toward the Illinois shore. Before the depth reached his middle he was
 half-way over; the current would permit no more wading, now, so he
 struck out confidently to swim the remaining hundred yards. He swam
 quartering upstream, but still was swept downward rather faster than he
 had expected. However, he reached the shore finally, and drifted along
 till he found a low place and drew himself out. He put his hand on his
 jacket pocket, found his piece of bark safe, and then struck through
 the woods, following the shore, with streaming garments. Shortly before
--**--**--
 Mrs. Harper gave a sobbing good-night and turned to go. Then with a
 mutual impulse the two bereaved women flung themselves into each
 other's arms and had a good, consoling cry, and then parted. Aunt Polly
 was tender far beyond her wont, in her good-night to Sid and Mary. Sid
 snuffled a bit and Mary went off crying with all her heart.
 
 Aunt Polly knelt down and prayed for Tom so touchingly, so
 appealingly, and with such measureless love in her words and her old
 trembling voice, that he was weltering in tears again, long before she
 was through.
 
 He had to keep still long after she went to bed, for she kept making
 broken-hearted ejaculations from time to time, tossing unrestfully, and
 turning over. But at last she was still, only moaning a little in her
 sleep. Now the boy stole out, rose gradually by the bedside, shaded the
 candle-light with his hand, and stood regarding her. His heart was full
 of pity for her. He took out his sycamore scroll and placed it by the
 candle. But something occurred to him, and he lingered considering. His
 face lighted with a happy solution of his thought; he put the bark
 hastily in his pocket. Then he bent over and kissed the faded lips, and
 straightway made his stealthy exit, latching the door behind him.
 
 He threaded his way back to the ferry landing, found nobody at large
 there, and walked boldly on board the boat, for he knew she was
 tenantless except that there was a watchman, who always turned in and
 slept like a graven image. He untied the skiff at the stern, slipped
 into it, and was soon rowing cautiously upstream. When he had pulled a
 mile above the village, he started quartering across and bent himself
--**--**--
 ominous silence. Presently, without a parting word, Joe began to wade
 off toward the Illinois shore. Tom's heart began to sink. He glanced at
 Huck. Huck could not bear the look, and dropped his eyes. Then he said:
 
 "I want to go, too, Tom. It was getting so lonesome anyway, and now
 it'll be worse. Let's us go, too, Tom."
 
 "I won't! You can all go, if you want to. I mean to stay."
 
 "Tom, I better go."
 
 "Well, go 'long--who's hendering you."
 
 Huck began to pick up his scattered clothes. He said:
 
 "Tom, I wisht you'd come, too. Now you think it over. We'll wait for
 you when we get to shore."
 
 "Well, you'll wait a blame long time, that's all."
 
 Huck started sorrowfully away, and Tom stood looking after him, with a
 strong desire tugging at his heart to yield his pride and go along too.
 He hoped the boys would stop, but they still waded slowly on. It
 suddenly dawned on Tom that it was become very lonely and still. He
 made one final struggle with his pride, and then darted after his
 comrades, yelling:
 
 "Wait! Wait! I want to tell you something!"
 
 They presently stopped and turned around. When he got to where they
 were, he began unfolding his secret, and they listened moodily till at
 last they saw the "point" he was driving at, and then they set up a
 war-whoop of applause and said it was "splendid!" and said if he had
 told them at first, they wouldn't have started away. He made a plausible
 excuse; but his real reason had been the fear that not even the secret
 would keep them with him any very great length of time, and so he had
 meant to hold it in reserve as a last seduction.
--**--**--
 
 "Oh, I reckon not! I'll just BET they will!"
 
 So the talk ran on. But presently it began to flag a trifle, and grow
 disjointed. The silences widened; the expectoration marvellously
 increased. Every pore inside the boys' cheeks became a spouting
 fountain; they could scarcely bail out the cellars under their tongues
 fast enough to prevent an inundation; little overflowings down their
 throats occurred in spite of all they could do, and sudden retchings
 followed every time. Both boys were looking very pale and miserable,
 now. Joe's pipe dropped from his nerveless fingers. Tom's followed.
 Both fountains were going furiously and both pumps bailing with might
 and main. Joe said feebly:
 
 "I've lost my knife. I reckon I better go and find it."
 
 Tom said, with quivering lips and halting utterance:
 
 "I'll help you. You go over that way and I'll hunt around by the
 spring. No, you needn't come, Huck--we can find it."
 
 So Huck sat down again, and waited an hour. Then he found it lonesome,
 and went to find his comrades. They were wide apart in the woods, both
 very pale, both fast asleep. But something informed him that if they
 had had any trouble they had got rid of it.
 
 They were not talkative at supper that night. They had a humble look,
 and when Huck prepared his pipe after the meal and was going to prepare
 theirs, they said no, they were not feeling very well--something they
 ate at dinner had disagreed with them.
 
 About midnight Joe awoke, and called the boys. There was a brooding
 oppressiveness in the air that seemed to bode something. The boys
 huddled themselves together and sought the friendly companionship of
 the fire, though the dull dead heat of the breathless atmosphere was
 stifling. They sat still, intent and waiting. The solemn hush
--**--**--
 By and by they separated into three hostile tribes, and darted upon
 each other from ambush with dreadful war-whoops, and killed and scalped
 each other by thousands. It was a gory day. Consequently it was an
 extremely satisfactory one.
 
 They assembled in camp toward supper-time, hungry and happy; but now a
 difficulty arose--hostile Indians could not break the bread of
 hospitality together without first making peace, and this was a simple
 impossibility without smoking a pipe of peace. There was no other
 process that ever they had heard of. Two of the savages almost wished
 they had remained pirates. However, there was no other way; so with
 such show of cheerfulness as they could muster they called for the pipe
 and took their whiff as it passed, in due form.
 
 And behold, they were glad they had gone into savagery, for they had
 gained something; they found that they could now smoke a little without
 having to go and hunt for a lost knife; they did not get sick enough to
 be seriously uncomfortable. They were not likely to fool away this high
 promise for lack of effort. No, they practised cautiously, after
 supper, with right fair success, and so they spent a jubilant evening.
 They were prouder and happier in their new acquirement than they would
 have been in the scalping and skinning of the Six Nations. We will
 leave them to smoke and chatter and brag, since we have no further use
 for them at present.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVII
 
 BUT there was no hilarity in the little town that same tranquil
 Saturday afternoon. The Harpers, and Aunt Polly's family, were being
 put into mourning, with great grief and many tears. An unusual quiet
 possessed the village, although it was ordinarily quiet enough, in all
 conscience. The villagers conducted their concerns with an absent air,
--**--**--
 And they did. Old Hundred swelled up with a triumphant burst, and
 while it shook the rafters Tom Sawyer the Pirate looked around upon the
 envying juveniles about him and confessed in his heart that this was
 the proudest moment of his life.
 
 As the "sold" congregation trooped out they said they would almost be
 willing to be made ridiculous again to hear Old Hundred sung like that
 once more.
 
 Tom got more cuffs and kisses that day--according to Aunt Polly's
 varying moods--than he had earned before in a year; and he hardly knew
 which expressed the most gratefulness to God and affection for himself.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 THAT was Tom's great secret--the scheme to return home with his
 brother pirates and attend their own funerals. They had paddled over to
 the Missouri shore on a log, at dusk on Saturday, landing five or six
 miles below the village; they had slept in the woods at the edge of the
 town till nearly daylight, and had then crept through back lanes and
 alleys and finished their sleep in the gallery of the church among a
 chaos of invalided benches.
 
 At breakfast, Monday morning, Aunt Polly and Mary were very loving to
 Tom, and very attentive to his wants. There was an unusual amount of
 talk. In the course of it Aunt Polly said:
 
 "Well, I don't say it wasn't a fine joke, Tom, to keep everybody
 suffering 'most a week so you boys had a good time, but it is a pity
 you could be so hard-hearted as to let me suffer so. If you could come
 over on a log to go to your funeral, you could have come over and give
 me a hint some way that you warn't dead, but only run off."
 
 "Yes, you could have done that, Tom," said Mary; "and I believe you
--**--**--
 
 "He said--I THINK he said he hoped I was better off where I was gone
 to, but if I'd been better sometimes--"
 
 "THERE, d'you hear that! It was his very words!"
 
 "And you shut him up sharp."
 
 "I lay I did! There must 'a' been an angel there. There WAS an angel
 there, somewheres!"
 
 "And Mrs. Harper told about Joe scaring her with a firecracker, and
 you told about Peter and the Painkiller--"
 
 "Just as true as I live!"
 
 "And then there was a whole lot of talk 'bout dragging the river for
 us, and 'bout having the funeral Sunday, and then you and old Miss
 Harper hugged and cried, and she went."
 
 "It happened just so! It happened just so, as sure as I'm a-sitting in
 these very tracks. Tom, you couldn't told it more like if you'd 'a'
 seen it! And then what? Go on, Tom!"
 
 "Then I thought you prayed for me--and I could see you and hear every
 word you said. And you went to bed, and I was so sorry that I took and
 wrote on a piece of sycamore bark, 'We ain't dead--we are only off
 being pirates,' and put it on the table by the candle; and then you
 looked so good, laying there asleep, that I thought I went and leaned
 over and kissed you on the lips."
 
 "Did you, Tom, DID you! I just forgive you everything for that!" And
 she seized the boy in a crushing embrace that made him feel like the
 guiltiest of villains.
 
 "It was very kind, even though it was only a--dream," Sid soliloquized
 just audibly.
 
 "Shut up, Sid! A body does just the same in a dream as he'd do if he
 was awake. Here's a big Milum apple I've been saving for you, Tom, if
--**--**--
 fight, too, and was glad to see him suffer as she had suffered.
 
 Amy's happy prattle became intolerable. Tom hinted at things he had to
 attend to; things that must be done; and time was fleeting. But in
 vain--the girl chirped on. Tom thought, "Oh, hang her, ain't I ever
 going to get rid of her?" At last he must be attending to those
 things--and she said artlessly that she would be "around" when school
 let out. And he hastened away, hating her for it.
 
 "Any other boy!" Tom thought, grating his teeth. "Any boy in the whole
 town but that Saint Louis smarty that thinks he dresses so fine and is
 aristocracy! Oh, all right, I licked you the first day you ever saw
 this town, mister, and I'll lick you again! You just wait till I catch
 you out! I'll just take and--"
 
 And he went through the motions of thrashing an imaginary boy
 --pummelling the air, and kicking and gouging. "Oh, you do, do you? You
 holler 'nough, do you? Now, then, let that learn you!" And so the
 imaginary flogging was finished to his satisfaction.
 
 Tom fled home at noon. His conscience could not endure any more of
 Amy's grateful happiness, and his jealousy could bear no more of the
 other distress. Becky resumed her picture inspections with Alfred, but
 as the minutes dragged along and no Tom came to suffer, her triumph
 began to cloud and she lost interest; gravity and absent-mindedness
 followed, and then melancholy; two or three times she pricked up her
 ear at a footstep, but it was a false hope; no Tom came. At last she
 grew entirely miserable and wished she hadn't carried it so far. When
 poor Alfred, seeing that he was losing her, he did not know how, kept
--**--**--
 more she ventured, and this time she fortified herself with the
 thought: "It's a good lie--it's a good lie--I won't let it grieve me."
 So she sought the jacket pocket. A moment later she was reading Tom's
 piece of bark through flowing tears and saying: "I could forgive the
 boy, now, if he'd committed a million sins!"
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX
 
 THERE was something about Aunt Polly's manner, when she kissed Tom,
 that swept away his low spirits and made him lighthearted and happy
 again. He started to school and had the luck of coming upon Becky
 Thatcher at the head of Meadow Lane. His mood always determined his
 manner. Without a moment's hesitation he ran to her and said:
 
 "I acted mighty mean to-day, Becky, and I'm so sorry. I won't ever,
 ever do that way again, as long as ever I live--please make up, won't
 you?"
 
 The girl stopped and looked him scornfully in the face:
 
 "I'll thank you to keep yourself TO yourself, Mr. Thomas Sawyer. I'll
 never speak to you again."
 
 She tossed her head and passed on. Tom was so stunned that he had not
 even presence of mind enough to say "Who cares, Miss Smarty?" until the
 right time to say it had gone by. So he said nothing. But he was in a
 fine rage, nevertheless. He moped into the schoolyard wishing she were
 a boy, and imagining how he would trounce her if she were. He presently
 encountered her and delivered a stinging remark as he passed. She
 hurled one in return, and the angry breach was complete. It seemed to
 Becky, in her hot resentment, that she could hardly wait for school to
 "take in," she was so impatient to see Tom flogged for the injured
 spelling-book. If she had had any lingering notion of exposing Alfred
--**--**--
 The same sign.
 
 "Susan Harper, did you do this?"
 
 Another negative. The next girl was Becky Thatcher. Tom was trembling
 from head to foot with excitement and a sense of the hopelessness of
 the situation.
 
 "Rebecca Thatcher" [Tom glanced at her face--it was white with terror]
 --"did you tear--no, look me in the face" [her hands rose in appeal]
 --"did you tear this book?"
 
 A thought shot like lightning through Tom's brain. He sprang to his
 feet and shouted--"I done it!"
 
 The school stared in perplexity at this incredible folly. Tom stood a
 moment, to gather his dismembered faculties; and when he stepped
 forward to go to his punishment the surprise, the gratitude, the
 adoration that shone upon him out of poor Becky's eyes seemed pay
 enough for a hundred floggings. Inspired by the splendor of his own
 act, he took without an outcry the most merciless flaying that even Mr.
 Dobbins had ever administered; and also received with indifference the
 added cruelty of a command to remain two hours after school should be
 dismissed--for he knew who would wait for him outside till his
 captivity was done, and not count the tedious time as loss, either.
 
 Tom went to bed that night planning vengeance against Alfred Temple;
 for with shame and repentance Becky had told him all, not forgetting
 her own treachery; but even the longing for vengeance had to give way,
 soon, to pleasanter musings, and he fell asleep at last with Becky's
 latest words lingering dreamily in his ear--
 
 "Tom, how COULD you be so noble!"
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI
 
 VACATION was approaching. The schoolmaster, always severe, grew
 severer and more exacting than ever, for he wanted the school to make a
 good showing on "Examination" day. His rod and his ferule were seldom
 idle now--at least among the smaller pupils. Only the biggest boys, and
--**--**--
 endure an extract from it:
 
   "In the common walks of life, with what delightful
    emotions does the youthful mind look forward to some
    anticipated scene of festivity! Imagination is busy
    sketching rose-tinted pictures of joy. In fancy, the
    voluptuous votary of fashion sees herself amid the
    festive throng, 'the observed of all observers.' Her
    graceful form, arrayed in snowy robes, is whirling
    through the mazes of the joyous dance; her eye is
    brightest, her step is lightest in the gay assembly.
 
   "In such delicious fancies time quickly glides by,
    and the welcome hour arrives for her entrance into
    the Elysian world, of which she has had such bright
    dreams. How fairy-like does everything appear to
    her enchanted vision! Each new scene is more charming
    than the last. But after a while she finds that
    beneath this goodly exterior, all is vanity, the
    flattery which once charmed her soul, now grates
    harshly upon her ear; the ball-room has lost its
    charms; and with wasted health and imbittered heart,
    she turns away with the conviction that earthly
    pleasures cannot satisfy the longings of the soul!"
 
 And so forth and so on. There was a buzz of gratification from time to
 time during the reading, accompanied by whispered ejaculations of "How
 sweet!" "How eloquent!" "So true!" etc., and after the thing had closed
 with a peculiarly afflicting sermon the applause was enthusiastic.
 
 Then arose a slim, melancholy girl, whose face had the "interesting"
 paleness that comes of pills and indigestion, and read a "poem." Two
 stanzas of it will do:
 
    "A MISSOURI MAIDEN'S FAREWELL TO ALABAMA
 
    "Alabama, good-bye! I love thee well!
       But yet for a while do I leave thee now!
     Sad, yes, sad thoughts of thee my heart doth swell,
       And burning recollections throng my brow!
     For I have wandered through thy flowery woods;
--**--**--
 TOM joined the new order of Cadets of Temperance, being attracted by
 the showy character of their "regalia." He promised to abstain from
 smoking, chewing, and profanity as long as he remained a member. Now he
 found out a new thing--namely, that to promise not to do a thing is the
 surest way in the world to make a body want to go and do that very
 thing. Tom soon found himself tormented with a desire to drink and
 swear; the desire grew to be so intense that nothing but the hope of a
 chance to display himself in his red sash kept him from withdrawing
 from the order. Fourth of July was coming; but he soon gave that up
 --gave it up before he had worn his shackles over forty-eight hours--and
 fixed his hopes upon old Judge Frazer, justice of the peace, who was
 apparently on his deathbed and would have a big public funeral, since
 he was so high an official. During three days Tom was deeply concerned
 about the Judge's condition and hungry for news of it. Sometimes his
 hopes ran high--so high that he would venture to get out his regalia
 and practise before the looking-glass. But the Judge had a most
 discouraging way of fluctuating. At last he was pronounced upon the
 mend--and then convalescent. Tom was disgusted; and felt a sense of
 injury, too. He handed in his resignation at once--and that night the
 Judge suffered a relapse and died. Tom resolved that he would never
 trust a man like that again.
 
 The funeral was a fine thing. The Cadets paraded in a style calculated
 to kill the late member with envy. Tom was a free boy again, however
 --there was something in that. He could drink and swear, now--but found
 to his surprise that he did not want to. The simple fact that he could,
--**--**--
 
 "Get me to tell? Why, if I wanted that half-breed devil to drownd me
 they could get me to tell. They ain't no different way."
 
 "Well, that's all right, then. I reckon we're safe as long as we keep
 mum. But let's swear again, anyway. It's more surer."
 
 "I'm agreed."
 
 So they swore again with dread solemnities.
 
 "What is the talk around, Huck? I've heard a power of it."
 
 "Talk? Well, it's just Muff Potter, Muff Potter, Muff Potter all the
 time. It keeps me in a sweat, constant, so's I want to hide som'ers."
 
 "That's just the same way they go on round me. I reckon he's a goner.
 Don't you feel sorry for him, sometimes?"
 
 "Most always--most always. He ain't no account; but then he hain't
 ever done anything to hurt anybody. Just fishes a little, to get money
 to get drunk on--and loafs around considerable; but lord, we all do
 that--leastways most of us--preachers and such like. But he's kind of
 good--he give me half a fish, once, when there warn't enough for two;
 and lots of times he's kind of stood by me when I was out of luck."
 
 "Well, he's mended kites for me, Huck, and knitted hooks on to my
 line. I wish we could get him out of there."
 
 "My! we couldn't get him out, Tom. And besides, 'twouldn't do any
 good; they'd ketch him again."
 
 "Yes--so they would. But I hate to hear 'em abuse him so like the
 dickens when he never done--that."
 
 "I do too, Tom. Lord, I hear 'em say he's the bloodiest looking
 villain in this country, and they wonder he wasn't ever hung before."
 
 "Yes, they talk like that, all the time. I've heard 'em say that if he
 was to get free they'd lynch him."
--**--**--
 
 Every detail of the damaging circumstances that occurred in the
 graveyard upon that morning which all present remembered so well was
 brought out by credible witnesses, but none of them were cross-examined
 by Potter's lawyer. The perplexity and dissatisfaction of the house
 expressed itself in murmurs and provoked a reproof from the bench.
 Counsel for the prosecution now said:
 
 "By the oaths of citizens whose simple word is above suspicion, we
 have fastened this awful crime, beyond all possibility of question,
 upon the unhappy prisoner at the bar. We rest our case here."
 
 A groan escaped from poor Potter, and he put his face in his hands and
 rocked his body softly to and fro, while a painful silence reigned in
 the court-room. Many men were moved, and many women's compassion
 testified itself in tears. Counsel for the defence rose and said:
 
 "Your honor, in our remarks at the opening of this trial, we
 foreshadowed our purpose to prove that our client did this fearful deed
 while under the influence of a blind and irresponsible delirium
 produced by drink. We have changed our mind. We shall not offer that
 plea." [Then to the clerk:] "Call Thomas Sawyer!"
 
 A puzzled amazement awoke in every face in the house, not even
 excepting Potter's. Every eye fastened itself with wondering interest
 upon Tom as he rose and took his place upon the stand. The boy looked
 wild enough, for he was badly scared. The oath was administered.
 
 "Thomas Sawyer, where were you on the seventeenth of June, about the
 hour of midnight?"
 
 Tom glanced at Injun Joe's iron face and his tongue failed him. The
 audience listened breathless, but the words refused to come. After a
 few moments, however, the boy got a little of his strength back, and
 managed to put enough of it into his voice to make part of the house
--**--**--
 Tom's days were days of splendor and exultation to him, but his nights
 were seasons of horror. Injun Joe infested all his dreams, and always
 with doom in his eye. Hardly any temptation could persuade the boy to
 stir abroad after nightfall. Poor Huck was in the same state of
 wretchedness and terror, for Tom had told the whole story to the lawyer
 the night before the great day of the trial, and Huck was sore afraid
 that his share in the business might leak out, yet, notwithstanding
 Injun Joe's flight had saved him the suffering of testifying in court.
 The poor fellow had got the attorney to promise secrecy, but what of
 that? Since Tom's harassed conscience had managed to drive him to the
 lawyer's house by night and wring a dread tale from lips that had been
 sealed with the dismalest and most formidable of oaths, Huck's
 confidence in the human race was well-nigh obliterated.
 
 Daily Muff Potter's gratitude made Tom glad he had spoken; but nightly
 he wished he had sealed up his tongue.
 
 Half the time Tom was afraid Injun Joe would never be captured; the
 other half he was afraid he would be. He felt sure he never could draw
 a safe breath again until that man was dead and he had seen the corpse.
 
 Rewards had been offered, the country had been scoured, but no Injun
 Joe was found. One of those omniscient and awe-inspiring marvels, a
 detective, came up from St. Louis, moused around, shook his head,
 looked wise, and made that sort of astounding success which members of
 that craft usually achieve. That is to say, he "found a clew." But you
 can't hang a "clew" for murder, and so after that detective had got
 through and gone home, Tom felt just as insecure as he was before.
--**--**--
 "How you talk! No!"
 
 "Then how you going to know which one to go for?"
 
 "Go for all of 'em!"
 
 "Why, Tom, it'll take all summer."
 
 "Well, what of that? Suppose you find a brass pot with a hundred
 dollars in it, all rusty and gray, or rotten chest full of di'monds.
 How's that?"
 
 Huck's eyes glowed.
 
 "That's bully. Plenty bully enough for me. Just you gimme the hundred
 dollars and I don't want no di'monds."
 
 "All right. But I bet you I ain't going to throw off on di'monds. Some
 of 'em's worth twenty dollars apiece--there ain't any, hardly, but's
 worth six bits or a dollar."
 
 "No! Is that so?"
 
 "Cert'nly--anybody'll tell you so. Hain't you ever seen one, Huck?"
 
 "Not as I remember."
 
 "Oh, kings have slathers of them."
 
 "Well, I don' know no kings, Tom."
 
 "I reckon you don't. But if you was to go to Europe you'd see a raft
 of 'em hopping around."
 
 "Do they hop?"
 
 "Hop?--your granny! No!"
 
 "Well, what did you say they did, for?"
 
 "Shucks, I only meant you'd SEE 'em--not hopping, of course--what do
 they want to hop for?--but I mean you'd just see 'em--scattered around,
 you know, in a kind of a general way. Like that old humpbacked Richard."
 
 "Richard? What's his other name?"
 
 "He didn't have any other name. Kings don't have any but a given name."
 
 "No?"
 
 "But they don't."
 
 "Well, if they like it, Tom, all right; but I don't want to be a king
 and have only just a given name, like a nigger. But say--where you
 going to dig first?"
 
 "Well, I don't know. S'pose we tackle that old dead-limb tree on the
 hill t'other side of Still-House branch?"
 
 "I'm agreed."
 
 So they got a crippled pick and a shovel, and set out on their
--**--**--
 "I know it, but then there's another thing."
 
 "What's that?".
 
 "Why, we only guessed at the time. Like enough it was too late or too
 early."
 
 Huck dropped his shovel.
 
 "That's it," said he. "That's the very trouble. We got to give this
 one up. We can't ever tell the right time, and besides this kind of
 thing's too awful, here this time of night with witches and ghosts
 a-fluttering around so. I feel as if something's behind me all the time;
 and I'm afeard to turn around, becuz maybe there's others in front
 a-waiting for a chance. I been creeping all over, ever since I got here."
 
 "Well, I've been pretty much so, too, Huck. They most always put in a
 dead man when they bury a treasure under a tree, to look out for it."
 
 "Lordy!"
 
 "Yes, they do. I've always heard that."
 
 "Tom, I don't like to fool around much where there's dead people. A
 body's bound to get into trouble with 'em, sure."
 
 "I don't like to stir 'em up, either. S'pose this one here was to
 stick his skull out and say something!"
 
 "Don't Tom! It's awful."
 
 "Well, it just is. Huck, I don't feel comfortable a bit."
 
 "Say, Tom, let's give this place up, and try somewheres else."
 
 "All right, I reckon we better."
 
 "What'll it be?"
 
 Tom considered awhile; and then said:
 
 "The ha'nted house. That's it!"
 
 "Blame it, I don't like ha'nted houses, Tom. Why, they're a dern sight
 worse'n dead people. Dead people might talk, maybe, but they don't come
 sliding around in a shroud, when you ain't noticing, and peep over your
 shoulder all of a sudden and grit their teeth, the way a ghost does. I
 couldn't stand such a thing as that, Tom--nobody could."
 
 "Yes, but, Huck, ghosts don't travel around only at night. They won't
--**--**--
 time, however, so the boys shouldered their tools and went away feeling
 that they had not trifled with fortune, but had fulfilled all the
 requirements that belong to the business of treasure-hunting.
 
 When they reached the haunted house there was something so weird and
 grisly about the dead silence that reigned there under the baking sun,
 and something so depressing about the loneliness and desolation of the
 place, that they were afraid, for a moment, to venture in. Then they
 crept to the door and took a trembling peep. They saw a weed-grown,
 floorless room, unplastered, an ancient fireplace, vacant windows, a
 ruinous staircase; and here, there, and everywhere hung ragged and
 abandoned cobwebs. They presently entered, softly, with quickened
 pulses, talking in whispers, ears alert to catch the slightest sound,
 and muscles tense and ready for instant retreat.
 
 In a little while familiarity modified their fears and they gave the
 place a critical and interested examination, rather admiring their own
 boldness, and wondering at it, too. Next they wanted to look up-stairs.
 This was something like cutting off retreat, but they got to daring
 each other, and of course there could be but one result--they threw
 their tools into a corner and made the ascent. Up there were the same
 signs of decay. In one corner they found a closet that promised
 mystery, but the promise was a fraud--there was nothing in it. Their
 courage was up now and well in hand. They were about to go down and
 begin work when--
 
 "Sh!" said Tom.
 
 "What is it?" whispered Huck, blanching with fright.
 
 "Sh!... There!... Hear it?"
 
 "Yes!... Oh, my! Let's run!"
 
 "Keep still! Don't you budge! They're coming right toward the door."
 
 The boys stretched themselves upon the floor with their eyes to
 knot-holes in the planking, and lay waiting, in a misery of fear.
--**--**--
 take it away till we start south. Six hundred and fifty in silver's
 something to carry."
 
 "Well--all right--it won't matter to come here once more."
 
 "No--but I'd say come in the night as we used to do--it's better."
 
 "Yes: but look here; it may be a good while before I get the right
 chance at that job; accidents might happen; 'tain't in such a very good
 place; we'll just regularly bury it--and bury it deep."
 
 "Good idea," said the comrade, who walked across the room, knelt down,
 raised one of the rearward hearth-stones and took out a bag that
 jingled pleasantly. He subtracted from it twenty or thirty dollars for
 himself and as much for Injun Joe, and passed the bag to the latter,
 who was on his knees in the corner, now, digging with his bowie-knife.
 
 The boys forgot all their fears, all their miseries in an instant.
 With gloating eyes they watched every movement. Luck!--the splendor of
 it was beyond all imagination! Six hundred dollars was money enough to
 make half a dozen boys rich! Here was treasure-hunting under the
 happiest auspices--there would not be any bothersome uncertainty as to
 where to dig. They nudged each other every moment--eloquent nudges and
 easily understood, for they simply meant--"Oh, but ain't you glad NOW
 we're here!"
 
 Joe's knife struck upon something.
 
 "Hello!" said he.
 
 "What is it?" said his comrade.
 
 "Half-rotten plank--no, it's a box, I believe. Here--bear a hand and
 we'll see what it's here for. Never mind, I've broke a hole."
 
 He reached his hand in and drew it out--
 
 "Man, it's money!"
 
 The two men examined the handful of coins. They were gold. The boys
 above were as excited as themselves, and as delighted.
 
 Joe's comrade said:
 
 "We'll make quick work of this. There's an old rusty pick over amongst
--**--**--
 But the incidents of his adventure grew sensibly sharper and clearer
 under the attrition of thinking them over, and so he presently found
 himself leaning to the impression that the thing might not have been a
 dream, after all. This uncertainty must be swept away. He would snatch
 a hurried breakfast and go and find Huck. Huck was sitting on the
 gunwale of a flatboat, listlessly dangling his feet in the water and
 looking very melancholy. Tom concluded to let Huck lead up to the
 subject. If he did not do it, then the adventure would be proved to
 have been only a dream.
 
 "Hello, Huck!"
 
 "Hello, yourself."
 
 Silence, for a minute.
 
 "Tom, if we'd 'a' left the blame tools at the dead tree, we'd 'a' got
 the money. Oh, ain't it awful!"
 
 "'Tain't a dream, then, 'tain't a dream! Somehow I most wish it was.
 Dog'd if I don't, Huck."
 
 "What ain't a dream?"
 
 "Oh, that thing yesterday. I been half thinking it was."
 
 "Dream! If them stairs hadn't broke down you'd 'a' seen how much dream
 it was! I've had dreams enough all night--with that patch-eyed Spanish
 devil going for me all through 'em--rot him!"
 
 "No, not rot him. FIND him! Track the money!"
 
 "Tom, we'll never find him. A feller don't have only one chance for
 such a pile--and that one's lost. I'd feel mighty shaky if I was to see
 him, anyway."
 
 "Well, so'd I; but I'd like to see him, anyway--and track him out--to
 his Number Two."
 
 "Number Two--yes, that's it. I been thinking 'bout that. But I can't
 make nothing out of it. What do you reckon it is?"
 
 "I dono. It's too deep. Say, Huck--maybe it's the number of a house!"
 
 "Goody!... No, Tom, that ain't it. If it is, it ain't in this
--**--**--
 closer to the alley; fearing all sorts of dreadful things, and
 momentarily expecting some catastrophe to happen that would take away
 his breath. There was not much to take away, for he seemed only able to
 inhale it by thimblefuls, and his heart would soon wear itself out, the
 way it was beating. Suddenly there was a flash of light and Tom came
 tearing by him: "Run!" said he; "run, for your life!"
 
 He needn't have repeated it; once was enough; Huck was making thirty
 or forty miles an hour before the repetition was uttered. The boys
 never stopped till they reached the shed of a deserted slaughter-house
 at the lower end of the village. Just as they got within its shelter
 the storm burst and the rain poured down. As soon as Tom got his breath
 he said:
 
 "Huck, it was awful! I tried two of the keys, just as soft as I could;
 but they seemed to make such a power of racket that I couldn't hardly
 get my breath I was so scared. They wouldn't turn in the lock, either.
 Well, without noticing what I was doing, I took hold of the knob, and
 open comes the door! It warn't locked! I hopped in, and shook off the
 towel, and, GREAT CAESAR'S GHOST!"
 
 "What!--what'd you see, Tom?"
 
 "Huck, I most stepped onto Injun Joe's hand!"
 
 "No!"
 
 "Yes! He was lying there, sound asleep on the floor, with his old
 patch on his eye and his arms spread out."
 
 "Lordy, what did you do? Did he wake up?"
 
 "No, never budged. Drunk, I reckon. I just grabbed that towel and
 started!"
 
 "I'd never 'a' thought of the towel, I bet!"
 
 "Well, I would. My aunt would make me mighty sick if I lost it."
 
 "Say, Tom, did you see that box?"
--**--**--
 have ice-cream! She has it most every day--dead loads of it. And she'll
 be awful glad to have us."
 
 "Oh, that will be fun!"
 
 Then Becky reflected a moment and said:
 
 "But what will mamma say?"
 
 "How'll she ever know?"
 
 The girl turned the idea over in her mind, and said reluctantly:
 
 "I reckon it's wrong--but--"
 
 "But shucks! Your mother won't know, and so what's the harm? All she
 wants is that you'll be safe; and I bet you she'd 'a' said go there if
 she'd 'a' thought of it. I know she would!"
 
 The Widow Douglas' splendid hospitality was a tempting bait. It and
 Tom's persuasions presently carried the day. So it was decided to say
 nothing anybody about the night's programme. Presently it occurred to
 Tom that maybe Huck might come this very night and give the signal. The
 thought took a deal of the spirit out of his anticipations. Still he
 could not bear to give up the fun at Widow Douglas'. And why should he
 give it up, he reasoned--the signal did not come the night before, so
 why should it be any more likely to come to-night? The sure fun of the
 evening outweighed the uncertain treasure; and, boy-like, he determined
 to yield to the stronger inclination and not allow himself to think of
 the box of money another time that day.
 
 Three miles below town the ferryboat stopped at the mouth of a woody
 hollow and tied up. The crowd swarmed ashore and soon the forest
 distances and craggy heights echoed far and near with shoutings and
 laughter. All the different ways of getting hot and tired were gone
 through with, and by-and-by the rovers straggled back to camp fortified
 with responsible appetites, and then the destruction of the good things
 began. After the feast there was a refreshing season of rest and chat
--**--**--
 her to the bed. If she bleeds to death, is that my fault? I'll not cry,
 if she does. My friend, you'll help me in this thing--for MY sake
 --that's why you're here--I mightn't be able alone. If you flinch, I'll
 kill you. Do you understand that? And if I have to kill you, I'll kill
 her--and then I reckon nobody'll ever know much about who done this
 business."
 
 "Well, if it's got to be done, let's get at it. The quicker the
 better--I'm all in a shiver."
 
 "Do it NOW? And company there? Look here--I'll get suspicious of you,
 first thing you know. No--we'll wait till the lights are out--there's
 no hurry."
 
 Huck felt that a silence was going to ensue--a thing still more awful
 than any amount of murderous talk; so he held his breath and stepped
 gingerly back; planted his foot carefully and firmly, after balancing,
 one-legged, in a precarious way and almost toppling over, first on one
 side and then on the other. He took another step back, with the same
 elaboration and the same risks; then another and another, and--a twig
 snapped under his foot! His breath stopped and he listened. There was
 no sound--the stillness was perfect. His gratitude was measureless. Now
 he turned in his tracks, between the walls of sumach bushes--turned
 himself as carefully as if he were a ship--and then stepped quickly but
 cautiously along. When he emerged at the quarry he felt secure, and so
 he picked up his nimble heels and flew. Down, down he sped, till he
 reached the Welshman's. He banged at the door, and presently the heads
 of the old man and his two stalwart sons were thrust from windows.
 
 "What's the row there? Who's banging? What do you want?"
 
 "Let me in--quick! I'll tell everything."
--**--**--
 of doing. That was the way of it last night. I couldn't sleep, and so I
 come along up-street 'bout midnight, a-turning it all over, and when I
 got to that old shackly brick store by the Temperance Tavern, I backed
 up agin the wall to have another think. Well, just then along comes
 these two chaps slipping along close by me, with something under their
 arm, and I reckoned they'd stole it. One was a-smoking, and t'other one
 wanted a light; so they stopped right before me and the cigars lit up
 their faces and I see that the big one was the deaf and dumb Spaniard,
 by his white whiskers and the patch on his eye, and t'other one was a
 rusty, ragged-looking devil."
 
 "Could you see the rags by the light of the cigars?"
 
 This staggered Huck for a moment. Then he said:
 
 "Well, I don't know--but somehow it seems as if I did."
 
 "Then they went on, and you--"
 
 "Follered 'em--yes. That was it. I wanted to see what was up--they
 sneaked along so. I dogged 'em to the widder's stile, and stood in the
 dark and heard the ragged one beg for the widder, and the Spaniard
 swear he'd spile her looks just as I told you and your two--"
 
 "What! The DEAF AND DUMB man said all that!"
 
 Huck had made another terrible mistake! He was trying his best to keep
 the old man from getting the faintest hint of who the Spaniard might
 be, and yet his tongue seemed determined to get him into trouble in
 spite of all he could do. He made several efforts to creep out of his
 scrape, but the old man's eye was upon him and he made blunder after
 blunder. Presently the Welshman said:
 
 "My boy, don't be afraid of me. I wouldn't hurt a hair of your head
--**--**--
 "Joe Harper, have you seen my Tom this morning?"
 
 "No'm."
 
 "When did you see him last?"
 
 Joe tried to remember, but was not sure he could say. The people had
 stopped moving out of church. Whispers passed along, and a boding
 uneasiness took possession of every countenance. Children were
 anxiously questioned, and young teachers. They all said they had not
 noticed whether Tom and Becky were on board the ferryboat on the
 homeward trip; it was dark; no one thought of inquiring if any one was
 missing. One young man finally blurted out his fear that they were
 still in the cave! Mrs. Thatcher swooned away. Aunt Polly fell to
 crying and wringing her hands.
 
 The alarm swept from lip to lip, from group to group, from street to
 street, and within five minutes the bells were wildly clanging and the
 whole town was up! The Cardiff Hill episode sank into instant
 insignificance, the burglars were forgotten, horses were saddled,
 skiffs were manned, the ferryboat ordered out, and before the horror
 was half an hour old, two hundred men were pouring down highroad and
 river toward the cave.
 
 All the long afternoon the village seemed empty and dead. Many women
 visited Aunt Polly and Mrs. Thatcher and tried to comfort them. They
 cried with them, too, and that was still better than words. All the
 tedious night the town waited for news; but when the morning dawned at
 last, all the word that came was, "Send more candles--and send food."
 Mrs. Thatcher was almost crazed; and Aunt Polly, also. Judge Thatcher
 sent messages of hope and encouragement from the cave, but they
 conveyed no real cheer.
 
 The old Welshman came home toward daylight, spattered with
 candle-grease, smeared with clay, and almost worn out. He found Huck
 still in the bed that had been provided for him, and delirious with
--**--**--
 glorious shout would burst forth and a score of men go trooping down the
 echoing aisle--and then a sickening disappointment always followed; the
 children were not there; it was only a searcher's light.
 
 Three dreadful days and nights dragged their tedious hours along, and
 the village sank into a hopeless stupor. No one had heart for anything.
 The accidental discovery, just made, that the proprietor of the
 Temperance Tavern kept liquor on his premises, scarcely fluttered the
 public pulse, tremendous as the fact was. In a lucid interval, Huck
 feebly led up to the subject of taverns, and finally asked--dimly
 dreading the worst--if anything had been discovered at the Temperance
 Tavern since he had been ill.
 
 "Yes," said the widow.
 
 Huck started up in bed, wild-eyed:
 
 "What? What was it?"
 
 "Liquor!--and the place has been shut up. Lie down, child--what a turn
 you did give me!"
 
 "Only tell me just one thing--only just one--please! Was it Tom Sawyer
 that found it?"
 
 The widow burst into tears. "Hush, hush, child, hush! I've told you
 before, you must NOT talk. You are very, very sick!"
 
 Then nothing but liquor had been found; there would have been a great
 powwow if it had been the gold. So the treasure was gone forever--gone
 forever! But what could she be crying about? Curious that she should
 cry.
 
 These thoughts worked their dim way through Huck's mind, and under the
 weariness they gave him he fell asleep. The widow said to herself:
 
 "There--he's asleep, poor wreck. Tom Sawyer find it! Pity but somebody
 could find Tom Sawyer! Ah, there ain't many left, now, that's got hope
 enough, or strength enough, either, to go on searching."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXI
 
 NOW to return to Tom and Becky's share in the picnic. They tripped
 along the murky aisles with the rest of the company, visiting the
--**--**--
 She sank to the ground and burst into such a frenzy of crying that Tom
 was appalled with the idea that she might die, or lose her reason. He
 sat down by her and put his arms around her; she buried her face in his
 bosom, she clung to him, she poured out her terrors, her unavailing
 regrets, and the far echoes turned them all to jeering laughter. Tom
 begged her to pluck up hope again, and she said she could not. He fell
 to blaming and abusing himself for getting her into this miserable
 situation; this had a better effect. She said she would try to hope
 again, she would get up and follow wherever he might lead if only he
 would not talk like that any more. For he was no more to blame than
 she, she said.
 
 So they moved on again--aimlessly--simply at random--all they could do
 was to move, keep moving. For a little while, hope made a show of
 reviving--not with any reason to back it, but only because it is its
 nature to revive when the spring has not been taken out of it by age
 and familiarity with failure.
 
 By-and-by Tom took Becky's candle and blew it out. This economy meant
 so much! Words were not needed. Becky understood, and her hope died
 again. She knew that Tom had a whole candle and three or four pieces in
 his pockets--yet he must economize.
 
 By-and-by, fatigue began to assert its claims; the children tried to
 pay attention, for it was dreadful to think of sitting down when time
 was grown to be so precious, moving, in some direction, in any
 direction, was at least progress and might bear fruit; but to sit down
 was to invite death and shorten its pursuit.
 
 At last Becky's frail limbs refused to carry her farther. She sat
--**--**--
 got home."
 
 A frightened look in Becky's face brought Tom to his senses and he saw
 that he had made a blunder. Becky was not to have gone home that night!
 The children became silent and thoughtful. In a moment a new burst of
 grief from Becky showed Tom that the thing in his mind had struck hers
 also--that the Sabbath morning might be half spent before Mrs. Thatcher
 discovered that Becky was not at Mrs. Harper's.
 
 The children fastened their eyes upon their bit of candle and watched
 it melt slowly and pitilessly away; saw the half inch of wick stand
 alone at last; saw the feeble flame rise and fall, climb the thin
 column of smoke, linger at its top a moment, and then--the horror of
 utter darkness reigned!
 
 How long afterward it was that Becky came to a slow consciousness that
 she was crying in Tom's arms, neither could tell. All that they knew
 was, that after what seemed a mighty stretch of time, both awoke out of
 a dead stupor of sleep and resumed their miseries once more. Tom said
 it might be Sunday, now--maybe Monday. He tried to get Becky to talk,
 but her sorrows were too oppressive, all her hopes were gone. Tom said
 that they must have been missed long ago, and no doubt the search was
 going on. He would shout and maybe some one would come. He tried it;
 but in the darkness the distant echoes sounded so hideously that he
 tried it no more.
 
 The hours wasted away, and hunger came to torment the captives again.
 A portion of Tom's half of the cake was left; they divided and ate it.
 But they seemed hungrier than before. The poor morsel of food only
 whetted desire.
 
 By-and-by Tom said:
 
 "SH! Did you hear that?"
--**--**--
 
 Three days and nights of toil and hunger in the cave were not to be
 shaken off at once, as Tom and Becky soon discovered. They were
 bedridden all of Wednesday and Thursday, and seemed to grow more and
 more tired and worn, all the time. Tom got about, a little, on
 Thursday, was down-town Friday, and nearly as whole as ever Saturday;
 but Becky did not leave her room until Sunday, and then she looked as
 if she had passed through a wasting illness.
 
 Tom learned of Huck's sickness and went to see him on Friday, but
 could not be admitted to the bedroom; neither could he on Saturday or
 Sunday. He was admitted daily after that, but was warned to keep still
 about his adventure and introduce no exciting topic. The Widow Douglas
 stayed by to see that he obeyed. At home Tom learned of the Cardiff
 Hill event; also that the "ragged man's" body had eventually been found
 in the river near the ferry-landing; he had been drowned while trying
 to escape, perhaps.
 
 About a fortnight after Tom's rescue from the cave, he started off to
 visit Huck, who had grown plenty strong enough, now, to hear exciting
 talk, and Tom had some that would interest him, he thought. Judge
 Thatcher's house was on Tom's way, and he stopped to see Becky. The
 Judge and some friends set Tom to talking, and some one asked him
 ironically if he wouldn't like to go to the cave again. Tom said he
 thought he wouldn't mind it. The Judge said:
 
 "Well, there are others just like you, Tom, I've not the least doubt.
 But we have taken care of that. Nobody will get lost in that cave any
 more."
 
 "Why?"
 
 "Because I had its big door sheathed with boiler iron two weeks ago,
--**--**--
 this flitting human insect's need? and has it another important object
 to accomplish ten thousand years to come? No matter. It is many and
 many a year since the hapless half-breed scooped out the stone to catch
 the priceless drops, but to this day the tourist stares longest at that
 pathetic stone and that slow-dropping water when he comes to see the
 wonders of McDougal's cave. Injun Joe's cup stands first in the list of
 the cavern's marvels; even "Aladdin's Palace" cannot rival it.
 
 Injun Joe was buried near the mouth of the cave; and people flocked
 there in boats and wagons from the towns and from all the farms and
 hamlets for seven miles around; they brought their children, and all
 sorts of provisions, and confessed that they had had almost as
 satisfactory a time at the funeral as they could have had at the
 hanging.
 
 This funeral stopped the further growth of one thing--the petition to
 the governor for Injun Joe's pardon. The petition had been largely
 signed; many tearful and eloquent meetings had been held, and a
 committee of sappy women been appointed to go in deep mourning and wail
 around the governor, and implore him to be a merciful ass and trample
 his duty under foot. Injun Joe was believed to have killed five
 citizens of the village, but what of that? If he had been Satan himself
 there would have been plenty of weaklings ready to scribble their names
 to a pardon-petition, and drip a tear on it from their permanently
 impaired and leaky water-works.
 
 The morning after the funeral Tom took Huck to a private place to have
 an important talk. Huck had learned all about Tom's adventure from the
 Welshman and the Widow Douglas, by this time, but Tom said he reckoned
--**--**--
 in the lead. They toiled their way to the farther end of the tunnel,
 then made their spliced kite-strings fast and moved on. A few steps
 brought them to the spring, and Tom felt a shudder quiver all through
 him. He showed Huck the fragment of candle-wick perched on a lump of
 clay against the wall, and described how he and Becky had watched the
 flame struggle and expire.
 
 The boys began to quiet down to whispers, now, for the stillness and
 gloom of the place oppressed their spirits. They went on, and presently
 entered and followed Tom's other corridor until they reached the
 "jumping-off place." The candles revealed the fact that it was not
 really a precipice, but only a steep clay hill twenty or thirty feet
 high. Tom whispered:
 
 "Now I'll show you something, Huck."
 
 He held his candle aloft and said:
 
 "Look as far around the corner as you can. Do you see that? There--on
 the big rock over yonder--done with candle-smoke."
 
 "Tom, it's a CROSS!"
 
 "NOW where's your Number Two? 'UNDER THE CROSS,' hey? Right yonder's
 where I saw Injun Joe poke up his candle, Huck!"
 
 Huck stared at the mystic sign awhile, and then said with a shaky voice:
 
 "Tom, less git out of here!"
 
 "What! and leave the treasure?"
 
 "Yes--leave it. Injun Joe's ghost is round about there, certain."
 
 "No it ain't, Huck, no it ain't. It would ha'nt the place where he
 died--away out at the mouth of the cave--five mile from here."
 
 "No, Tom, it wouldn't. It would hang round the money. I know the ways
 of ghosts, and so do you."
 
 Tom began to fear that Huck was right. Misgivings gathered in his
 mind. But presently an idea occurred to him--
 
 "Lookyhere, Huck, what fools we're making of ourselves! Injun Joe's
--**--**--
 "Ancient hauberk, date of the sixth century, time of King Arthur
 and the Round Table; said to have belonged to the knight Sir Sagramor
 le Desirous; observe the round hole through the chain-mail in
 the left breast; can't be accounted for; supposed to have been
 done with a bullet since invention of firearms--perhaps maliciously
 by Cromwell's soldiers."
 
 My acquaintance smiled--not a modern smile, but one that must
 have gone out of general use many, many centuries ago--and muttered
 apparently to himself:
 
 "Wit ye well, _I saw it done_."  Then, after a pause, added:
 "I did it myself."
 
 By the time I had recovered from the electric surprise of this
 remark, he was gone.
 
 All that evening I sat by my fire at the Warwick Arms, steeped
 in a dream of the olden time, while the rain beat upon the windows,
 and the wind roared about the eaves and corners.  From time to
 time I dipped into old Sir Thomas Malory's enchanting book, and
 fed at its rich feast of prodigies and adventures, breathed in
 the fragrance of its obsolete names, and dreamed again.  Midnight
 being come at length, I read another tale, for a nightcap--this
 which here follows, to wit:
 
 HOW SIR LAUNCELOT SLEW TWO GIANTS, AND MADE A CASTLE FREE
 
    Anon withal came there upon him two great giants,
    well armed, all save the heads, with two horrible
    clubs in their hands.  Sir Launcelot put his shield
    afore him, and put the stroke away of the one
    giant, and with his sword he clave his head asunder.
    When his fellow saw that, he ran away as he were
    wood [*demented], for fear of the horrible strokes,
    and Sir Launcelot after him with all his might,
    and smote him on the shoulder, and clave him to
    the middle.  Then Sir Launcelot went into the hall,
--**--**--
 
 As I laid the book down there was a knock at the door, and my
 stranger came in.  I gave him a pipe and a chair, and made him
 welcome.  I also comforted him with a hot Scotch whisky; gave him
 another one; then still another--hoping always for his story.
 After a fourth persuader, he drifted into it himself, in a quite
 simple and natural way:
 
 
 
 THE STRANGER'S HISTORY
 
 I am an American.  I was born and reared in Hartford, in the State
 of Connecticut--anyway, just over the river, in the country.  So
 I am a Yankee of the Yankees--and practical; yes, and nearly
 barren of sentiment, I suppose--or poetry, in other words.  My
 father was a blacksmith, my uncle was a horse doctor, and I was
 both, along at first.  Then I went over to the great arms factory
 and learned my real trade; learned all there was to it; learned
 to make everything: guns, revolvers, cannon, boilers, engines, all
 sorts of labor-saving machinery.  Why, I could make anything
 a body wanted--anything in the world, it didn't make any difference
 what; and if there wasn't any quick new-fangled way to make a thing,
 I could invent one--and do it as easy as rolling off a log.  I became
 head superintendent; had a couple of thousand men under me.
 
 Well, a man like that is a man that is full of fight--that goes
 without saying.  With a couple of thousand rough men under one,
 one has plenty of that sort of amusement.  I had, anyway.  At last
 I met my match, and I got my dose.  It was during a misunderstanding
 conducted with crowbars with a fellow we used to call Hercules.
 He laid me out with a crusher alongside the head that made everything
 crack, and seemed to spring every joint in my skull and made it
--**--**--
 "If I could see the head keeper a minute--only just a minute--"
 
 "Prithee do not let me."
 
 "Let you _what_?"
 
 "_Hinder_ me, then, if the word please thee better.  Then he went
 on to say he was an under-cook and could not stop to gossip,
 though he would like it another time; for it would comfort his
 very liver to know where I got my clothes.  As he started away he
 pointed and said yonder was one who was idle enough for my purpose,
 and was seeking me besides, no doubt.  This was an airy slim boy
 in shrimp-colored tights that made him look like a forked carrot,
 the rest of his gear was blue silk and dainty laces and ruffles;
 and he had long yellow curls, and wore a plumed pink satin cap
 tilted complacently over his ear.  By his look, he was good-natured;
 by his gait, he was satisfied with himself.  He was pretty enough
 to frame.  He arrived, looked me over with a smiling and impudent
 curiosity; said he had come for me, and informed me that he was a page.
 
 "Go 'long," I said; "you ain't more than a paragraph."
 
 It was pretty severe, but I was nettled.  However, it never phazed
 him; he didn't appear to know he was hurt.  He began to talk and
 laugh, in happy, thoughtless, boyish fashion, as we walked along,
 and made himself old friends with me at once; asked me all sorts
 of questions about myself and about my clothes, but never waited
 for an answer--always chattered straight ahead, as if he didn't
 know he had asked a question and wasn't expecting any reply, until
 at last he happened to mention that he was born in the beginning
 of the year 513.
 
 It made the cold chills creep over me!  I stopped and said,
--**--**--
 left there on scant commons until my friends ransomed me--unless
 I chanced to rot, first.  I saw that the last chance had the best
 show, but I didn't waste any bother about that; time was too
 precious.  The page said, further, that dinner was about ended
 in the great hall by this time, and that as soon as the sociability
 and the heavy drinking should begin, Sir Kay would have me in and
 exhibit me before King Arthur and his illustrious knights seated at
 the Table Round, and would brag about his exploit in capturing
 me, and would probably exaggerate the facts a little, but it
 wouldn't be good form for me to correct him, and not over safe,
 either; and when I was done being exhibited, then ho for the
 dungeon; but he, Clarence, would find a way to come and see me every
 now and then, and cheer me up, and help me get word to my friends.
 
 Get word to my friends!  I thanked him; I couldn't do less; and
 about this time a lackey came to say I was wanted; so Clarence
 led me in and took me off to one side and sat down by me.
 
 Well, it was a curious kind of spectacle, and interesting. It was
 an immense place, and rather naked--yes, and full of loud contrasts.
 It was very, very lofty; so lofty that the banners depending from
 the arched beams and girders away up there floated in a sort of
 twilight; there was a stone-railed gallery at each end, high up,
 with musicians in the one, and women, clothed in stunning colors,
 in the other.  The floor was of big stone flags laid in black and
 white squares, rather battered by age and use, and needing repair.
 As to ornament, there wasn't any, strictly speaking; though on
--**--**--
 rest of the court resumed their previous industries and entertainments.
 
 As a rule, the speech and behavior of these people were gracious
 and courtly; and I noticed that they were good and serious listeners
 when anybody was telling anything--I mean in a dog-fightless
 interval.  And plainly, too, they were a childlike and innocent lot;
 telling lies of the stateliest pattern with a most gentle and
 winning naivety, and ready and willing to listen to anybody else's
 lie, and believe it, too.  It was hard to associate them with
 anything cruel or dreadful; and yet they dealt in tales of blood
 and suffering with a guileless relish that made me almost forget
 to shudder.
 
 I was not the only prisoner present.  There were twenty or more.
 Poor devils, many of them were maimed, hacked, carved, in a frightful
 way; and their hair, their faces, their clothing, were caked with
 black and stiffened drenchings of blood.  They were suffering
 sharp physical pain, of course; and weariness, and hunger and
 thirst, no doubt; and at least none had given them the comfort
 of a wash, or even the poor charity of a lotion for their wounds;
 yet you never heard them utter a moan or a groan, or saw them show
 any sign of restlessness, or any disposition to complain.  The
 thought was forced upon me: "The rascals--_they_ have served other
 people so in their day; it being their own turn, now, they were
 not expecting any better treatment than this; so their philosophical
 bearing is not an outcome of mental training, intellectual fortitude,
 reasoning; it is mere animal training; they are white Indians."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 KNIGHTS OF THE TABLE ROUND
 
 Mainly the Round Table talk was monologues--narrative accounts
 of the adventures in which these prisoners were captured and their
 friends and backers killed and stripped of their steeds and armor.
--**--**--
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 SIR DINADAN THE HUMORIST
 
 It seemed to me that this quaint lie was most simply and beautifully
 told; but then I had heard it only once, and that makes a difference;
 it was pleasant to the others when it was fresh, no doubt.
 
 Sir Dinadan the Humorist was the first to awake, and he soon roused
 the rest with a practical joke of a sufficiently poor quality.
 He tied some metal mugs to a dog's tail and turned him loose,
 and he tore around and around the place in a frenzy of fright,
 with all the other dogs bellowing after him and battering and
 crashing against everything that came in their way and making
 altogether a chaos of confusion and a most deafening din and
 turmoil; at which every man and woman of the multitude laughed
 till the tears flowed, and some fell out of their chairs and
 wallowed on the floor in ecstasy.  It was just like so many children.
 Sir Dinadan was so proud of his exploit that he could not keep
 from telling over and over again, to weariness, how the immortal
 idea happened to occur to him; and as is the way with humorists
 of his breed, he was still laughing at it after everybody else had
 got through.  He was so set up that he concluded to make a speech
 --of course a humorous speech.  I think I never heard so many old
 played-out jokes strung together in my life.  He was worse than
 the minstrels, worse than the clown in the circus.  It seemed
 peculiarly sad to sit here, thirteen hundred years before I was
 born, and listen again to poor, flat, worm-eaten jokes that had
 given me the dry gripes when I was a boy thirteen hundred years
 afterwards.  It about convinced me that there isn't any such thing
--**--**--
 But Clarence had slumped to his knees before I had half finished,
 and he was like to go out of his mind with fright.
 
 "Oh, beware!  These are awful words!  Any moment these walls
 may crumble upon us if you say such things.  Oh call them back
 before it is too late!"
 
 Now this strange exhibition gave me a good idea and set me to
 thinking.  If everybody about here was so honestly and sincerely
 afraid of Merlin's pretended magic as Clarence was, certainly
 a superior man like me ought to be shrewd enough to contrive
 some way to take advantage of such a state of things.  I went
 on thinking, and worked out a plan. Then I said:
 
 "Get up.  Pull yourself together; look me in the eye.  Do you
 know why I laughed?"
 
 "No--but for our blessed Lady's sake, do it no more."
 
 "Well, I'll tell you why I laughed.  Because I'm a magician myself."
 
 "Thou!"  The boy recoiled a step, and caught his breath, for
 the thing hit him rather sudden; but the aspect which he took
 on was very, very respectful.  I took quick note of that; it
 indicated that a humbug didn't need to have a reputation in this
 asylum; people stood ready to take him at his word, without that.
 I resumed.
 
 "I've known Merlin seven hundred years, and he--"
 
 "Seven hun--"
 
 "Don't interrupt me.  He has died and come alive again thirteen
 times, and traveled under a new name every time: Smith, Jones,
 Robinson, Jackson, Peters, Haskins, Merlin--a new alias every
 time he turns up.  I knew him in Egypt three hundred years ago;
 I knew him in India five hundred years ago--he is always blethering
 around in my way, everywhere I go; he makes me tired.  He don't
 amount to shucks, as a magician; knows some of the old common
--**--**--
 my mercury went up to the top of the tube, and my solicitudes
 all vanished.  I was as happy a man as there was in the world.
 I was even impatient for to-morrow to come, I so wanted to gather
 in that great triumph and be the center of all the nation's wonder
 and reverence.  Besides, in a business way it would be the making
 of me; I knew that.
 
 Meantime there was one thing which had got pushed into the background
 of my mind.  That was the half-conviction that when the nature
 of my proposed calamity should be reported to those superstitious
 people, it would have such an effect that they would want to
 compromise.  So, by and by when I heard footsteps coming, that
 thought was recalled to me, and I said to myself, "As sure as
 anything, it's the compromise.  Well, if it is good, all right,
 I will accept; but if it isn't, I mean to stand my ground and play
 my hand for all it is worth."
 
 The door opened, and some men-at-arms appeared.  The leader said:
 
 "The stake is ready. Come!"
 
 The stake!  The strength went out of me, and I almost fell down.
 It is hard to get one's breath at such a time, such lumps come into
 one's throat, and such gaspings; but as soon as I could speak, I said:
 
 "But this is a mistake--the execution is to-morrow."
 
 "Order changed; been set forward a day.  Haste thee!"
 
 I was lost.  There was no help for me.  I was dazed, stupefied;
 I had no command over myself, I only wandered purposely about,
 like one out of his mind; so the soldiers took hold of me, and
 pulled me along with them, out of the cell and along the maze of
 underground corridors, and finally into the fierce glare of daylight
--**--**--
 more distressed.  I now said:
 
 "I have reflected, Sir King.  For a lesson, I will let this darkness
 proceed, and spread night in the world; but whether I blot out
 the sun for good, or restore it, shall rest with you.  These are
 the terms, to wit: You shall remain king over all your dominions,
 and receive all the glories and honors that belong to the kingship;
 but you shall appoint me your perpetual minister and executive,
 and give me for my services one per cent of such actual increase
 of revenue over and above its present amount as I may succeed
 in creating for the state.  If I can't live on that, I sha'n't ask
 anybody to give me a lift.  Is it satisfactory?"
 
 There was a prodigious roar of applause, and out of the midst
 of it the king's voice rose, saying:
 
 "Away with his bonds, and set him free! and do him homage, high
 and low, rich and poor, for he is become the king's right hand,
 is clothed with power and authority, and his seat is upon the highest
 step of the throne!  Now sweep away this creeping night, and bring
 the light and cheer again, that all the world may bless thee."
 
 But I said:
 
 "That a common man should be shamed before the world, is nothing;
 but it were dishonor to the _king_ if any that saw his minister naked
 should not also see him delivered from his shame.  If I might ask
 that my clothes be brought again--"
 
 "They are not meet," the king broke in.  "Fetch raiment of another
 sort; clothe him like a prince!"
 
 My idea worked.  I wanted to keep things as they were till the
 eclipse was total, otherwise they would be trying again to get
 me to dismiss the darkness, and of course I couldn't do it.  Sending
--**--**--
 to get a sight of me.  Of course I was all the talk--all other
 subjects were dropped; even the king became suddenly a person of
 minor interest and notoriety.  Within twenty-four hours the
 delegations began to arrive, and from that time onward for a fortnight
 they kept coming.  The village was crowded, and all the countryside.
 I had to go out a dozen times a day and show myself to these
 reverent and awe-stricken multitudes.  It came to be a great burden,
 as to time and trouble, but of course it was at the same time
 compensatingly agreeable to be so celebrated and such a center
 of homage.  It turned Brer Merlin green with envy and spite, which
 was a great satisfaction to me.  But there was one thing I couldn't
 understand--nobody had asked for an autograph.  I spoke to Clarence
 about it.  By George!  I had to explain to him what it was.  Then
 he said nobody in the country could read or write but a few dozen
 priests.  Land! think of that.
 
 There was another thing that troubled me a little.  Those multitudes
 presently began to agitate for another miracle.  That was natural.
 To be able to carry back to their far homes the boast that they
 had seen the man who could command the sun, riding in the heavens,
 and be obeyed, would make them great in the eyes of their neighbors,
 and envied by them all; but to be able to also say they had seen
 him work a miracle themselves--why, people would come a distance
 to see _them_.  The pressure got to be pretty strong.  There was
 going to be an eclipse of the moon, and I knew the date and hour,
 but it was too far away.  Two years.  I would have given a good
--**--**--
 it, quite.  For it stands to reason that as Joseph's splendid
 financial ingenuities advantaged nobody but the king, the general
 public must have regarded him with a good deal of disfavor, whereas
 I had done my entire public a kindness in sparing the sun, and was
 popular by reason of it.
 
 I was no shadow of a king; I was the substance; the king himself
 was the shadow.  My power was colossal; and it was not a mere
 name, as such things have generally been, it was the genuine
 article.  I stood here, at the very spring and source of the second
 great period of the world's history; and could see the trickling
 stream of that history gather and deepen and broaden, and roll
 its mighty tides down the far centuries; and I could note the
 upspringing of adventurers like myself in the shelter of its long
 array of thrones: De Montforts, Gavestons, Mortimers, Villierses;
 the war-making, campaign-directing wantons of France, and Charles
 the Second's scepter-wielding drabs; but nowhere in the procession
 was my full-sized fellow visible.  I was a Unique; and glad to know
 that that fact could not be dislodged or challenged for thirteen
 centuries and a half, for sure.  Yes, in power I was equal to
 the king.  At the same time there was another power that was
 a trifle stronger than both of us put together.  That was the Church.
 I do not wish to disguise that fact.  I couldn't, if I wanted to.
 But never mind about that, now; it will show up, in its proper
 place, later on.  It didn't cause me any trouble in the beginning
 --at least any of consequence.
 
 Well, it was a curious country, and full of interest.  And the
 people!  They were the quaintest and simplest and trustingest race;
--**--**--
 I not only watched this tournament from day to day, but detailed
 an intelligent priest from my Department of Public Morals and
 Agriculture, and ordered him to report it; for it was my purpose
 by and by, when I should have gotten the people along far enough,
 to start a newspaper.  The first thing you want in a new country,
 is a patent office; then work up your school system; and after that,
 out with your paper.  A newspaper has its faults, and plenty of them,
 but no matter, it's hark from the tomb for a dead nation, and don't
 you forget it.  You can't resurrect a dead nation without it; there
 isn't any way.  So I wanted to sample things, and be finding out
 what sort of reporter-material I might be able to rake together out
 of the sixth century when I should come to need it.
 
 Well, the priest did very well, considering.  He got in all
 the details, and that is a good thing in a local item: you see,
 he had kept books for the undertaker-department of his church
 when he was younger, and there, you know, the money's in the details;
 the more details, the more swag: bearers, mutes, candles, prayers
 --everything counts; and if the bereaved don't buy prayers enough
 you mark up your candles with a forked pencil, and your bill
 shows up all right.  And he had a good knack at getting in the
 complimentary thing here and there about a knight that was likely
 to advertise--no, I mean a knight that had influence; and he also
 had a neat gift of exaggeration, for in his time he had kept door
 for a pious hermit who lived in a sty and worked miracles.
 
 Of course this novice's report lacked whoop and crash and lurid
--**--**--
 
 BEGINNINGS OF CIVILIZATION
 
 The Round Table soon heard of the challenge, and of course it was
 a good deal discussed, for such things interested the boys.
 The king thought I ought now to set forth in quest of adventures,
 so that I might gain renown and be the more worthy to meet
 Sir Sagramor when the several years should have rolled away.
 I excused myself for the present; I said it would take me three
 or four years yet to get things well fixed up and going smoothly;
 then I should be ready; all the chances were that at the end of
 that time Sir Sagramor would still be out grailing, so no valuable
 time would be lost by the postponement; I should then have been
 in office six or seven years, and I believed my system and machinery
 would be so well developed that I could take a holiday without
 its working any harm.
 
 I was pretty well satisfied with what I had already accomplished.
 In various quiet nooks and corners I had the beginnings of all
 sorts of industries under way--nuclei of future vast factories,
 the iron and steel missionaries of my future civilization.  In these
 were gathered together the brightest young minds I could find,
 and I kept agents out raking the country for more, all the time.
 I was training a crowd of ignorant folk into experts--experts
 in every sort of handiwork and scientific calling.  These nurseries
 of mine went smoothly and privately along undisturbed in their
 obscure country retreats, for nobody was allowed to come into their
 precincts without a special permit--for I was afraid of the Church.
 
 I had started a teacher-factory and a lot of Sunday-schools the
 first thing; as a result, I now had an admirable system of graded
 schools in full blast in those places, and also a complete variety
--**--**--
 The people could not have stood it; and, moreover, I should have
 had the Established Roman Catholic Church on my back in a minute.
 
 No, I had been going cautiously all the while.  I had had confidential
 agents trickling through the country some time, whose office was
 to undermine knighthood by imperceptible degrees, and to gnaw
 a little at this and that and the other superstition, and so prepare
 the way gradually for a better order of things.  I was turning on
 my light one-candle-power at a time, and meant to continue to do so.
 
 I had scattered some branch schools secretly about the kingdom,
 and they were doing very well.  I meant to work this racket more
 and more, as time wore on, if nothing occurred to frighten me.
 One of my deepest secrets was my West Point--my military academy.
 I kept that most jealously out of sight; and I did the same with my
 naval academy which I had established at a remote seaport.  Both
 were prospering to my satisfaction.
 
 Clarence was twenty-two now, and was my head executive, my right
 hand.  He was a darling; he was equal to anything; there wasn't
 anything he couldn't turn his hand to.  Of late I had been training
 him for journalism, for the time seemed about right for a start
 in the newspaper line; nothing big, but just a small weekly for
 experimental circulation in my civilization-nurseries.  He took
 to it like a duck; there was an editor concealed in him, sure.
 Already he had doubled himself in one way; he talked sixth century
 and wrote nineteenth.  His journalistic style was climbing,
 steadily; it was already up to the back settlement Alabama mark,
 and couldn't be told from the editorial output of that region
 either by matter or flavor.
--**--**--
 Just as I was ending-up these reflections, Clarence came back.
 I remarked upon the barren result of my efforts with the girl;
 hadn't got hold of a single point that could help me to find
 the castle.  The youth looked a little surprised, or puzzled,
 or something, and intimated that he had been wondering to himself
 what I had wanted to ask the girl all those questions for.
 
 "Why, great guns," I said, "don't I want to find the castle?  And
 how else would I go about it?"
 
 "La, sweet your worship, one may lightly answer that, I ween.
 She will go with thee.  They always do.  She will ride with thee."
 
 "Ride with me?  Nonsense!"
 
 "But of a truth she will.  She will ride with thee.  Thou shalt see."
 
 "What?  She browse around the hills and scour the woods with me
 --alone--and I as good as engaged to be married?  Why, it's scandalous.
 Think how it would look."
 
 My, the dear face that rose before me!  The boy was eager to know
 all about this tender matter.  I swore him to secrecy and then
 whispered her name--"Puss Flanagan."  He looked disappointed,
 and said he didn't remember the countess.  How natural it was for
 the little courtier to give her a rank.  He asked me where she lived.
 
 "In East Har--" I came to myself and stopped, a little confused;
 then I said, "Never mind, now; I'll tell you some time."
 
 And might he see her?  Would I let him see her some day?
 
 It was but a little thing to promise--thirteen hundred years
 or so--and he so eager; so I said Yes.  But I sighed; I couldn't
 help it.  And yet there was no sense in sighing, for she wasn't
 born yet.  But that is the way we are made: we don't reason,
--**--**--
 somebody that has been married on a sudden, or struck by lightning,
 or something like that, and hasn't quite fetched around yet, and
 is sort of numb, and can't just get his bearings.  Then they
 stood up the mast they called a spear, in its socket by my left
 foot, and I gripped it with my hand; lastly they hung my shield
 around my neck, and I was all complete and ready to up anchor
 and get to sea.  Everybody was as good to me as they could be,
 and a maid of honor gave me the stirrup-cup her own self.  There was
 nothing more to do now, but for that damsel to get up behind me on
 a pillion, which she did, and put an arm or so around me to hold on.
 
 And so we started, and everybody gave us a goodbye and waved their
 handkerchiefs or helmets.  And everybody we met, going down the hill
 and through the village was respectful to us, except some shabby
 little boys on the outskirts.  They said:
 
 "Oh, what a guy!"  And hove clods at us.
 
 In my experience boys are the same in all ages.  They don't respect
 anything, they don't care for anything or anybody.  They say
 "Go up, baldhead" to the prophet going his unoffending way in
 the gray of antiquity; they sass me in the holy gloom of the
 Middle Ages; and I had seen them act the same way in Buchanan's
 administration; I remember, because I was there and helped.  The
 prophet had his bears and settled with his boys; and I wanted
 to get down and settle with mine, but it wouldn't answer, because
 I couldn't have got up again.  I hate a country without a derrick.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 SLOW TORTURE
 
 Straight off, we were in the country.  It was most lovely and
--**--**--
 I was obliged to remain in my armor, because I could not get it off
 by myself and yet could not allow Alisande to help, because it
 would have seemed so like undressing before folk.  It would not
 have amounted to that in reality, because I had clothes on
 underneath; but the prejudices of one's breeding are not gotten
 rid of just at a jump, and I knew that when it came to stripping
 off that bob-tailed iron petticoat I should be embarrassed.
 
 With the storm came a change of weather; and the stronger the wind
 blew, and the wilder the rain lashed around, the colder and colder
 it got.  Pretty soon, various kinds of bugs and ants and worms
 and things began to flock in out of the wet and crawl down inside
 my armor to get warm; and while some of them behaved well enough,
 and snuggled up amongst my clothes and got quiet, the majority
 were of a restless, uncomfortable sort, and never stayed still,
 but went on prowling and hunting for they did not know what;
 especially the ants, which went tickling along in wearisome
 procession from one end of me to the other by the hour, and are
 a kind of creatures which I never wish to sleep with again.
 It would be my advice to persons situated in this way, to not roll
 or thrash around, because this excites the interest of all the
 different sorts of animals and makes every last one of them want
 to turn out and see what is going on, and this makes things worse
 than they were before, and of course makes you objurgate harder,
 too, if you can.  Still, if one did not roll and thrash around
 he would die; so perhaps it is as well to do one way as the other;
--**--**--
 degree: small "independent" farmers, artisans, etc.; which is
 to say, they were the nation, the actual Nation; they were about
 all of it that was useful, or worth saving, or really respect-worthy,
 and to subtract them would have been to subtract the Nation and
 leave behind some dregs, some refuse, in the shape of a king,
 nobility and gentry, idle, unproductive, acquainted mainly with
 the arts of wasting and destroying, and of no sort of use or value
 in any rationally constructed world.  And yet, by ingenious
 contrivance, this gilded minority, instead of being in the tail
 of the procession where it belonged, was marching head up and
 banners flying, at the other end of it; had elected itself to be
 the Nation, and these innumerable clams had permitted it so long
 that they had come at last to accept it as a truth; and not only
 that, but to believe it right and as it should be.  The priests
 had told their fathers and themselves that this ironical state
 of things was ordained of God; and so, not reflecting upon how
 unlike God it would be to amuse himself with sarcasms, and especially
 such poor transparent ones as this, they had dropped the matter
 there and become respectfully quiet.
 
 The talk of these meek people had a strange enough sound in
 a formerly American ear.  They were freemen, but they could not
 leave the estates of their lord or their bishop without his
 permission; they could not prepare their own bread, but must have
 their corn ground and their bread baked at his mill and his bakery,
 and pay roundly for the same; they could not sell a piece of their
 own property without paying him a handsome percentage of the
 proceeds, nor buy a piece of somebody else's without remembering
--**--**--
 been taught to see in its vastness or pity as it deserves.
 
 These poor ostensible freemen who were sharing their breakfast
 and their talk with me, were as full of humble reverence for their
 king and Church and nobility as their worst enemy could desire.
 There was something pitifully ludicrous about it.  I asked them
 if they supposed a nation of people ever existed, who, with a free
 vote in every man's hand, would elect that a single family and its
 descendants should reign over it forever, whether gifted or boobies,
 to the exclusion of all other families--including the voter's; and
 would also elect that a certain hundred families should be raised
 to dizzy summits of rank, and clothed on with offensive transmissible
 glories and privileges to the exclusion of the rest of the nation's
 families--_including his own_.
 
 They all looked unhit, and said they didn't know; that they had
 never thought about it before, and it hadn't ever occurred to them
 that a nation could be so situated that every man _could_ have
 a say in the government.  I said I had seen one--and that it would
 last until it had an Established Church.  Again they were all
 unhit--at first.  But presently one man looked up and asked me
 to state that proposition again; and state it slowly, so it could
 soak into his understanding.  I did it; and after a little he had
 the idea, and he brought his fist down and said _he_ didn't believe
 a nation where every man had a vote would voluntarily get down
 in the mud and dirt in any such way; and that to steal from a nation
 its will and preference must be a crime and the first of all crimes.
 I said to myself:
 
 "This one's a man.  If I were backed by enough of his sort, I would
--**--**--
 armed knights and their squires; and straightway there was bustle
 among them and tightening of saddle-girths for the mount.  My pipe
 was ready and would have been lit, if I had not been lost in
 thinking about how to banish oppression from this land and restore
 to all its people their stolen rights and manhood without disobliging
 anybody.  I lit up at once, and by the time I had got a good head
 of reserved steam on, here they came.  All together, too; none of
 those chivalrous magnanimities which one reads so much about
 --one courtly rascal at a time, and the rest standing by to see fair
 play.  No, they came in a body, they came with a whirr and a rush,
 they came like a volley from a battery; came with heads low down,
 plumes streaming out behind, lances advanced at a level.  It was
 a handsome sight, a beautiful sight--for a man up a tree.  I laid
 my lance in rest and waited, with my heart beating, till the iron
 wave was just ready to break over me, then spouted a column of
 white smoke through the bars of my helmet.  You should have seen
 the wave go to pieces and scatter!  This was a finer sight than
 the other one.
 
 But these people stopped, two or three hundred yards away, and
 this troubled me.  My satisfaction collapsed, and fear came;
 I judged I was a lost man.  But Sandy was radiant; and was going
 to be eloquent--but I stopped her, and told her my magic had
 miscarried, somehow or other, and she must mount, with all despatch,
 and we must ride for life.  No, she wouldn't.  She said that my
 enchantment had disabled those knights; they were not riding on,
 because they couldn't; wait, they would drop out of their saddles
--**--**--
 "_Which_ two?"
 
 "Sir Gawaine and Sir Uwaine.  And so they came to an abbey of monks,
 and there were well lodged.  So on the morn they heard their masses
 in the abbey, and so they rode forth till they came to a great
 forest; then was Sir Gawaine ware in a valley by a turret, of
 twelve fair damsels, and two knights armed on great horses, and
 the damsels went to and fro by a tree.  And then was Sir Gawaine
 ware how there hung a white shield on that tree, and ever as the
 damsels came by it they spit upon it, and some threw mire upon
 the shield--"
 
 "Now, if I hadn't seen the like myself in this country, Sandy,
 I wouldn't believe it.  But I've seen it, and I can just see those
 creatures now, parading before that shield and acting like that.
 The women here do certainly act like all possessed.  Yes, and
 I mean your best, too, society's very choicest brands.  The humblest
 hello-girl along ten thousand miles of wire could teach gentleness,
 patience, modesty, manners, to the highest duchess in Arthur's land."
 
 "Hello-girl?"
 
 "Yes, but don't you ask me to explain; it's a new kind of a girl;
 they don't have them here; one often speaks sharply to them when
 they are not the least in fault, and he can't get over feeling
 sorry for it and ashamed of himself in thirteen hundred years,
 it's such shabby mean conduct and so unprovoked; the fact is,
 no gentleman ever does it--though I--well, I myself, if I've got
 to confess--"
 
 "Peradventure she--"
 
 "Never mind her; never mind her; I tell you I couldn't ever explain
 her so you would understand."
 
 "Even so be it, sith ye are so minded.  Then Sir Gawaine and
 Sir Uwaine went and saluted them, and asked them why they did that
--**--**--
 I had lost another chapter, and that Alisande had wandered a long
 way off with her people.
 
 "And so they rode and came into a deep valley full of stones,
 and thereby they saw a fair stream of water; above thereby was
 the head of the stream, a fair fountain, and three damsels sitting
 thereby. In this country, said Sir Marhaus, came never knight
 since it was christened, but he found strange adventures--"
 
 "This is not good form, Alisande.  Sir Marhaus the king's son of
 Ireland talks like all the rest; you ought to give him a brogue,
 or at least a characteristic expletive; by this means one would
 recognize him as soon as he spoke, without his ever being named.
 It is a common literary device with the great authors.  You should
 make him say, 'In this country, be jabers, came never knight since
 it was christened, but he found strange adventures, be jabers.'
 You see how much better that sounds."
 
 --"came never knight but he found strange adventures, be jabers.
 Of a truth it doth indeed, fair lord, albeit 'tis passing hard
 to say, though peradventure that will not tarry but better speed
 with usage.  And then they rode to the damsels, and either saluted
 other, and the eldest had a garland of gold about her head, and
 she was threescore winter of age or more--"
 
 "The _damsel_ was?"
 
 "Even so, dear lord--and her hair was white under the garland--"
 
 "Celluloid teeth, nine dollars a set, as like as not--the loose-fit
 kind, that go up and down like a portcullis when you eat, and
 fall out when you laugh."
 
 "The second damsel was of thirty winter of age, with a circlet of
 gold about her head.  The third damsel was but fifteen year of age--"
 
 Billows of thought came rolling over my soul, and the voice faded
--**--**--
 any way or with any weapon that promised to hurt it.  Why, in my
 own former day--in remote centuries not yet stirring in the womb
 of time--there were old Englishmen who imagined that they had been
 born in a free country: a "free" country with the Corporation Act
 and the Test still in force in it--timbers propped against men's
 liberties and dishonored consciences to shore up an Established
 Anachronism with.
 
 My missionaries were taught to spell out the gilt signs on their
 tabards--the showy gilding was a neat idea, I could have got the
 king to wear a bulletin-board for the sake of that barbaric
 splendor--they were to spell out these signs and then explain to
 the lords and ladies what soap was; and if the lords and ladies
 were afraid of it, get them to try it on a dog.  The missionary's
 next move was to get the family together and try it on himself;
 he was to stop at no experiment, however desperate, that could
 convince the nobility that soap was harmless; if any final doubt
 remained, he must catch a hermit--the woods were full of them;
 saints they called themselves, and saints they were believed to be.
 They were unspeakably holy, and worked miracles, and everybody
 stood in awe of them.  If a hermit could survive a wash, and that
 failed to convince a duke, give him up, let him alone.
 
 Whenever my missionaries overcame a knight errant on the road
 they washed him, and when he got well they swore him to go and
 get a bulletin-board and disseminate soap and civilization the rest
 of his days.  As a consequence the workers in the field were
 increasing by degrees, and the reform was steadily spreading.
 My soap factory felt the strain early.  At first I had only two
--**--**--
 victory.  We will put on your bulletin-board, '_Patronized by the
 elect_.'  How does that strike you?"
 
 "Verily, it is wonderly bethought!"
 
 "Well, a body is bound to admit that for just a modest little
 one-line ad, it's a corker."
 
 So the poor colporteur's griefs vanished away.  He was a brave
 fellow, and had done mighty feats of arms in his time.  His chief
 celebrity rested upon the events of an excursion like this one
 of mine, which he had once made with a damsel named Maledisant,
 who was as handy with her tongue as was Sandy, though in a different
 way, for her tongue churned forth only railings and insult, whereas
 Sandy's music was of a kindlier sort.  I knew his story well, and so
 I knew how to interpret the compassion that was in his face when he
 bade me farewell.  He supposed I was having a bitter hard time of it.
 
 Sandy and I discussed his story, as we rode along, and she said
 that La Cote's bad luck had begun with the very beginning of that
 trip; for the king's fool had overthrown him on the first day,
 and in such cases it was customary for the girl to desert to the
 conqueror, but Maledisant didn't do it; and also persisted afterward
 in sticking to him, after all his defeats.  But, said I, suppose
 the victor should decline to accept his spoil?  She said that that
 wouldn't answer--he must.  He couldn't decline; it wouldn't be
 regular.  I made a note of that.  If Sandy's music got to be too
 burdensome, some time, I would let a knight defeat me, on the chance
 that she would desert to him.
 
 In due time we were challenged by the warders, from the castle
 walls, and after a parley admitted.  I have nothing pleasant to
--**--**--
 By midnight everybody was fagged out, and sore with laughing; and,
 as a rule, drunk: some weepingly, some affectionately, some
 hilariously, some quarrelsomely, some dead and under the table.
 Of the ladies, the worst spectacle was a lovely young duchess, whose
 wedding-eve this was; and indeed she was a spectacle, sure enough.
 Just as she was she could have sat in advance for the portrait of the
 young daughter of the Regent d'Orleans, at the famous dinner whence
 she was carried, foul-mouthed, intoxicated, and helpless, to her bed,
 in the lost and lamented days of the Ancient Regime.
 
 Suddenly, even while the priest was lifting his hands, and all
 conscious heads were bowed in reverent expectation of the coming
 blessing, there appeared under the arch of the far-off door at
 the bottom of the hall an old and bent and white-haired lady,
 leaning upon a crutch-stick; and she lifted the stick and pointed it
 toward the queen and cried out:
 
 "The wrath and curse of God fall upon you, woman without pity,
 who have slain mine innocent grandchild and made desolate this
 old heart that had nor chick, nor friend nor stay nor comfort in
 all this world but him!"
 
 Everybody crossed himself in a grisly fright, for a curse was an
 awful thing to those people; but the queen rose up majestic, with
 the death-light in her eye, and flung back this ruthless command:
 
 "Lay hands on her!  To the stake with her!"
 
 The guards left their posts to obey.  It was a shame; it was a
 cruel thing to see.  What could be done?  Sandy gave me a look;
 I knew she had another inspiration.  I said:
 
 "Do what you choose."
 
 She was up and facing toward the queen in a moment.  She indicated
 me, and said:
--**--**--
 
 "Well--yes, there is reason in that.  But _he_ didn't want the
 quick death."
 
 "He?  Why, of a surety he _did_."
 
 "Well, then, why in the world _didn't_ he confess?"
 
 "Ah, sweet sir, and leave my wife and chick without bread and shelter?"
 
 "Oh, heart of gold, now I see it!  The bitter law takes the convicted
 man's estate and beggars his widow and his orphans.  They could
 torture you to death, but without conviction or confession they
 could not rob your wife and baby.  You stood by them like a man;
 and _you_--true wife and the woman that you are--you would have
 bought him release from torture at cost to yourself of slow
 starvation and death--well, it humbles a body to think what your
 sex can do when it comes to self-sacrifice.  I'll book you both
 for my colony; you'll like it there; it's a Factory where I'm going
 to turn groping and grubbing automata into _men_."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVIII
 
 IN THE QUEEN'S DUNGEONS
 
 Well, I arranged all that; and I had the man sent to his home.
 I had a great desire to rack the executioner; not because he was
 a good, painstaking and paingiving official,--for surely it was
 not to his discredit that he performed his functions well--but to
 pay him back for wantonly cuffing and otherwise distressing that
 young woman.  The priests told me about this, and were generously
 hot to have him punished.  Something of this disagreeable sort
 was turning up every now and then.  I mean, episodes that showed
 that not all priests were frauds and self-seekers, but that many,
 even the great majority, of these that were down on the ground
 among the common people, were sincere and right-hearted, and
 devoted to the alleviation of human troubles and sufferings.
 Well, it was a thing which could not be helped, so I seldom fretted
--**--**--
 years old, and looked sixty.  He sat upon a squared block of
 stone, with his head bent down, his forearms resting on his knees,
 his long hair hanging like a fringe before his face, and he was
 muttering to himself.  He raised his chin and looked us slowly
 over, in a listless dull way, blinking with the distress of the
 torchlight, then dropped his head and fell to muttering again
 and took no further notice of us.  There were some pathetically
 suggestive dumb witnesses present.  On his wrists and ankles were
 cicatrices, old smooth scars, and fastened to the stone on which
 he sat was a chain with manacles and fetters attached; but this
 apparatus lay idle on the ground, and was thick with rust.  Chains
 cease to be needed after the spirit has gone out of a prisoner.
 
 I could not rouse the man; so I said we would take him to her,
 and see--to the bride who was the fairest thing in the earth to him,
 once--roses, pearls, and dew made flesh, for him; a wonder-work,
 the master-work of nature: with eyes like no other eyes, and voice
 like no other voice, and a freshness, and lithe young grace, and
 beauty, that belonged properly to the creatures of dreams--as he
 thought--and to no other.  The sight of her would set his stagnant
 blood leaping; the sight of her--
 
 But it was a disappointment.  They sat together on the ground and
 looked dimly wondering into each other's faces a while, with a
 sort of weak animal curiosity; then forgot each other's presence,
 and dropped their eyes, and you saw that they were away again and
 wandering in some far land of dreams and shadows that we know
 nothing about.
 
 I had them taken out and sent to their friends.  The queen did not
--**--**--
 When I brought my procession of human bats up into the open world
 and the glare of the afternoon sun--previously blindfolding them,
 in charity for eyes so long untortured by light--they were a
 spectacle to look at.  Skeletons, scarecrows, goblins, pathetic
 frights, every one; legitimatest possible children of Monarchy
 by the Grace of God and the Established Church.  I muttered absently:
 
 "I _wish_ I could photograph them!"
 
 You have seen that kind of people who will never let on that they
 don't know the meaning of a new big word.  The more ignorant they
 are, the more pitifully certain they are to pretend you haven't
 shot over their heads.  The queen was just one of that sort, and
 was always making the stupidest blunders by reason of it.  She
 hesitated a moment; then her face brightened up with sudden
 comprehension, and she said she would do it for me.
 
 I thought to myself: She? why what can she know about photography?
 But it was a poor time to be thinking.  When I looked around, she
 was moving on the procession with an axe!
 
 Well, she certainly was a curious one, was Morgan le Fay.  I have
 seen a good many kinds of women in my time, but she laid over them
 all for variety.  And how sharply characteristic of her this episode
 was.  She had no more idea than a horse of how to photograph
 a procession; but being in doubt, it was just like her to try
 to do it with an axe.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XIX
 
 KNIGHT-ERRANTRY AS A TRADE
 
 Sandy and I were on the road again, next morning, bright and early.
 It was so good to open up one's lungs and take in whole luscious
 barrels-ful of the blessed God's untainted, dew-fashioned,
 woodland-scented air once more, after suffocating body and mind for two
--**--**--
 hard work, too, but I begin to see that there _is_ money in it,
 after all, if you have luck.  Not that I would ever engage in it
 as a business, for I wouldn't.  No sound and legitimate business
 can be established on a basis of speculation.  A successful whirl
 in the knight-errantry line--now what is it when you blow away
 the nonsense and come down to the cold facts?  It's just a corner
 in pork, that's all, and you can't make anything else out of it.
 You're rich--yes,--suddenly rich--for about a day, maybe a week;
 then somebody corners the market on _you_, and down goes your
 bucket-shop; ain't that so, Sandy?"
 
 "Whethersoever it be that my mind miscarrieth, bewraying simple
 language in such sort that the words do seem to come endlong
 and overthwart--"
 
 "There's no use in beating about the bush and trying to get around
 it that way, Sandy, it's _so_, just as I say.  I _know_ it's so.  And,
 moreover, when you come right down to the bedrock, knight-errantry
 is _worse_ than pork; for whatever happens, the pork's left, and
 so somebody's benefited anyway; but when the market breaks, in a
 knight-errantry whirl, and every knight in the pool passes in his
 checks, what have you got for assets?  Just a rubbish-pile of
 battered corpses and a barrel or two of busted hardware.  Can you
 call _those_ assets?  Give me pork, every time.  Am I right?"
 
 "Ah, peradventure my head being distraught by the manifold matters
 whereunto the confusions of these but late adventured haps and
 fortunings whereby not I alone nor you alone, but every each of us,
 meseemeth--"
 
 "No, it's not your head, Sandy.  Your head's all right, as far as
 it goes, but you don't know business; that's where the trouble
 is.  It unfits you to argue about business, and you're wrong
--**--**--
 of nearly the same size, which he never pushed upon anybody unasked,
 and yet never withheld when asked: that was, that the reason he
 didn't quite succeed was, that he was interrupted and sent down
 over horse-tail himself.  This innocent vast lubber did not see
 any particular difference between the two facts.  I liked him,
 for he was earnest in his work, and very valuable.  And he was so
 fine to look at, with his broad mailed shoulders, and the grand
 leonine set of his plumed head, and his big shield with its quaint
 device of a gauntleted hand clutching a prophylactic tooth-brush,
 with motto: "Try Noyoudont."  This was a tooth-wash that I was
 introducing.
 
 He was aweary, he said, and indeed he looked it; but he would not
 alight.  He said he was after the stove-polish man; and with this
 he broke out cursing and swearing anew.  The bulletin-boarder
 referred to was Sir Ossaise of Surluse, a brave knight, and of
 considerable celebrity on account of his having tried conclusions
 in a tournament once, with no less a Mogul than Sir Gaheris
 himself--although not successfully.  He was of a light and laughing
 disposition, and to him nothing in this world was serious.  It was
 for this reason that I had chosen him to work up a stove-polish
 sentiment.  There were no stoves yet, and so there could be nothing
 serious about stove-polish.  All that the agent needed to do was
 to deftly and by degrees prepare the public for the great change,
 and have them established in predilections toward neatness against
 the time when the stove should appear upon the stage.
 
 Sir Madok was very bitter, and brake out anew with cursings.  He
 said he had cursed his soul to rags; and yet he would not get down
--**--**--
 to that end.
 
 Of course, the whole drove was housed in the house, and, great
 guns!--well, I never saw anything like it.  Nor ever heard anything
 like it.  And never smelt anything like it.  It was like an
 insurrection in a gasometer.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI
 
 THE PILGRIMS
 
 When I did get to bed at last I was unspeakably tired; the stretching
 out, and the relaxing of the long-tense muscles, how luxurious,
 how delicious! but that was as far as I could get--sleep was out of
 the question for the present.  The ripping and tearing and squealing
 of the nobility up and down the halls and corridors was pandemonium
 come again, and kept me broad awake.  Being awake, my thoughts
 were busy, of course; and mainly they busied themselves with Sandy's
 curious delusion.  Here she was, as sane a person as the kingdom
 could produce; and yet, from my point of view she was acting like
 a crazy woman.  My land, the power of training! of influence!
 of education!  It can bring a body up to believe anything.  I had
 to put myself in Sandy's place to realize that she was not a
 lunatic.  Yes, and put her in mine, to demonstrate how easy it is
 to seem a lunatic to a person who has not been taught as you have
 been taught.  If I had told Sandy I had seen a wagon, uninfluenced
 by enchantment, spin along fifty miles an hour; had seen a man,
 unequipped with magic powers, get into a basket and soar out of
 sight among the clouds; and had listened, without any necromancer's
 help, to the conversation of a person who was several hundred miles
 away, Sandy would not merely have supposed me to be crazy, she
 would have thought she knew it.  Everybody around her believed in
--**--**--
 relief of it was like pardon to a prisoner.  She would remain to
 deliver the goods, of course.
 
 "Well, then, Sandy, as our enterprise is handsomely and successfully
 ended, I will go home and report; and if ever another one--"
 
 "I also am ready; I will go with thee."
 
 This was recalling the pardon.
 
 "How?  You will go with me?  Why should you?"
 
 "Will I be traitor to my knight, dost think?  That were dishonor.
 I may not part from thee until in knightly encounter in the field
 some overmatching champion shall fairly win and fairly wear me.
 I were to blame an I thought that that might ever hap."
 
 "Elected for the long term," I sighed to myself.  "I may as well
 make the best of it."  So then I spoke up and said:
 
 "All right; let us make a start."
 
 While she was gone to cry her farewells over the pork, I gave that
 whole peerage away to the servants.  And I asked them to take
 a duster and dust around a little where the nobilities had mainly
 lodged and promenaded; but they considered that that would be
 hardly worth while, and would moreover be a rather grave departure
 from custom, and therefore likely to make talk.  A departure from
 custom--that settled it; it was a nation capable of committing any
 crime but that.  The servants said they would follow the fashion,
 a fashion grown sacred through immemorial observance; they would
 scatter fresh rushes in all the rooms and halls, and then the
 evidence of the aristocratic visitation would be no longer visible.
 It was a kind of satire on Nature: it was the scientific method,
 the geologic method; it deposited the history of the family in
 a stratified record; and the antiquary could dig through it and
--**--**--
 Early in the afternoon we overtook another procession of pilgrims;
 but in this one was no merriment, no jokes, no laughter, no playful
 ways, nor any happy giddiness, whether of youth or age.  Yet both
 were here, both age and youth; gray old men and women, strong men
 and women of middle age, young husbands, young wives, little boys
 and girls, and three babies at the breast.  Even the children were
 smileless; there was not a face among all these half a hundred
 people but was cast down, and bore that set expression of hopelessness
 which is bred of long and hard trials and old acquaintance with
 despair.  They were slaves.  Chains led from their fettered feet
 and their manacled hands to a sole-leather belt about their waists;
 and all except the children were also linked together in a file
 six feet apart, by a single chain which led from collar to collar
 all down the line.  They were on foot, and had tramped three
 hundred miles in eighteen days, upon the cheapest odds and ends
 of food, and stingy rations of that.  They had slept in these
 chains every night, bundled together like swine.  They had upon
 their bodies some poor rags, but they could not be said to be
 clothed.  Their irons had chafed the skin from their ankles and
 made sores which were ulcerated and wormy.  Their naked feet were
 torn, and none walked without a limp.  Originally there had been a
 hundred of these unfortunates, but about half had been sold on
 the trip.  The trader in charge of them rode a horse and carried
 a whip with a short handle and a long heavy lash divided into
 several knotted tails at the end.  With this whip he cut the
 shoulders of any that tottered from weariness and pain, and
--**--**--
 he did the shedding himself.  He said:
 
 "Delay not, son, but get to thy saving work.  An we bring not
 the water back again, and soon, we are ruined, and the good work
 of two hundred years must end.  And see thou do it with enchantments
 that be holy, for the Church will not endure that work in her cause
 be done by devil's magic."
 
 "When I work, Father, be sure there will be no devil's work
 connected with it.  I shall use no arts that come of the devil,
 and no elements not created by the hand of God.  But is Merlin
 working strictly on pious lines?"
 
 "Ah, he said he would, my son, he said he would, and took oath
 to make his promise good."
 
 "Well, in that case, let him proceed."
 
 "But surely you will not sit idle by, but help?"
 
 "It will not answer to mix methods, Father; neither would it be
 professional courtesy.  Two of a trade must not underbid each
 other.  We might as well cut rates and be done with it; it would
 arrive at that in the end.  Merlin has the contract; no other
 magician can touch it till he throws it up."
 
 "But I will take it from him; it is a terrible emergency and the
 act is thereby justified.  And if it were not so, who will give
 law to the Church?  The Church giveth law to all; and what she
 wills to do, that she may do, hurt whom it may.  I will take it
 from him; you shall begin upon the moment."
 
 "It may not be, Father.  No doubt, as you say, where power is
 supreme, one can do as one likes and suffer no injury; but we poor
 magicians are not so situated.  Merlin is a very good magician
--**--**--
 _nor_ could, nor might-not nor could-not, might be by advantage
 turned to the desired _would_, and so I pray you mercy of my fault,
 and that ye will of your kindness and your charity forgive it, good
 my master and most dear lord."
 
 I couldn't make it all out--that is, the details--but I got the
 general idea; and enough of it, too, to be ashamed.  It was not
 fair to spring those nineteenth century technicalities upon the
 untutored infant of the sixth and then rail at her because she
 couldn't get their drift; and when she was making the honest best
 drive at it she could, too, and no fault of hers that she couldn't
 fetch the home plate; and so I apologized.  Then we meandered
 pleasantly away toward the hermit holes in sociable converse
 together, and better friends than ever.
 
 I was gradually coming to have a mysterious and shuddery reverence
 for this girl; nowadays whenever she pulled out from the station
 and got her train fairly started on one of those horizonless
 transcontinental sentences of hers, it was borne in upon me that
 I was standing in the awful presence of the Mother of the German
 Language.  I was so impressed with this, that sometimes when she
 began to empty one of these sentences on me I unconsciously took
 the very attitude of reverence, and stood uncovered; and if words
 had been water, I had been drowned, sure.  She had exactly the
 German way; whatever was in her mind to be delivered, whether a
 mere remark, or a sermon, or a cyclopedia, or the history of a war,
 she would get it into a single sentence or die.  Whenever the literary
 German dives into a sentence, that is the last you are going to see
 of him till he emerges on the other side of his Atlantic with his
--**--**--
 would break this spell must know that spirit's name?"
 
 "Yes, I know his name."
 
 "And wit you also that to know it skills not of itself, but ye
 must likewise pronounce it?  Ha-ha!  Knew ye that?"
 
 "Yes, I knew that, too."
 
 "You had that knowledge!  Art a fool?  Are ye minded to utter
 that name and die?"
 
 "Utter it?  Why certainly.  I would utter it if it was Welsh."
 
 "Ye are even a dead man, then; and I go to tell Arthur."
 
 "That's all right.  Take your gripsack and get along.  The thing
 for _you_ to do is to go home and work the weather, John W. Merlin."
 
 It was a home shot, and it made him wince; for he was the worst
 weather-failure in the kingdom.  Whenever he ordered up the
 danger-signals along the coast there was a week's dead calm, sure,
 and every time he prophesied fair weather it rained brickbats.
 But I kept him in the weather bureau right along, to undermine
 his reputation.  However, that shot raised his bile, and instead
 of starting home to report my death, he said he would remain
 and enjoy it.
 
 My two experts arrived in the evening, and pretty well fagged,
 for they had traveled double tides.  They had pack-mules along,
 and had brought everything I needed--tools, pump, lead pipe,
 Greek fire, sheaves of big rockets, roman candles, colored fire
 sprays, electric apparatus, and a lot of sundries--everything
 necessary for the stateliest kind of a miracle.  They got their
 supper and a nap, and about midnight we sallied out through a
 solitude so wholly vacant and complete that it quite overpassed
 the required conditions.  We took possession of the well and its
 surroundings.  My boys were experts in all sorts of things, from
 the stoning up of a well to the constructing of a mathematical
--**--**--
 many women to faint:
 
 "Constantinopolitanischerdudelsackspfeifenmachersgesellschafft!"
 
 Just as I was moaning out the closing hunks of that word, I touched
 off one of my electric connections and all that murky world of
 people stood revealed in a hideous blue glare!  It was immense
 --that effect!  Lots of people shrieked, women curled up and quit
 in every direction, foundlings collapsed by platoons.  The abbot
 and the monks crossed themselves nimbly and their lips fluttered
 with agitated prayers.  Merlin held his grip, but he was astonished
 clear down to his corns; he had never seen anything to begin
 with that, before.  Now was the time to pile in the effects.  I lifted
 my hands and groaned out this word--as it were in agony:
 
 "Nihilistendynamittheaterkaestchenssprengungsattentaetsversuchungen!"
 
 --and turned on the red fire!  You should have heard that Atlantic
 of people moan and howl when that crimson hell joined the blue!
 After sixty seconds I shouted:
 
 "Transvaaltruppentropentransporttrampelthiertreibertrauungsthraenen-
 tragoedie!"
 
 --and lit up the green fire!  After waiting only forty seconds this
 time, I spread my arms abroad and thundered out the devastating
 syllables of this word of words:
 
 "Mekkamuselmannenmassenmenchenmoerdermohrenmuttermarmormonumentenmacher!"
 
 --and whirled on the purple glare!  There they were, all going
 at once, red, blue, green, purple!--four furious volcanoes pouring
 vast clouds of radiant smoke aloft, and spreading a blinding
 rainbowed noonday to the furthest confines of that valley.  In
 the distance one could see that fellow on the pillar standing rigid
 against the background of sky, his seesaw stopped for the first
 time in twenty years.  I knew the boys were at the pump now and
 ready.  So I said to the abbot:
 
 "The time is come, Father.  I am about to pronounce the dread name
 and command the spell to dissolve.  You want to brace up, and take
 hold of something."  Then I shouted to the people: "Behold, in
--**--**--
 My idea was to disguise myself as a freeman of peasant degree
 and wander through the country a week or two on foot.  This would
 give me a chance to eat and lodge with the lowliest and poorest
 class of free citizens on equal terms.  There was no other way
 to inform myself perfectly of their everyday life and the operation
 of the laws upon it.  If I went among them as a gentleman, there
 would be restraints and conventionalities which would shut me out
 from their private joys and troubles, and I should get no further
 than the outside shell.
 
 One morning I was out on a long walk to get up muscle for my trip,
 and had climbed the ridge which bordered the northern extremity
 of the valley, when I came upon an artificial opening in the face
 of a low precipice, and recognized it by its location as a hermitage
 which had often been pointed out to me from a distance as the den
 of a hermit of high renown for dirt and austerity.  I knew he had
 lately been offered a situation in the Great Sahara, where lions
 and sandflies made the hermit-life peculiarly attractive and
 difficult, and had gone to Africa to take possession, so I thought
 I would look in and see how the atmosphere of this den agreed
 with its reputation.
 
 My surprise was great: the place was newly swept and scoured.
 Then there was another surprise.  Back in the gloom of the cavern
 I heard the clink of a little bell, and then this exclamation:
 
 "Hello Central!  Is this you, Camelot?--Behold, thou mayst glad
 thy heart an thou hast faith to believe the wonderful when that
 it cometh in unexpected guise and maketh itself manifest in
 impossible places--here standeth in the flesh his mightiness
--**--**--
 
 When I got back to the monastery, I found a thing of interest
 going on.  The abbot and his monks were assembled in the great
 hall, observing with childish wonder and faith the performances
 of a new magician, a fresh arrival.  His dress was the extreme of
 the fantastic; as showy and foolish as the sort of thing an Indian
 medicine-man wears.  He was mowing, and mumbling, and gesticulating,
 and drawing mystical figures in the air and on the floor,--the
 regular thing, you know.  He was a celebrity from Asia--so he
 said, and that was enough.  That sort of evidence was as good
 as gold, and passed current everywhere.
 
 How easy and cheap it was to be a great magician on this fellow's
 terms.  His specialty was to tell you what any individual on the
 face of the globe was doing at the moment; and what he had done
 at any time in the past, and what he would do at any time in the
 future.  He asked if any would like to know what the Emperor of
 the East was doing now?  The sparkling eyes and the delighted rubbing
 of hands made eloquent answer--this reverend crowd _would_ like to
 know what that monarch was at, just as this moment.  The fraud
 went through some more mummery, and then made grave announcement:
 
 "The high and mighty Emperor of the East doth at this moment put
 money in the palm of a holy begging friar--one, two, three pieces,
 and they be all of silver."
 
 A buzz of admiring exclamations broke out, all around:
 
 "It is marvelous!"  "Wonderful!"  "What study, what labor, to have
 acquired a so amazing power as this!"
 
 Would they like to know what the Supreme Lord of Inde was doing?
 Yes.  He told them what the Supreme Lord of Inde was doing.  Then
--**--**--
 Their journey will not be merely half done, it will be all done,
 and they will be _here_, in this valley."
 
 _That_ was a noble shot!  It set the abbot and the monks in a whirl
 of excitement, and it rocked the enchanter to his base.  I followed
 the thing right up:
 
 "If the king does not arrive, I will have myself ridden on a rail:
 if he does I will ride you on a rail instead."
 
 Next day I went up to the telephone office and found that the king
 had passed through two towns that were on the line.  I spotted
 his progress on the succeeding day in the same way.  I kept these
 matters to myself.  The third day's reports showed that if he
 kept up his gait he would arrive by four in the afternoon.  There
 was still no sign anywhere of interest in his coming; there seemed
 to be no preparations making to receive him in state; a strange
 thing, truly.  Only one thing could explain this: that other
 magician had been cutting under me, sure.  This was true.  I asked
 a friend of mine, a monk, about it, and he said, yes, the magician
 had tried some further enchantments and found out that the court
 had concluded to make no journey at all, but stay at home.  Think
 of that!  Observe how much a reputation was worth in such a country.
 These people had seen me do the very showiest bit of magic in
 history, and the only one within their memory that had a positive
 value, and yet here they were, ready to take up with an adventurer
 who could offer no evidence of his powers but his mere unproven word.
 
 However, it was not good politics to let the king come without
--**--**--
 prepared, and it was put up now, and the circus began.  It was
 beautiful to hear the lad lay out the science of war, and wallow
 in details of battle and siege, of supply, transportation, mining
 and countermining, grand tactics, big strategy and little strategy,
 signal service, infantry, cavalry, artillery, and all about siege
 guns, field guns, gatling guns, rifled guns, smooth bores, musket
 practice, revolver practice--and not a solitary word of it all
 could these catfish make head or tail of, you understand--and it
 was handsome to see him chalk off mathematical nightmares on the
 blackboard that would stump the angels themselves, and do it like
 nothing, too--all about eclipses, and comets, and solstices, and
 constellations, and mean time, and sidereal time, and dinner time,
 and bedtime, and every other imaginable thing above the clouds or
 under them that you could harry or bullyrag an enemy with and make
 him wish he hadn't come--and when the boy made his military salute
 and stood aside at last, I was proud enough to hug him, and all
 those other people were so dazed they looked partly petrified,
 partly drunk, and wholly caught out and snowed under.  I judged
 that the cake was ours, and by a large majority.
 
 Education is a great thing.  This was the same youth who had come
 to West Point so ignorant that when I asked him, "If a general
 officer should have a horse shot under him on the field of battle,
 what ought he to do?" answered up naively and said:
 
 "Get up and brush himself."
 
 One of the young nobles was called up now.  I thought I would
 question him a little myself.  I said:
 
 "Can your lordship read?"
 
 His face flushed indignantly, and he fired this at me:
 
 "Takest me for a clerk?  I trow I am not of a blood that--"
--**--**--
 saints.  By her law none may be canonized until he hath lain dead
 four generations."
 
 "I see, I see--it is the same thing.  It is wonderful.  In the one
 case a man lies dead-alive four generations--mummified in ignorance
 and sloth--and that qualifies him to command live people, and take
 their weal and woe into his impotent hands; and in the other case,
 a man lies bedded with death and worms four generations, and that
 qualifies him for office in the celestial camp.  Does the king's
 grace approve of this strange law?"
 
 The king said:
 
 "Why, truly I see naught about it that is strange.  All places of
 honor and of profit do belong, by natural right, to them that be
 of noble blood, and so these dignities in the army are their
 property and would be so without this or any rule.  The rule is
 but to mark a limit.  Its purpose is to keep out too recent blood,
 which would bring into contempt these offices, and men of lofty
 lineage would turn their backs and scorn to take them.  I were
 to blame an I permitted this calamity.  _You_ can permit it an you
 are minded so to do, for you have the delegated authority, but
 that the king should do it were a most strange madness and not
 comprehensible to any."
 
 "I yield.  Proceed, sir Chief of the Herald's College."
 
 The chairman resumed as follows:
 
 "By what illustrious achievement for the honor of the Throne and
 State did the founder of your great line lift himself to the
 sacred dignity of the British nobility?"
 
 "He built a brewery."
 
 "Sire, the Board finds this candidate perfect in all the requirements
 and qualifications for military command, and doth hold his case
 open for decision after due examination of his competitor."
--**--**--
 have cost the government about $240; at the new rate we pulled
 through for about $35, thus saving upward of $200 at one swoop.
 To appreciate the full magnitude of this stroke, consider these
 other figures: the annual expenses of a national government amount
 to the equivalent of a contribution of three days' average wages of
 every individual of the population, counting every individual as
 if he were a man.  If you take a nation of 60,000,000, where average
 wages are $2 per day, three days' wages taken from each individual
 will provide $360,000,000 and pay the government's expenses.  In my
 day, in my own country, this money was collected from imposts,
 and the citizen imagined that the foreign importer paid it, and it
 made him comfortable to think so; whereas, in fact, it was paid
 by the American people, and was so equally and exactly distributed
 among them that the annual cost to the 100-millionaire and the
 annual cost to the sucking child of the day-laborer was precisely
 the same--each paid $6.  Nothing could be equaler than that,
 I reckon.  Well, Scotland and Ireland were tributary to Arthur,
 and the united populations of the British Islands amounted to
 something less than 1,000,000.  A mechanic's average wage was
 3 cents a day, when he paid his own keep.  By this rule the national
 government's expenses were $90,000 a year, or about $250 a day.
 Thus, by the substitution of nickels for gold on a king's-evil
 day, I not only injured no one, dissatisfied no one, but pleased
 all concerned and saved four-fifths of that day's national expense
 into the bargain--a saving which would have been the equivalent
 of $800,000 in my day in America.  In making this substitution
 I had drawn upon the wisdom of a very remote source--the wisdom
--**--**--
 than was needed in Arthur's day and realm.  As a rule, the grammar
 was leaky and the construction more or less lame; but I did not
 much mind these things.  They are common defects of my own, and
 one mustn't criticise other people on grounds where he can't stand
 perpendicular himself.
 
 I was hungry enough for literature to want to take down the whole
 paper at this one meal, but I got only a few bites, and then had
 to postpone, because the monks around me besieged me so with eager
 questions: What is this curious thing?  What is it for?  Is it a
 handkerchief?--saddle blanket?--part of a shirt?  What is it made of?
 How thin it is, and how dainty and frail; and how it rattles.
 Will it wear, do you think, and won't the rain injure it?  Is it
 writing that appears on it, or is it only ornamentation?  They
 suspected it was writing, because those among them who knew how
 to read Latin and had a smattering of Greek, recognized some of
 the letters, but they could make nothing out of the result as a
 whole.  I put my information in the simplest form I could:
 
 "It is a public journal; I will explain what that is, another time.
 It is not cloth, it is made of paper; some time I will explain
 what paper is.  The lines on it are reading matter; and not written
 by hand, but printed; by and by I will explain what printing is.
 A thousand of these sheets have been made, all exactly like this,
 in every minute detail--they can't be told apart."  Then they all
 broke out with exclamations of surprise and admiration:
 
 "A thousand!  Verily a mighty work--a year's work for many men."
 
 "No--merely a day's work for a man and a boy."
--**--**--
 "Great guns, my liege, where did you get that?"
 
 "From a smuggler at the inn, yester eve."
 
 "What in the world possessed you to buy it?"
 
 "We have escaped divers dangers by wit--thy wit--but I have
 bethought me that it were but prudence if I bore a weapon, too.
 Thine might fail thee in some pinch."
 
 "But people of our condition are not allowed to carry arms.  What
 would a lord say--yes, or any other person of whatever condition
 --if he caught an upstart peasant with a dagger on his person?"
 
 It was a lucky thing for us that nobody came along just then.
 I persuaded him to throw the dirk away; and it was as easy as
 persuading a child to give up some bright fresh new way of killing
 itself.  We walked along, silent and thinking.  Finally the king said:
 
 "When ye know that I meditate a thing inconvenient, or that hath
 a peril in it, why do you not warn me to cease from that project?"
 
 It was a startling question, and a puzzler.  I didn't quite know
 how to take hold of it, or what to say, and so, of course, I ended
 by saying the natural thing:
 
 "But, sire, how can I know what your thoughts are?"
 
 The king stopped dead in his tracks, and stared at me.
 
 "I believed thou wert greater than Merlin; and truly in magic
 thou art.  But prophecy is greater than magic.  Merlin is a prophet."
 
 I saw I had made a blunder.  I must get back my lost ground.
 After a deep reflection and careful planning, I said:
 
 "Sire, I have been misunderstood.  I will explain.  There are two
 kinds of prophecy.  One is the gift to foretell things that are but
 a little way off, the other is the gift to foretell things that
--**--**--
 left him as intelligent as he was before.  However, it was a noble
 miracle, in his eyes, and was another settler for Merlin.  I thought
 it well enough to explain that this was a miracle of so rare a sort
 that it couldn't be done except when the atmospheric conditions
 were just right.  Otherwise he would be encoring it every time we
 had a good subject, and that would be inconvenient, because I
 hadn't any more bombs along.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVIII
 
 DRILLING THE KING
 
 On the morning of the fourth day, when it was just sunrise, and we
 had been tramping an hour in the chill dawn, I came to a resolution:
 the king _must_ be drilled; things could not go on so, he must be
 taken in hand and deliberately and conscientiously drilled, or we
 couldn't ever venture to enter a dwelling; the very cats would know
 this masquerader for a humbug and no peasant.  So I called a halt
 and said:
 
 "Sire, as between clothes and countenance, you are all right, there
 is no discrepancy; but as between your clothes and your bearing,
 you are all wrong, there is a most noticeable discrepancy.  Your
 soldierly stride, your lordly port--these will not do.  You stand
 too straight, your looks are too high, too confident.  The cares
 of a kingdom do not stoop the shoulders, they do not droop the chin,
 they do not depress the high level of the eye-glance, they do not
 put doubt and fear in the heart and hang out the signs of them
 in slouching body and unsure step.  It is the sordid cares of
 the lowly born that do these things.  You must learn the trick;
 you must imitate the trademarks of poverty, misery, oppression,
 insult, and the other several and common inhumanities that sap
--**--**--
 "Ah, your grace, that is not well done."
 
 "In what lacketh it?"
 
 "These people do not call _each other_ varlets."
 
 "Nay, is that true?"
 
 "Yes; only those above them call them so."
 
 "Then must I try again.  I will call him villein."
 
 "No-no; for he may be a freeman."
 
 "Ah--so.  Then peradventure I should call him goodman."
 
 "That would answer, your grace, but it would be still better if
 you said friend, or brother."
 
 "Brother!--to dirt like that?"
 
 "Ah, but _we_ are pretending to be dirt like that, too."
 
 "It is even true.  I will say it.  Brother, bring a seat, and
 thereto what cheer ye have, withal.  Now 'tis right."
 
 "Not quite, not wholly right.  You have asked for one, not _us_
 --for one, not both; food for one, a seat for one."
 
 The king looked puzzled--he wasn't a very heavy weight, intellectually.
 His head was an hour-glass; it could stow an idea, but it had to do
 it a grain at a time, not the whole idea at once.
 
 "Would _you_ have a seat also--and sit?"
 
 "If I did not sit, the man would perceive that we were only pretending
 to be equals--and playing the deception pretty poorly, too."
 
 "It is well and truly said!  How wonderful is truth, come it in
 whatsoever unexpected form it may!  Yes, he must bring out seats
 and food for both, and in serving us present not ewer and napkin
 with more show of respect to the one than to the other."
 
 "And there is even yet a detail that needs correcting.  He must
 bring nothing outside; we will go in--in among the dirt, and
 possibly other repulsive things,--and take the food with the
 household, and after the fashion of the house, and all on equal
 terms, except the man be of the serf class; and finally, there
--**--**--
 that a day's hard intellectual work is very much harder than
 a day's hard manual toil, and is righteously entitled to much
 bigger pay.  Why, they really think that, you know, because they
 know all about the one, but haven't tried the other.  But I know
 all about both; and so far as I am concerned, there isn't money
 enough in the universe to hire me to swing a pickaxe thirty days,
 but I will do the hardest kind of intellectual work for just as
 near nothing as you can cipher it down--and I will be satisfied, too.
 
 Intellectual "work" is misnamed; it is a pleasure, a dissipation,
 and is its own highest reward.  The poorest paid architect,
 engineer, general, author, sculptor, painter, lecturer, advocate,
 legislator, actor, preacher, singer is constructively in heaven
 when he is at work; and as for the musician with the fiddle-bow
 in his hand who sits in the midst of a great orchestra with the
 ebbing and flowing tides of divine sound washing over him--why,
 certainly, he is at work, if you wish to call it that, but lord,
 it's a sarcasm just the same.  The law of work does seem utterly
 unfair--but there it is, and nothing can change it: the higher
 the pay in enjoyment the worker gets out of it, the higher shall
 be his pay in cash, also.  And it's also the very law of those
 transparent swindles, transmissible nobility and kingship.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIX
 
 THE SMALLPOX HUT
 
 When we arrived at that hut at mid-afternoon, we saw no signs
 of life about it.  The field near by had been denuded of its crop
 some time before, and had a skinned look, so exhaustively had
 it been harvested and gleaned.  Fences, sheds, everything had a
 ruined look, and were eloquent of poverty.  No animal was around
--**--**--
 the daily insults of your betters, and the heavy hand of the Church
 and the king."
 
 The king winced under this accidental home-shot, but kept still;
 he was learning his part; and he was playing it well, too, for
 a pretty dull beginner.  I struck up a diversion.  I offered the
 woman food and liquor, but she refused both.  She would allow
 nothing to come between her and the release of death.  Then I slipped
 away and brought the dead child from aloft, and laid it by her.
 This broke her down again, and there was another scene that was
 full of heartbreak.  By and by I made another diversion, and beguiled
 her to sketch her story.
 
 "Ye know it well yourselves, having suffered it--for truly none
 of our condition in Britain escape it.  It is the old, weary tale.
 We fought and struggled and succeeded; meaning by success, that
 we lived and did not die; more than that is not to be claimed.  No
 troubles came that we could not outlive, till this year brought
 them; then came they all at once, as one might say, and overwhelmed
 us.  Years ago the lord of the manor planted certain fruit trees on
 our farm; in the best part of it, too--a grievous wrong and shame--"
 
 "But it was his right," interrupted the king.
 
 "None denieth that, indeed; an the law mean anything, what is
 the lord's is his, and what is mine is his also.  Our farm was
 ours by lease, therefore 'twas likewise his, to do with it as he
 would.  Some little time ago, three of those trees were found hewn
 down.  Our three grown sons ran frightened to report the crime.
 Well, in his lordship's dungeon there they lie, who saith there
 shall they lie and rot till they confess.  They have naught to
--**--**--
 
 We stood there awhile, in the thick darkness and stillness, looking
 toward the red blur in the distance, and trying to make out the
 meaning of a far-away murmur that rose and fell fitfully on the
 night.  Sometimes it swelled up and for a moment seemed less
 remote; but when we were hopefully expecting it to betray its cause
 and nature, it dulled and sank again, carrying its mystery with it.
 We started down the hill in its direction, and the winding road
 plunged us at once into almost solid darkness--darkness that was
 packed and crammed in between two tall forest walls.  We groped
 along down for half a mile, perhaps, that murmur growing more and
 more distinct all the time.  The coming storm threatening more and
 more, with now and then a little shiver of wind, a faint show of
 lightning, and dull grumblings of distant thunder.  I was in the
 lead.  I ran against something--a soft heavy something which gave,
 slightly, to the impulse of my weight; at the same moment the
 lightning glared out, and within a foot of my face was the writhing
 face of a man who was hanging from the limb of a tree!  That is,
 it seemed to be writhing, but it was not.  It was a grewsome sight.
 Straightway there was an ear-splitting explosion of thunder, and
 the bottom of heaven fell out; the rain poured down in a deluge.
 No matter, we must try to cut this man down, on the chance that
 there might be life in him yet, mustn't we?  The lightning came
 quick and sharp now, and the place was alternately noonday and
 midnight.  One moment the man would be hanging before me in an
 intense light, and the next he was blotted out again in the darkness.
--**--**--
 
 "From what land come you, brother, that you speak such perilous
 words, and seem not to be afraid?"
 
 "They are not perilous words when spoken to one of my own caste,
 I take it.  You would not tell anybody I said them?"
 
 "I?  I would be drawn asunder by wild horses first."
 
 "Well, then, let me say my say.  I have no fears of your repeating
 it.  I think devil's work has been done last night upon those
 innocent poor people.  That old baron got only what he deserved.
 If I had my way, all his kind should have the same luck."
 
 Fear and depression vanished from the man's manner, and gratefulness
 and a brave animation took their place:
 
 "Even though you be a spy, and your words a trap for my undoing,
 yet are they such refreshment that to hear them again and others
 like to them, I would go to the gallows happy, as having had one
 good feast at least in a starved life.  And I will say my say now,
 and ye may report it if ye be so minded.  I helped to hang my
 neighbors for that it were peril to my own life to show lack of
 zeal in the master's cause; the others helped for none other reason.
 All rejoice to-day that he is dead, but all do go about seemingly
 sorrowing, and shedding the hypocrite's tear, for in that lies
 safety.  I have said the words, I have said the words! the only
 ones that have ever tasted good in my mouth, and the reward of
 that taste is sufficient.  Lead on, an ye will, be it even to the
 scaffold, for I am ready."
 
 There it was, you see.  A man is a man, at bottom.  Whole ages
 of abuse and oppression cannot crush the manhood clear out of him.
--**--**--
 I fetched out those last words I was become a very tower for style
 and altitude.  "So you see, you must let me have my way.  You
 can't contribute a cent to this orgy, that's _settled_."
 
 "It's grand and good of you--"
 
 "No, it isn't.  You've opened your house to Jones and me in the
 most generous way; Jones was remarking upon it to-day, just before
 you came back from the village; for although he wouldn't be likely
 to say such a thing to you--because Jones isn't a talker, and is
 diffident in society--he has a good heart and a grateful, and
 knows how to appreciate it when he is well treated; yes, you and
 your wife have been very hospitable toward us--"
 
 "Ah, brother, 'tis nothing--_such_ hospitality!"
 
 "But it _is_ something; the best a man has, freely given, is always
 something, and is as good as a prince can do, and ranks right
 along beside it--for even a prince can but do his best.  And so
 we'll shop around and get up this layout now, and don't you worry
 about the expense.  I'm one of the worst spendthrifts that ever
 was born.  Why, do you know, sometimes in a single week I spend
 --but never mind about that--you'd never believe it anyway."
 
 And so we went gadding along, dropping in here and there, pricing
 things, and gossiping with the shopkeepers about the riot, and now
 and then running across pathetic reminders of it, in the persons of
 shunned and tearful and houseless remnants of families whose homes
 had been taken from them and their parents butchered or hanged.
 The raiment of Marco and his wife was of coarse tow-linen and
 linsey-woolsey respectively, and resembled township maps, it being
 made up pretty exclusively of patches which had been added, township
--**--**--
 forget to remember to not let on to Jones that you know he had
 anything to do with it.  You can't think how curiously sensitive
 and proud he is.  He's a farmer--pretty fairly well-to-do farmer
 --and I'm his bailiff; _but_--the imagination of that man!  Why,
 sometimes when he forgets himself and gets to blowing off, you'd
 think he was one of the swells of the earth; and you might listen
 to him a hundred years and never take him for a farmer--especially if
 he talked agriculture.  He _thinks_ he's a Sheol of a farmer; thinks
 he's old Grayback from Wayback; but between you and me privately
 he don't know as much about farming as he does about running
 a kingdom--still, whatever he talks about, you want to drop your
 underjaw and listen, the same as if you had never heard such
 incredible wisdom in all your life before, and were afraid you
 might die before you got enough of it.  That will please Jones."
 
 It tickled Marco to the marrow to hear about such an odd character;
 but it also prepared him for accidents; and in my experience when
 you travel with a king who is letting on to be something else and
 can't remember it more than about half the time, you can't take
 too many precautions.
 
 This was the best store we had come across yet; it had everything
 in it, in small quantities, from anvils and drygoods all the way
 down to fish and pinchbeck jewelry.  I concluded I would bunch
 my whole invoice right here, and not go pricing around any more.
 So I got rid of Marco, by sending him off to invite the mason and
 the wheelwright, which left the field free to me.  For I never care
 to do a thing in a quiet way; it's got to be theatrical or I don't
--**--**--
 
 "I know it of mine own knowledge," said the mason, in the same
 reverent fashion.
 
 "On my table appeareth white bread every Sunday in the year,"
 added the master smith, with solemnity.  "I leave it to your own
 consciences, friends, if this is not also true?"
 
 "By my head, yes," cried the mason.
 
 "I can testify it--and I do," said the wheelwright.
 
 "And as to furniture, ye shall say yourselves what mine equipment
 is."  He waved his hand in fine gesture of granting frank and
 unhampered freedom of speech, and added: "Speak as ye are moved;
 speak as ye would speak; an I were not here."
 
 "Ye have five stools, and of the sweetest workmanship at that, albeit
 your family is but three," said the wheelwright, with deep respect.
 
 "And six wooden goblets, and six platters of wood and two of pewter
 to eat and drink from withal," said the mason, impressively.  "And
 I say it as knowing God is my judge, and we tarry not here alway,
 but must answer at the last day for the things said in the body,
 be they false or be they sooth."
 
 "Now ye know what manner of man I am, brother Jones," said the
 smith, with a fine and friendly condescension, "and doubtless ye
 would look to find me a man jealous of his due of respect and
 but sparing of outgo to strangers till their rating and quality be
 assured, but trouble yourself not, as concerning that; wit ye well
 ye shall find me a man that regardeth not these matters but is
 willing to receive any he as his fellow and equal that carrieth
 a right heart in his body, be his worldly estate howsoever modest.
 And in token of it, here is my hand; and I say with my own mouth
--**--**--
 "Verily this being is _made_ of money!  He throweth it away even
 as if it were dirt."
 
 The blacksmith was a crushed man.
 
 The clerk took his money and reeled away drunk with fortune.  I said
 to Marco and his wife:
 
 "Good folk, here is a little trifle for you"--handing the miller-guns
 as if it were a matter of no consequence, though each of them
 contained fifteen cents in solid cash; and while the poor creatures
 went to pieces with astonishment and gratitude, I turned to the
 others and said as calmly as one would ask the time of day:
 
 "Well, if we are all ready, I judge the dinner is.  Come, fall to."
 
 Ah, well, it was immense; yes, it was a daisy.  I don't know that
 I ever put a situation together better, or got happier spectacular
 effects out of the materials available.  The blacksmith--well, he
 was simply mashed.  Land! I wouldn't have felt what that man was
 feeling, for anything in the world.  Here he had been blowing and
 bragging about his grand meat-feast twice a year, and his fresh
 meat twice a month, and his salt meat twice a week, and his white
 bread every Sunday the year round--all for a family of three; the
 entire cost for the year not above 69.2.6 (sixty-nine cents, two
 mills and six milrays), and all of a sudden here comes along a man
 who slashes out nearly four dollars on a single blow-out; and not
 only that, but acts as if it made him tired to handle such small
 sums.  Yes, Dowley was a good deal wilted, and shrunk-up and
 collapsed; he had the aspect of a bladder-balloon that's been
 stepped on by a cow.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXIII
 
 SIXTH CENTURY POLITICAL ECONOMY
 
 However, I made a dead set at him, and before the first third
--**--**--
 laborer or the mechanic?"
 
 "We pay eight cents, four mills."
 
 "Well, observe the difference: you pay eight cents and four mills,
 we pay only four cents."  I prepared now to sock it to him.  I said:
 "Look here, dear friend, _what's become of your high wages you
 were bragging so about a few minutes ago?_"--and I looked around
 on the company with placid satisfaction, for I had slipped up
 on him gradually and tied him hand and foot, you see, without his
 ever noticing that he was being tied at all.  "What's become of
 those noble high wages of yours?--I seem to have knocked the
 stuffing all out of them, it appears to me."
 
 But if you will believe me, he merely looked surprised, that
 is all! he didn't grasp the situation at all, didn't know he had
 walked into a trap, didn't discover that he was _in_ a trap.  I could
 have shot him, from sheer vexation.  With cloudy eye and a struggling
 intellect he fetched this out:
 
 "Marry, I seem not to understand.  It is _proved_ that our wages
 be double thine; how then may it be that thou'st knocked therefrom
 the stuffing?--an miscall not the wonderly word, this being the
 first time under grace and providence of God it hath been granted
 me to hear it."
 
 Well, I was stunned; partly with this unlooked-for stupidity on
 his part, and partly because his fellows so manifestly sided with
 him and were of his mind--if you might call it mind.  My position
 was simple enough, plain enough; how could it ever be simplified
 more?  However, I must try:
 
 "Why, look here, brother Dowley, don't you see?  Your wages are
 merely higher than ours in _name_, not in _fact_."
 
 "Hear him!  They are the _double_--ye have confessed it yourself."
--**--**--
 it says they've got to advance, little by little, straight through
 the centuries.  And notice how it works.  We know what wages are
 now, here and there and yonder; we strike an average, and say that's
 the wages of to-day.  We know what the wages were a hundred years
 ago, and what they were two hundred years ago; that's as far back
 as we can get, but it suffices to give us the law of progress,
 the measure and rate of the periodical augmentation; and so, without
 a document to help us, we can come pretty close to determining
 what the wages were three and four and five hundred years ago.
 Good, so far.  Do we stop there?  No.  We stop looking backward;
 we face around and apply the law to the future.  My friends, I can
 tell you what people's wages are going to be at any date in the
 future you want to know, for hundreds and hundreds of years."
 
 "What, goodman, what!"
 
 "Yes.  In seven hundred years wages will have risen to six times
 what they are now, here in your region, and farm hands will be
 allowed 3 cents a day, and mechanics 6."
 
 "I would't I might die now and live then!" interrupted Smug, the
 wheelwright, with a fine avaricious glow in his eye.
 
 "And that isn't all; they'll get their board besides--such as it is:
 it won't bloat them.  Two hundred and fifty years later--pay attention
 now--a mechanic's wages will be--mind you, this is law, not
 guesswork; a mechanic's wages will then be _twenty_ cents a day!"
 
 There was a general gasp of awed astonishment, Dickon the mason
 murmured, with raised eyes and hands:
 
 "More than three weeks' pay for one day's work!"
 
 "Riches!--of a truth, yes, riches!" muttered Marco, his breath
 coming quick and short, with excitement.
--**--**--
 
 "Well, all right, let it go, since you vote me down.  But there's
 one thing which certainly isn't fair.  The magistrate fixes a
 mechanic's wage at one cent a day, for instance.  The law says that
 if any master shall venture, even under utmost press of business,
 to pay anything _over_ that cent a day, even for a single day, he
 shall be both fined and pilloried for it; and whoever knows he did
 it and doesn't inform, they also shall be fined and pilloried.  Now
 it seems to me unfair, Dowley, and a deadly peril to all of us,
 that because you thoughtlessly confessed, a while ago, that within
 a week you have paid a cent and fifteen mil--"
 
 Oh, I tell _you_ it was a smasher!  You ought to have seen them to
 go to pieces, the whole gang.  I had just slipped up on poor
 smiling and complacent Dowley so nice and easy and softly, that
 he never suspected anything was going to happen till the blow
 came crashing down and knocked him all to rags.
 
 A fine effect.  In fact, as fine as any I ever produced, with so
 little time to work it up in.
 
 But I saw in a moment that I had overdone the thing a little.
 I was expecting to scare them, but I wasn't expecting to scare
 them to death.  They were mighty near it, though.  You see they
 had been a whole lifetime learning to appreciate the pillory; and
 to have that thing staring them in the face, and every one of them
 distinctly at the mercy of me, a stranger, if I chose to go and
 report--well, it was awful, and they couldn't seem to recover
 from the shock, they couldn't seem to pull themselves together.
 Pale, shaky, dumb, pitiful?  Why, they weren't any better than